Food: 4 Decor: 4 Service: 3 Met up with a friend here for happy hour. 1. Chana Chat Poppers, 5 ~Really good. Outside was flaky and crunchy, and the inside was nice and cool. Good contrast and flavor. 2. Home style Chicken Curry, 9 ~Pretty good. Lots of chicken and a bit spicy, although there was something I bit in that was bitter and inedible. 3. Spicy Jack Cheese Naan, 4 ~Pretty good. Went well with the curry. Service could have been better. The menus weren't clean and crisp, I didn't get my water refilled towards the end, and it took too long to get our checks. Total was only about $13 pp. Definitely would visit again, assuming I can find parking.
After a horrible experience at the Empire Tap Room across the street my friends and I stopped in for a late night drink.  The waitress was extremely friendly and brought us the larger pitcher of drinks for the smaller pitcher price.  When two of my friends wanted dessert she offered to have the kitchen reopen just for them, but of course we refused. The only reason it is 4 and not 5 stars is because we didn't eat here but the food other people had looked and smelled tasty.
The food I'd give 3 stars.  However the service here is awful.  The night I went there weren't many people dining and the service was super slow.  They over charged our bill and informed us that if you split the check between more than one card that the tip amount the computer generates messes up so they had to cross that amount out and write the accurate amount by hand. The dishes are way over priced.  Our cocktails tasted terrible.  They didn't have a bartender working, the server had to make it herself and it took about 20 minutes for our drinks to come out after ordering.  It also took 15 minutes for my espresso to come out at the end and we were one of 3 tables there.... no one knew how to work the espresso machine so they had to ask around.  When I got the espresso it tasted bitter and I wish I hadn't ordered it. One of the worst dining experiences of my life, i would not go back here.  Dar Bar down the street is a family style place that is cheaper, better food and great service.
Sad to hear that this place will be closing down in a couple of weeks and will become a catering operation. I guess it would be a moot point to offer menu suggestions. I really liked the food here --- nice fusion and interesting tastes. The service and ambiance is also very nice not to mention the chance to walk the Palo Alto downtown after a good dinner. We'll probably visit again before it closes out.
BOOOOOOOOO!!!!!! I don't like this place!!! I stood at the bar for 10-minutes and no sight of a bartender. I was then told to sit at a table for service. I sat for 5-minutes and no one in sight. I went back to the bar and sat.......it was another 5-minute before I could hail a bartender. I sat with my friends and when it was time for another drink I went up to the bar again and no one was at the bar again! One suggestion to the owner: Hire some staff to bartend and take cocktail orders!!!! You might actually make a buck!
This place has the worst soup I have ever had in my life. But on the other hand the amazing Lamb Lollipops showed me that I can like - even love - lamb. Mantra is a mixed bag. A mixed bag of slightly overpriced Indian food. So, the Carrot Ginger Soup. Would you believe this appeared as a must-order in one of the three Yelp Review Highlights? Other people raved about it as well. I'm guessing something went wrong that day because it just tasted of cream. Like they forgot the carrot and ginger altogether. At the time I thought maybe the flavors were subtle and I couldn't taste them because I had just eaten something spicy, but now I can report after eating the leftover soup with a clean palate, that no - it still tastes like pure cream. Next time I want that many calories just hook me up with an IV of this soup so I don't have to taste it. Other than the soup, the beginning of our meal started well. The Non-Vegetarian Sampler would have earned this place five stars on its own. The Lamb Lollipops were killer - the ground lamb is served on cinnamon sticks and the meat is infused with cinnamon. I loved this and I don't even like lamb! The flavorful Chicken Malai was my second favorite thing I tried that night. I've had this dish at a lot of places and this might be the best. The third item on the sampler, the spicy Salmon Tikka, was outshone by the others but very good too. I also noshed on the Naan with Spicy Jack Cheese. Finally someone paired naan with cheese! Not traditional in the slightest but Oh! So! Good! We also had the wallet-busting Sea Bass. Sea Bass is worth the $25 at The House in San Francisco, but not here. The fish was actually the second least favorite thing I tried. It was a good size portion but nothing to write home about. The best things about the dish were the cauliflower puree and the roasted carrots. We bought a coupon on http://Restaurant.com for this place - $10 for $25 worth of food. Even with the coupon it's a bit overpriced but can be worth coming back if you order right.
Buffet selection is decent and clean. The ambiance is alright to as compared to traditional Indian buffet. My only main gripe is service is slow. There's only one server and the owner so you have to come early if you want to get your Naan before you finish eating your food.
My wife & I had been to Mantra many times, and usually, we were quite pleased with our experiences there. However, it seems that there's been an ownership change, a menu change, and things have gone downhill. On our most recent visit, my meat entree arrived cold and dangerously undercooked (i.e. raw), and I had to send it back to the kitchen. In this day and age of good customer service, I was shocked that they didn't offer any sort of compensation (free dessert, a discount or even a free dinner). Since I had eaten some of the cold meat, I was worried about getting sick for hours afterwards. Mantra is now off our list, as there are plenty of places in and around Palo Alto that will provide better food and treat us better.
High prices, low value, and dirty ! The food sounds innovative, however tastes mediocre.  Service is slow and unattentive.  Ambiance looks modern and nice but on close inspection really dirty. Saturday night 6 PM, waited at the table for 15 mins before waiter shoes up to take our drink order.  Asked for a draft beer, waiter says they are all warm.  Just connected the keg to the fridge.  So I get a bottle of Newcastle and he brings it with a glass that has a hair on it.  No silverware when we first sat down.  They bring us a set and it is still wet. Our table ordered the hans, lamb bhune curry, a vegetable dish, the kofta curry and grilled paneer.  It took 45 mins for the food to come out.  When it was finally served ... it was only some at a time, so by the time we were finishing eating the last dish came out.  Lamb bhune tasted the best ... but nothing great.  Next day we had stomach issues. The waiter was apologetic and kept blaming the cooking staff for being slow.  We look around and the place was little over half full. Bathrooms are disgusting.  There's an ottoman in the corner next to the toilet with  dried spray drops on it.  Dim light to disguise the dirt and stains all over the floor.  The soap dispenser was empty.
About a year ago Mantra did a menu update, and since then I haven't enjoyed my food there.  I've stopped going regularly or suggesting it as a place to go to friends. The vegan (gluten free) options have dwindled to a lackluster "Goan Curry", which doesn't seem very authentic.  I think there might have been some zucchini or something in my curry. Ew.  Not only do I hate zucchini, and am allergic to it, I wouldn't even imagine it would show up at an Indian restaurant!  Yuck. Everything I've had is too salty.  I would steer clear until the next "menu update".  Perhaps it will bring back some of the better dishes that have been banished from the menu, or some new exciting ones.  Until then, farewell Mantra.
Tasty food, great deals at happy hour. There is a separate vegan menu with one or two interesting... Read more 
I was back at Mantra recently to enjoy the recently-reinstated 50% off happy hour. This is a steal of a deal in the area with great food options and stiff drinks. I noticed the menu has been revamped, which was both interesting and slightly disappointing, since some of my favorites are no longer around. This time, we ordered: - Vegetarian samosas: Three pieces per order. Really tiny size! - Spreads, Dip, and Naan: Good selection of chickpea hummus, eggplant bharta, and curry dipping sauce. Four pieces of naan served initially, but we ordered an extra basket since a lot of spreads/dips were remaining. While the taste and flavor of the food was great, and priced well during happy hour, I'm not sure I'd pay those prices to dine here for the regular menu since it's pricier than average for the quantity of food. I ordered the Mumbai Margarita to accompany our snacks. They definitely didn't short the alcohol -- it was definitely a successful masti hour!
Best happy hour in Palo Alto, 4:30-6:30pm 7 days a week! It's valid at the bar only, so come early... Read more 
I emailed this letter a week ago, with no response. Hate to do this, Mantra...But you've given me no choice but to go public. ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Management, I came in on Sunday, April 8th at 8pm. Party of 8. Reservation via Savored. I must start with saying that I come to Mantra many times, and more often when Savored picked your restaurant up last year. However, after my recent dining experience, I'm not sure that I will continue to do so. Upon arrival, I was told that my alteration from a party of 6 to 8 had been noted, due to a message I left on Mantra's voicemail earlier that day. We were seated promptly and made our orders. As the night wore on, my guests and I were disappointed that all drinks and food took 20-30 minutes to arrive from the time they were ordered, even with only 3 other parties in the restaurant. We did not mind food as much, as preparation is important, but the drinks took unnaturally long every time. Halfway through our meal, we placed an order for additional food, only to be told 10 minutes later that the kitchen has closed. I assume that this information should have been conveyed well before the actual closing of the kitchen, however no "last call" was announced. Needless to say, we were still hungry, and ended the night as so. When our bill was received, the Savored discount had not been taken. This has been a problem in the past, but was disregarded as it was taken care of once I mentioned the reservation. However this time, I was told that the discount was only meant for parties up to 6 people. Nowhere on the Savored site is that noted. I also assumed as non-issue since my request to change the party to 8 people was accepted and accommodated for. Discount was taken after this conversation (thank you). We asked to split the bill evenly over 5 cards, however this definitely did not happen. Each bill was completely different, with VERY odd gratuity attached to them. We were also being ushered out of the restaurant quickly, so we didn't have enough time to do the math ourselves to split up the charges evenly as requested. Now I am hearing back from my guests that their cards have been charged for amounts they did not sign for. Especially when one bill varied from another with a difference of about $70! This practice is unacceptable. As a former restaurant employee, I am appalled at the amount of issues that arose from one of my favorite restaurants. Please have someone get back to me to clear up these issue immediately and appropriately. Thank you, Nikita
I met up a few friends here for a Happy Hour on a Friday evening, tucked away on a side street made the whole experience relaxing and it was all about chill-axing. I got the Pimm's cup (:D) 'Pimm's No. 1' Liqueur, Fresh Lemon Juice, Ginger Ale, Lemon Twist... it was quite exactly what a warm evening in Palo ALlo would demand for, delicious and with plenty of alcohol. We shared the Samosas and Spreads, Dip & Naan. Everything tasted fresh and good. The dips had a variety of curry dipping sauce and eggplant with hummus. It all went well with the fresh naan. We had a pleasant server and a fun experience, I would go back for Happy Hour to Mantra.
We went in for late dinner on a Monday night. We picked the vegetarian options on the menu, starting with the "Taste" option. The achari paneer tikka and the goan curry were our entrees of choice. The food was good. The drinks on the other hand were a different story and pretty disappointing. I'll probably skip those the next time.
Heads up...I think they're selling so, be aware. Overall, service was good and efficient. Ambience was also worthy of Palo Alto mid-upscale. However, it turns out their primary clientele are seniors tour groups from Wisconsin. For an Indian-themed restaurant, I've had mac and cheese with more spicing. #2, I think they're just flat out confused about the concept of fusion. The food here is neither traditional Indian (read with salt or anything resembling a flavor), nor is it a fusion of anything else other than a plate of hummus dip thrown in to satisfy the criteria- so what you get is just really really bland Indian dishes that are overpriced. The ingredient quality is great, but my god could they use a new chef lineup. Its not worth your money given the variety of stellar options up and down University Ave.
3 stars = A-OK. My mom and I ventured to Mantra tonight because we found a great deal for this unique Indian restaurant and bar on http://Restaurant.com . Mantra certainly is an interesting place. It's somewhat upscale. I really liked the dining room, especially the artwork. However, I did think it was a little strange to be listening to 'Call Me Maybe' and Akon in a somewhat upscale restaurant. I guess the tunes were for the bar scene - which was also a little unsettling because there were three very loud guests at the bar screaming at the basketball game on the TV. But I cannot fault Mantra for their patrons' rude behavior. The restaurant was surprisingly empty for 8:00 on a Sunday night. There were only two other tables in use. Nevertheless, the service was prompt and attentive. Our server was especially accommodating of all of my mom's annoying requests. My mom and I ordered a variety of dishes including the vegetarian samosas, chana chat poppers, tandoori drumsticks, and chicken tikki masala. All of these dishes were good - none were great - and I thought that they were all very reasonably priced. We also enjoyed the butter naan and basmati rice. I wanted to try something unique so I ordered the rosemary-pesto & parmesan naan - which was not good at all. Heed my warning and do not order it under any circumstance! The ingredients just don't mesh well together. So overall, Mantra offered standard Indian food in a unique, somewhat-upscale atmosphere. I definitely think that the cuisine is on-par with that of other Indian restaurants in Palo Alto. But I do think that Mantra is worth a try for Indian food lovers. However, my mom and I probably won't be back unless we go for happy hour.
Lunch for five at Mantra. To start out, there was a promotion that brought us here...pay for four buttet seats, get one free. Very nice. Good Indian cuisine...a little more spicy than we were used to; but ingredients, especially salads, are fresh and varied. Buffet is $9.95...this is a good value. Enjoy!
I was pretty intrigued by this place after seeing 'Paneer Ravioli' on the menu. Seems like a GREAT idea, so the next time it was convenient we hit it up. Probably would have taken care of this months ago on a lunch break, but the item in question was dinner only. If you've had paneer, and had ravioli, you can probably go ahead and imagine how good this can be. Plenty of indian food uses awesome tomato and onion based sauces, right? Probably the LAST thing you'd think of would be a pot pie covered in mushrooms and mashed potatoes right? I didn't know what to make of it, to be honest. It wasn't horrible, but wow was it weird. Had a potato appetizer that was just not cooked all the way through. Maybe it was supposed to be like that? All I know is I've been going to Indian restaurants religiously for like 10 years and I've never been so baffled by the selections. Definitely overpriced, service kinda blah, not feeling the 'lounge' atmosphere, etc...
I was really hoping to enjoy dinner here.  Location was great and the general ambiance was very cool. I knew that things might be slow from reading other yelpers' reviews, but I really didn't expect things to be this sloooooowww.  That would have been fine if the food was really delish, but unfortunately, the saag paneer was extremely salty (and the water we requested never appeared) and the Chicken Tikka masala was terrible and lukewarm.  The naan was so-so.  (The staff was very nice though.) So disappointed.  :(
This review is  late coming but I after considering it for a while, I feel strongly that it should be written. I have never experienced any thing in a restaurant or in my regular life like I experieced the last time I went to mantra. We had been there two times before and the service was slow but adequate and the food was good. The last time the service was terrible. We waited for over 45 minutes for our food and our waitress came over only once to refill our drinks.and check on us. I had to go to the bar, where all of the wait staff were chatting, to ask about our food and put in another drink order. It was after we spoke to the manager about the poor service that things got ugly very fast. The waitress came over to our table and verbally asaulted us for speaking to the manager.. When we tried to explain why we did that, she escalated her attack on us. Her mannerisms caused me to have an anxiety attack and I had to leave the situation shaking and with chest pains (typical of a panic attack). During this whole imcident the manager was no where to be found. Let me reitterate. I have never, in my life, been spoken to in the mannerism that the waitress assaulted us in.  just thinking about the incident raises my anxiety and no matter how good the food might be, I will never be able to step foot in that restaurent again.
Mantra is a swanky, modern Indian restaurant that offers swanky, modern Indian food. Upon walking in, you'll see the restaurant lit in all different colored lights. The furniture is modern, and the ceilings are high. Dance music is played through the speakers. It almost has the feel more of a night club than a restaurant. Perhaps this modern, even youthful, energy is meant to be symbolic of the dishes you're about to be served. This certainly isn't your grandmother's Indian food! Mantra takes traditional Indian dishes, and puts modern spins on them, blurring the lines between Indian and California cuisines. Tonight, I ordered the Mantra Korma Curry, which were lamb and beef meatballs bathed in a korma curry. The meat was good, but the curry was exceptional. Along with it, I ordered their pepper Jack naan; it came out in four pieces, and I soaked up my naan in the curry, but there was still some curry left over even after I ran out of bread! I kid you not, I ate the remaining curry all by itself with a spoon. It really was that good. Mantra is a wonderful treat, a place that I love to treat myself to.
Mantra is just one of those places where everything is so tasty, so incredible, so well done, that... Read more 
Good food..both vegetarian and non vegetarian! Nice ambience.. good for dating and  dinner
My brother eats Indian food at least once a week. I took him to Mantra for their Christmas buffet. He said it was the best meal he can remember having! My taste in food tends to the boring and finicky, coffee and dessert generally being of more interest to me, but the dahl was the best I've ever had. Our experience  is all the more amazing to me considering: 1. it was a buffet 2. it was Christmas night. I expected to have to give the restaurant some leeway on quality. Instead, they exceeded all expectations... Food: As I mentioned, I consider my brother the expert, and he was a very, very happy brother this Christmas meal. Hot naan was included for bread. It tasted fresh from the oven, lightly brushed with melted butter (probably ghee, the fine, yum, clarified butter), with a hint of herbs. I could have made a meal of naan and dahl and been happy. We both drooled and shamelessly overindulged on little pink cardamom cakes dipped in dark chocolate fondue, for dessert. Note I said "dark chocolate", meaning, the rich, delicious real thing, melted for fonduing purposes, not the cheap artificial imitation milk chocolate so often served for fondue and chocolate fountains. I may not be up on Indian food, but I care about chocolate, and this was the right stuff. The little pink cake balls (I forget what they're called) are usually just sweet, with no particular flavor, and I have never liked them before. We both tasted the cardamom in these, and it was a great counterpoint to the sweetness. I ate at least four! Ambience: Excellent. Quality San Francisco style electronic music for background at a lovely low volume. High, high ceilings. Warm, muted jewel tones for hanging lamps and accents. Sparkling bar area. Private dining rooms for groups as well as a main seating area. Comfortable use of space. Cloth napkins. :) Service: Quite good, professional and courteous. As it turns out, I misunderstood the terms of the special Christmas buffet, and had a question about the final check. I returned to Mantra the next day to speak to someone about it. Karam, an owner, spoke with me personally, was utterly gracious about it all, and made everything right. Mantra helped me to make Christmas 2011 one of the good ones.
Born in India, I have been to Mantra four times for their take-out buffet lunch (that sounds oxymoronic, but I have to rush back to work). Each time, the only reason I went there was that my craving for Indian food overpowered the poverty of eating experience each time--at half the price of the fresher and well-stocked Janata buffet, it is however, worth the price. The reasons for my rating are as follows: * They advertise their closing time as 2 pm. I can only get there around 1:30 pm. Half the dishes have been finished and the pans dried out. I suggest their advertising should read something like: "We stop restocking fresh food at xxx pm." * Each time the vegetarian dishes were almost all gone by 1:30 pm. As a PETA follower, it is difficult to eat non-free-range chicken--all I have to do is imagine the chickens' entire lives standing in one position, merely eating (and pooping). * There are always 4 chicken dishes. Although 6.95 does not justify lamb or fish, some creativity is in order--perhaps a waiter-served small portion of lamb, perhaps only on one day of the week, perhaps one piece of ground lamb kebab (akin to one-nan policy) Chicken X 4 of which two are always all gone by 1:30 pm, is a bit too much. * The to-go container has gotten smaller and smaller, with only 2 compartments, which means that food of different tastes has to be piled on top of each other. There are a variety of small compartment to-go containers in the market--4-6 compartments. * The person who answers the phone for me to find out what are the dishes of the day, has not spoken adequate English to answer my questions. Once in the restaurant, however, he has been polite and accomodating. * That's it. I am sorry to see Hydrabad House go. They served a mixed cuisine of North Indian and Muslim, that is unsurpassed in the Bay Area. Mantra food is average Indian-restaurant-overseas cuisine. I hear the a la carte is more eclectic. I do laud their fair price though, the reason that makes it affordable for me to eat there.
This review is solely for happy hour.  Daily from 4:30 - 6:30, and only if seated in the happy hour section of bar seating. 50% off a set menu of small plates and drinks.  It's a fairly good selection of cocktails, beer, red and white wines and ten options of small plates.  (They don't seem to change this menu so you could conceivably get sick of it if you frequent them often!).  I've tried almost everything on their small plates happy hour menu -- CHANA CHAT POPPERS are actually served cold or room temp and not the delicious warm cheese poppers that we were expecting. CUCUMBER SALAD was surprisingly good quinoa, jicama, and cucumbers - fresh! SPICY JACK CHEESE NAAN and ROSEMARY PESTO PARMESAN NAAN were both pretty standard, but I preferred the (not very) spicy jack cheese naan. TOFU W PEPPERS on top of rice was delicious, and surprisingly a favorite of mine. DAAL is standard with minimal spice but a good dip for the naan. CHICKEN CURRY is medium spicy - be sure to order a side of rice if you want it. Haven't tried the crispy greens, tandoori drumsticks, or mussels masala yet. Great value at these prices for decent food.  I usually pay ~$15 pre-tip for a glass of wine with a filling meal of these shared small plates.  But I wouldn't pay full price, it's not that good....
Based on their happy hour prices only (I'd give it 2 stars if I was paying full price!).  It used to... Read more 
Not the most traditional of Indian cuisine, but very delicious nonetheless.  I'm generally wary of the trendy/fusion feel, but Mantra definitely impressed me both time I've been for dinner. The sea bass is amazing, and the butter chicken is very good.  I wasn't as big of a fan of the spinach curry (not very authentic at all) but it wasn't bad either. Great service and cool decor.  The drinks are also very good, making this a fun place to come with friends.  Definitely get the http://reataurant.com deal--it makes the high price tag somewhat more reasonable.
I went to this place a few nights ago with my husband and friend. Lovely decor--great "date" atmosphere I guess you could say. We had a reservation but were a few minutes early. The host asked us if we wanted to sit in the "lounge" area which we said was fine. Kind of regretted that decision after sitting down, because after a few minutes the seats became quite uncomfortable. There was no leg room at all (don't recommend this if you're taller than oh, say, 5'4"). Was kind of annoyed too, because a few minutes after sitting down, we noticed at least a couple open tables we could have been sat at. Oh well, no biggie. The food is what you probably want to hear about anyway... I was happy to see a decent vegetarian selection. I ordered the pesto paneer which was absolutely delightful. We ordered some rice, butter naan, and garlic naan as well. One order of rice is a good amount for two people. My husband had the chicken tikka masala which he said was good but wasn't any better than anywhere else he's ever had it. My friend had the lamb (lamb bhuna I think?). He said it was good. I obviously did not try any of their dishes. Overall, I prefer my Indian food to be buffet style and for like $15 a person or less. This place was definitely fancier, more upscale. I did very much enjoy my pesto paneer (at $14 or so, it was, I think, the cheapest entree on the menu), which was definitely not a dish you'd see on a standard buffet menu. But between those dishes and a couple alcoholic beverages, we spent close to $100 which is not worth it in my opinion. Also, although the servers were all very friendly, service was quite slow. Not a deal breaker, but still something to note. Next time I am craving Indian food though, I'm going to head down to Mountain View to go to my favorite place, Passage to India, where the the rice and naan are all included with an abundant amount of tasty vegetarian entrees in a very reasonably priced buffet.
The night before our wedding, my husband and I had dinner at Mantra with his two sisters and my sister.  We all love Indian food, and we all loved Mantra.  The waitress heard us talking about how much we love Paneer, and she recommended some Paneer dishes from the menu, as well as some Paneer combinations that were not on the menu.  We had a great time eating a feast of Paneer family style!  The waitress also discovered that we were getting married the next day, and she arranged for complimentary dessert.  The food was great, the service was fantastic, and we all had a fabulous time.
The seafood curry was great, nice and thick, spicy and hot, yet delicious. The lamb chops were juicy, tender, but charcoaled too much on the outside (to my taste). Rice was usual. Beers were tasteless. I think if they have a lunch buffet, it should be great. Their dinners are not super impressive, but ok.
I used to be a big fan of Mantra.  It was once the best Indian restaurant in Palo Alto.  The food quality has declined though and service has deteriorated as well.  I may go back for the lunch buffet but it isn't really worth going for dinner anymore even with the discounts.
I've been here at least a hundred times now.  It's definitely the best Indian restaurant in Palo... Read more 
OK...this restaurant looks great from the outside, but what does it matter when you have some of the slowest/worst service ever ?  I swear we had to order everything multiple times and they still couldn't get it right.  Usually restaurants that charge you a premium have top notch service... Anyhow, the margarita's were good.  The mojito's were ok.  The food was far below what I had expected at this price point.  The cut of steak they gave us was terrible...I am not going to go on.  I for one, will not ever go here again, and if it wasn't for the 30% off coupon we had, I would give it 1 star.  If you want good Indian food go elsewhere.  Try Amber or Janta in Palo Alto which cost less and tastes way better.  Or if you're in the city, go to Dosa which also has a great ambiance and way better food.
I wasn't really planning on returning to Mantra, but I had a http://restaurant.com certificate from a while ago that had to be used. The food was fine, 2-3 stars at most. If you're trying to decide between a small or regular sized curry, go for a small-- the portions are about the same size, and is plenty to share between two people. The meats were a bit tough, the non-curry items were a little bland... nothing stood out, but nothing was horrendous (food wise). The service however, WAS. ALEXIS was our server, and she provided some of the WORST service I have experienced in a long long time. Not only was she inattentive and scatterbrained, but when she did deem us worthy of her attention she was, to quote a fellow diner, "a complete bitch." Not sure what we did to deserve being treated so poorly, but at least she left us alone for the most part while we ate. To add insult to injury, we had an 18% gratuity written onto our check. No way in hell she deserved that tip. If we had any choice in the matter, she would have gotten nothing. OVERALL: There are plenty of Indian restaurants in the area serving higher quality food for cheaper and with much friendlier service. I won't be recommending Mantra to friends unless they want to be treated like crap.
MM... yeah. Mantra's happier hour could use some tweaking. JF and I hopped on over for their late... Read more 
It's good. I hit the lunch buffet and they always have a few of my favorites. The chicken tikka masala is awesome. Service is pretty good, food is pretty good but it seems a little pricey for Indian food in my opinion.
I went with  group of 5 for dinner. The service was good, we asked to replace our plates as none of our plates looked clean, the guy took it +vely and replaced them. Food was little less to average, the quantities of appetizers were like 'prasad' at temples( very little). Ambience is good and waiters were friendly and cool. They have very few rice varieties for a Indian restaurent :O.The coconut rice that we ordered hardly had any coconut in it. The only thing that i give good feedback here is for lassi.. It tasted good and different from other restaurents. I would'nt visit this place again unless its a huge party from someone close
This is a great place for happy hour. I love their Rosemary Naan and Samosas. You must try their sea bass too it's absolutely succulent and out of this world.
I've been a here a few times and it was never very memorable except for a few interesting cocktails like a Rosewater Mojito. Today, I came with some people for lunch shortly after noon. I would say about half the buffet dishes were empty. I asked the waiter about vegan options and the chef came out to speak with me saying he could make rice since the rice had dairy in it and an eggplant dish. Neither dish ever arrived. The food was all room temperature in the buffet and it appeared there was no Sterno/any heating element under the food. People were also reusing their plates, possibly because waitstaff didn't remove the dirty ones which really disgusted me. My gut is killing me a few hours later- not sure if it's because there was dairy in the food I was told had none or because the food wasn't fresh/heated. The bill included a hefty gratuity probably because we were a group- which I found weird since it was both a buffet meaning we essentially served ourselves and because the guy who took our drink order (which is pretty much all he did and refill water) made himself scarce the whole time and didn't do the essentials like clear plates. We collectively headed towards the door and paid at the counter because we didn't get our check.
Came here a long time ago when it first opened and never got around to post a review. The decor was nice and had a fancier feel to it. Last week I went there with a coworker and ... well, how it's changed. I think it's definitely under a different owner or management because it is no longer that classy fancy restaurant that I remember it being. We got there around lunch time. no line and maybe a handful of people. They have a lunch buffet so we did that. It was about $10 per person but the choice/selection of the buffet wasn't that great. I was disappointed that they did not have the spinach/potatoe dish - which is like a classic dish isn't it?!! They did however have the butter chicken and saffron rice. They did not have chicken tikka either, so another disappointment. They had fried cauliflower but it was soggy and oily. The dessert that day was chocolate panna cotta. It was good, but not to die for. Overall, it was an OK lunch buffet. The food was also more on the bland side.
Hubby and I went for a date night here last night.  I can't say that I'm at all impressed.  In fact, we were so disappointed! We live in the East Bay and should have know better to go anywhere other than Fremont for good Indian food, but we wanted to get out of town and experience something new.  We won't be coming back. I'll agree with the other reviewers that the ambiance is very chic.  The service might've been a tad slow but they were nice and the waitress didn't charge me for my entree, which I couldn't even eat.  Here's what we got: Spreads, dip and naan:  This was fair, not outstanding but not bad either.  The cashew curry dipping sauce was by far the most flavorful and our favorite. Vegetarian Samosas:  Small but okay.  Again, nothing special. Roasted Cauliflower soup:  This was bad.  Hardly any flavor at all.  I had high hopes when the waiter came to the table and presented the soup by pouring it piping hot from a ceramic carafe into my bowl.  Sadly, the soup had hardly any flavor at all.  I could barely taste the cauliflower, nor could I taste the coconut milk that it was supposedly made with.  It was under-salted and way over-peppered (with cracked black pepper...no curry/spices in sight!).  When the waitress asked me if it was okay that it was medium-spicy upon ordering, I was expecting a nice zinging curried soup.  Not so.  :( Mantra Kofta Curry:  My husband's entree.  He said the sauce was pretty good but the meatballs were really tough.  (I've vegetarian, so I can't speak for this dish as much) Quinoa Kofta Curry:  I just could've even believe this dish.  It was so bland and tasteless that if wasn't worth eating.  :(  Again, such high hopes from the description but no seasoning whatsoever. Let me say, too, that I'm not one of those people that needs a super-spicy dish to be satisfied.  I'm actually kind of a light/middle weight when it comes to spicy dishes.  So for me to say it's bland...it really is tasteless. So sad for the amount of money we paid for this meal.  We won't be back.
I'll admit I came here just for happy hour so I can't speak too credibly to the dinner or lunch scene.... So with that being said, the happy hour deals are pretty good.  Great cocktails for half the price and a long list of appetizers for $5-$10 that range in size/portions.  The cocktails are definitely the highlight.... HOWEVER... that is if you can actually get service!! During a FRIDAY happy hour there were only 2 waiters for the entire space (which was surprisingly full).  We waited for 45 minutes to get our drinks ordered (which he then brought to the wrong table) and another 45 to order any food.  By the time he came back it was "no longer happy hour" so we couldn't even order the food for the price we expected when we sat down! He was apologetic and said he would take our orders "as if it were still happy hour" (um, we've been here for ALL of happy hour waiting) but was not really too gracious about it.  The food was pretty good but not worth writing home about (or reviewing in greater detail). I will say the space is great. The front part of the restaurant opens out onto the street on nice days and the decor is colorful and unique.  The tables in the back are also well spaced out and there's certainly a nice vibe to the bar and restaurant portion as well.
I have had all the drinks on the menu here in the many times I've been and I have to say each is good. Also, the stuffed naan bread is fantastic. I love coming here for happy hour, as the prices are pretty reasonable. The atmosphere is really lively and the decor is beautiful.
Disclaimer: Indian restaurants are on my least favorite list. But a dinner there this past Saturday may have changed that! I would never have thought I would become a fan of an Indian restaurant! Why I like it? 1. The ambiance was very nice and modern, unlike the traditional Indian restaurant that also smells like curry house. It was perfect for me and my girl friends to go there for a girl friends night out to celebrate one of the girl's birthday. 2. I called Sat. afternoon for a dinner reservation for 6:30 pm. We were running late due to traffice so did not get there till around 7:40 pm. We did not call them back till around 7 pm to inform we were late. But when we finally arrived they had a table reserved for us and seated us right away! It wasn't very busy at that time anyway, but it was still nice that they were pretty good about it. 3. Now onto the most important part: the food. The main reason I like their foods is they are not too spicy for me. I cannot handle too spicy foods and the degree of spiciness in the curry dishes that we ordered was perfect! We ordered the seafood curry with coconut milk, the chicken tikka marsala, grilled scallops with cauliflower puree and a vegetarian curry dish. Granted all the three curry dishes looked about the same as they all have same reddish curry and big chucks of either chicken or seafood, we still enjoyed all of them as they were very flavorful and cooked perfectly. The only thing is we wish there was more sauce in the chicken tikka marsala to dip our naans in. We ordered the garlic naan and the rosemary pesto parmesan nann and they were both great. The service was prompt and good too. My friend said she came here with her hubby for the after-work happy hour sometimes as the appetizers are half priced and that was a very good deal as they both do not eat a lot. We three girls were all full but still have some left over to pack home with so it was a pretty good deal! We paid about $72 including tip and we did not drink anything or got dessert there. That was good in my book. Nothing beats good foods that are reaonably priced and everybody was happy after the meal! I'd definitely go back!
While working in Palo Alto, I stopped by here often during the work week for their lunch buffet.  For about $6 for buffet takeout, the price really can't be beat.  The buffet offerings vary daily.  While the food isn't as high quality as many other Indian places in the Bay, price/quantity/quality ratio is good for lunch. I did come for dinner once, and was extremely disappointed.  Not only was the food overpriced (and fusion-y), but my fish was watery, bland, and poorly seasoned.  I can see why some people may want to come here (ambiance and cocktails), but I wouldn't recommend the food on their dinner menu by any means.
We hosted our son's first birthday party at Mantra. They offer the entire restaurant for private lunch parties on Sat and Sun. The entire experience was superlative from the planning to the food and service the day of. No complaints and Karam Gill is the easiest person to work with. Definitely highly recommend.
Oh, the things they can do with quinoa. I've always loved Mantra, but I came here a few weeks ago to check out the new small plates concept and LOVED IT. This is the only Indian restaurant I've eaten at where the food is delicious without being too heavy. I also love the fact that all their dishes are Indian-inspired but have a modern California twist. Here are some of the best dishes: - Crispy Greens (Who knew spinach could taste so good?) - Quinoa Kebab ( I'm usually not a quinoa person, but this is fabulous) - Ginger Carrot Soup (the BEST ginger carrot soup I've ever had) - Rosemary-Pesto & Parmesan Naan - Quinoa Kofta Curry (again, I don't usually like quinoa but this tastes amazingly indulgent) - Saffron Creme Brulee - Rose & Cardamom Chocolate Lava Cake Last thing to note is the great new layout. There used to be a wall separating the Daru Lounge (bar) and main dining area. Now that that wall is gone, the entire space looks even more open and vibrant than before.
Came here with BF and used our dining coupon for dinner. I'm giving it 2 stars for the ambiance and nice decor. The food was just okay. I think I have had better Indian food that is way cheaper and better tasting/ quality  in Fremont and San Francisco.
3 stars for decent food.  Minus two for the service... We went on a Friday and were seated at 6:20.  Our awkward and slightly rude server finally gets to our table at 6:28.  We ask to order a couple happy hour drinks.  She tells us it stops at 6:30.  Um, ok... She goes away and we look over the menu.  When she comes back, we place our orders.  She tells us they don't have 3/5 things we order and that we have the "old" menus.  Ok... After eating, we ask to box up some leftovers.  She asks us, "everything?"  Yes, everything.  "Even the rice?"  Yes, rice too.  "Are you sure?"  Ummm, yes. Weird.
Whenever I feel like it's a workday where I can afford to spend the afternoon in hyperglycemic lethargy, I go to Mantra for their boxed lunches, which can be a hit or a miss depending on the menu. And by menu I mean it depends on whether they're offering gulab jamun--the diabetes balls--for dessert that day. Because Mantra makes the BEST gulab jamun I've ever tasted. Every time I see those syrup drenched dough balls swimming in their sea of sugared oil slick, it's a struggle of will to not fill my take-out box with them. But for the sake of my arteries (and out of courtesy for other customers), I usually take two or three. Because in the past, I've stood in line behind a guy who filled his lunchbox with 15 of them. Took a look at the last one. Took a look at me. And TOOK the last one. And thus, I was filled with rage. And would not wish that on anyone else. Anyways, my point is, the gulab jamuns here are good!
This review is strictly regarding the ease of making a reservation. Bosses wanted to got to this restaurant today - they asked me to make a reservation for 5 at noon. Simple right? No. I called at about 1130 - no answer but the phone kept ringing and ringing.  Called again right away, again, ringing and ringing but no answer. The vmail said to leave a mesage with reservation and a confirmation via phone will be given.  I did as requested. Waiting 20 min no response. Started calling again, and again, and again. Finally 5 min to noon someone answered and said, no problem.  She didn't apologize about the no return phone call and nor did she seemed flustered (as if the restaurant was too busy and she just wasn't able to answer before). Instead it seemed like I was imposing on her day and she was annoyed. Bad service.
My review is based on take out lunches only. Take out lunch is totally inexpensive and of good quality. You help yourself on a buffet and can choose between about 10 main dishes and flavoured rice. You are given a box that you can fill as much as you want. The box can seem small but I can tell you: you can put a lot in there! A good place for a quick hot Indian lunch.
One star down only because they gave us the wrong food, instead of non-vegetarian, we got veggie appetizer. They fixed it, and the kebabs was ok (for the ckn), the lamb was hecka good. It was on a cinnamon stick! The salmon was crispy and yummy.  I also ordered the spread, dips, and hummus with naan..o man..the curry and eggplant was realllly good. I suggest you NOT to order this because you'll get full so quickly. They do have happy hours for a variety of small plates, wine, beer, etc for 50% off, but I came for dinner. For entree I had the seabass with roasted cauliflower purree..a bit on the creamy and too buttery side for the purreeeeeeee..gah...but the seabass was cooked in a tandoori oven so it was pretty good..i mean in general the fish is fatty..the other plate was ckn tikki masala..omg it's goood...you have to have it with naan..see why I said don't get the other naan appetizer? you'll need naan to eat with this..it was amazingly good... the indian beer was good too..and the place is nice n lively as it turns into a lounge at night... overall not a bad experience, could of came to pour me more water..but the food was good, so i can't complain..
I really like the ambiance of this place. The food is also good. Not as spicy as Indian people are used to.
Best Happy Hour in town. Great, tasty but not heavy small plate dishes and incredibly pricing.  Wonderful Mai Tais, great service as well - we always enjoy talking with the staff.  We love it here as do our friends.
My blessed gf and my anniversary was coming up.  I asked her what she wanted to do and she gleefully replied, "pick weeds from our garden and then have indian food for dinner!"  I reached for the heavens and proclaimed, "o happy day, thou hast finally come, huzzah!" We pulled weeds to our hearts content fondly remembering back to the 1st time we met not pulling weeds.  It was dinner time so my thrift-conscious gf printed out a $25 coupon for Mantra she bought for $4, stuffed it in her Balenciaga purse, and we were off. Nestled in a block of hipsters delight, we came upon Mantra where it proclaimed to be modern casual Indian on the door.  Inside, it was basically a copy of Dosa in SF.  High ceilings, dark tones, chill out music, and the faint smell of curry. We had a reservation for 8pm but when we got there, the place was half empty (no, it wasn't half full).  We waited for a bit for someone to seat us.  A frazzled gentleman came by and said "I'll be with you in one moment" and flew by us.  Odd because the place was hardly busy.  We wait a little more and he came by to seat us.  He handed us the menu, then took our water away.  Indian protocol?  I don't know. Another wait, and a jolly white woman came to take our order but saw that we didn't have water.  So, instead of taking our order 1st, she says, "O, you don't have water, I'll be right back."  Based on the time she took to get water, I formulated that the kitchen was located a block and a half away.  It was literally about 2 minutes before she came back with a couple of glasses and a pitcher of water. She poured my gf's water, but when she poured mine, she over shot my glass and almost watered my legs.  She apologized with a jolly laugh.  Teehee. We ordered the chili garlic edamame, spicy calamari, garlic naan, chicken tikki marsala, and spiced NY steak with maple tarmarind glaze.  The waitress jollily interjected that the chef suggests cooking the steak medium rare.  I concurred, and she was off.  We didn't have any napkins so we had to steal them from the table over. 4 scores and 7 seconds later, a different person delivered the calamari and edamame.  Edamame wasn't garlicy or spicy, flavor was decent.  The calamari dip was fairly good but again, it wasn't spicy.  Why state spicy when it clearly isn't?  Were they catering to a man stranded on an island for 10 years on a coconut diet?  The calamari itself was about 60% batter and 40% mini squid babies. Normally we don't finish the appetizers but as you might have guess by now, it took a while to deliver the rest of the food.  We killed the calamari, not by choice.  The naan, chicken, and steak finally show up. The naan is decent at best, not crisp, not garlicy, not fluffy, not anything, just rolled up dough.  The chicken was fairly good actually, more or less moist.  Sauce was actually spicy and crept up on you though, of course, the menu doesn't state that it's spicy. The steak. . .  the steak. . . the steak with mashed potato, it came out medium well.  How bad can this place be?  I mean seriously.  You're a posh restaurant in PA charging "modern" prices, serving a steak that the "chef recommends at medium rare" and you bring out a Birkenstock? We tell Jolly Claus and she says, "o that does look well done.  You can work on the steak but I'm gonna take it back to the chef right quick so that I can show him cuz he's gonna argue with me". . .  By now, I figured out why this place was called mantra because I was chanting my own, WTF WTF WTF WTF in short breaths. The steak that was brought back looked bloody.  We took a bite and it seemed it wasn't salted nor was it rested before slicing.  The steak bleed out and it looked like we murdered Mr. Potatohead on our plate. We finished what we could, asked for the check, and got the eff out of there.  There wasn't a time where I wanted to leave a dollar tip more so than that night but something something karma something. Only reason I would go back was if I had to take a dump.  Mantra, you're like anti-viagra, 1 star.
I hadnt been back to Mantra for awhile and went back for a friends birthday.  Albeit slightly pricey, the food was amazing, and the drinks were delicious.  We got the chicken appetizer, tofu, which was probably the most outstanding dish in my opinion (ive never liked tofu but they got this totally right), the chicken curry, grilled fish, lamb curry, chicken and spinach (instead of cheese and spinach), and naans (garlic and rosemary).  the only thing i could have done without is the rosemary- cheese naan, that was not great, but everything else was outstanding.  Glad to see that even though their menu has changed, it still tastes awesome.
I had a birthday party for a friend here and we had a great time.  the bartenders were helpful in... Read more 
Delicious food, decent vegetarian options ( a few vegan ones too!), great happy hour (you have to be seated in the bar/lounge area though), reasonable prices, yummy drinks.  Can be chilly, so bring a scarf.
Let me summarize what makes Mantra stand out: 1) Quality meats. Indian restaurants can be very cheap on meat quality. Mantra sets the bar higher, even for lunch buffets 2) Options. Dinner prices are very reasonable. The lunch buffet takeout gives me the flexibility to get an Indian buffet but do so quickly. The sit down buffet is very reasonably priced. The happy hour has some great deals. Lots of options, all well thought through. 3) Setting. The space is open, airy, the opposite of cramped. 4) Owner. Really really nice and good guy. I know this doesn't matter for some, but I like to support good people. I have always had flavorful, high quality, excellent food here. And I have been here at least 100 times (not exaggerating) so I can be trusted =)
have been here a handful of times for happy hour, and also a private event. happy hour is such an excellent deal.  did not like the chana chat poppers, but saag paneer, chicken tika masala and naan are good. I will say that when I was here recently for a private event, and was sitting so that I could see the bar, I watched a bartender smell a bottle of juice, and then have other workers behind the bar smell the juice. I couldn't hear what he was saying, but he looked like he was asking around to see whether the bottle had gone bad. he then poured out a glass and tasted it. I guess he must have thought it was okay, because he then proceeded to put the bottle back into their fridge.  hmmm...
Though the food was more like 4 stars, given their prices, Mantra deserves only 3. Most expensive Indian meal I've had, but not that much better than the rest. Recommend mussels masala to start. Vegetarian samosas were good too, but skip the mixed green salad. My garam masala lamb chops were excellent, along with the side of sweet potatoes. Their naan was surprisingly horrible. Too dense.
Happy Hour rocks! Seriously. We ordered one of each dish on the happy hour menu - my favorites are the poppers (similar to pani puri), grilled salad (similar to pakora), and the spicy cheese naan (quesadilla). Had the pomegranate punch since I was driving and that is one yummy non alcoholic drink. Nice ambiance, great for groups.
Michelin recommended- for any of you foodies out there you know what this means. I am not a huge Indian cuisine fan but this place is great! The Na an is great with the twist of Calamari and Chicken Tandoori plus the fried greens. The owner is really friendly and proud of his establishment. Located in Palo Alto on a side street not far from the main drag. If you are hesitant about Indian food this is a great place to break yourself in!
Made reservations for a Friday night dinner with friends.  Parking sucks around here.  Either park at University Ave's parking lot(if you are lucky) or spend half hour looking around the block for street parking :) The resto is spacious, quiet  and decent looking.  Service, food and quality was good.  We ordered the vegetarian and meat platter for appetizer.  I liked the veggie platter - quinoa patty, tofu tikka, pani puri.  Meat platter - salmon tikka, chicken kebab, lamb lollipop. Drinks were good.  The host suggested good karma martini.  Citrusy and not too sweet.  I liked it. For the main course ordered chicken tikka masala, quinoa kofta curry, garlic naan and veggie briyani.  Everything tasted good and we ordered the regular portions so it was more than enough for 3 people. Got the gulab jamuns for dessert.  Great and very sweet.  The menu listed organic items being used and has vegan options as well.  Good place to dine.
Definitely overpriced- the service was pretty bad. I had to send back our chocolate cake that took 15 min+ to come out and then was nothing like what was advertised. I tried a fusion dish- paneer in basil and it tasted like paneer in oily pesto, which is definitely not something I'd ever like to eat again. The tikka masala sauce was great. Also, maybe it's a California thing, but charging you $3 for rice is a bit obnoxious for $15+ plates. Rice is cheap- throw it in. I doubt we'll come back for dinner...
This review is of Mantra's happy hour. It's from 4:30-6:30 7/days a week.  The boy and I have been twice - drink and app selections are half-off and each time he and I have just ordered one of everything and enjoyed the beautiful weather. First, the space is cute with great windows and a tiny patio to chill out at, if you get there early enough to grab a table. Overall, the food is pretty good.  The best of their options during the happy hour is definitely the crispy greens, though you won't go wrong with anything they've got listed. The waitstaff is super friendly during the happy hour, which would be a rarity almost anywhere, as their tip is just going to be smaller due to the lesser costs of the food and drinks, but I guess early enough in the evening people are in good moods.
We ate dinner here last Tuesday night.  I like the new decor - it's totally open and very comfortable and beautiful.  We ordered veggie samosas for appetizer.  The samosas were delicious and came with traditional brown and green sauces which were also good. We got our fav indian dishes - palak paneer (spinach with cheese cubes), chicken tikka masala, biryani with lamb, lamb curry, and naans.  All the dishes were very good.  I especially liked the spinach and the sauce on the chicken!  Naans were soft and yummy. Service was good.  All in all a great experience.  Highly recommended.
Disclaimer - I have not tried their new tapas style menu. I have been here twice and have struggled to go back because I can't my wife to come. This is why Mantra has such mixed reviews - they are a fusion restaurant.  They have some traditional Indian items (i.e. Palak Paneer) and then a lot of other fusion items. I like Mantra's take on Indian - it's unique and sophisticated, but it may not be for everyone. For Indian, try Amber, Passage to India, or Janta first.  Those will satisfy your core Indian desire - then give Mantra a shot.
I've previously been a big fan of Mantra - one of the few decent Indian restaurants that delivers food to my office for lunch. Their lunch boxes were a joy to behold: chicken curry, dall and rice.  It was a complete meal! Then the dreaded menu change....  No more lunch box. I chose the nearest approximation to my old meal: chicken tikka masala.  It's the same price as the old lunch box so was sure it would be comparable. It arrived: one small tab of chicken tikka masala.  No rice.  No dall.  1/3 the food for the same price. No thanks Mantra.
Came here for the lunch buffet.  Nice interior, good food...
This review is for their happy hour (4:30 to 6:30 7 days a week). We got 6 apps and 4 specialty cocktails for $34!! Service was great, food good, drinks better. Cute, friendly hostess also bused our table and helped us out.  The lounge area is very comfortable and there are nice seating arrangements. One problem is that their on-line happy hour menu is about twice as long as the one in the restaurant that you can order from.
Mantra deserves a 5 star rating. The food is great with a perfect balance of spices and is never over spicy. Service is good too. The main reason for my writing this review is their promptness in rendering help and doing the needful in a timely manner. Here is my story: In Nov 2011, we went to Mantra for dinner (around 9.15 pm). The food was awesome. I went to the rest room to wash my hands and my engagement ring slipped out of my finger in the washbasin down to the pipe. I immediately informed my husband and the owner of this place about this incidence. The owner took immediate action, he got in touch with a person who got the pipe (which, was U shaped) opened  using some tools. I was able to get my ring back. The ring was expensive and it was the timely help of the owner that I could get my ring back. The bottom line is that the owner and staff are considerate and cooperative especially towards their customers needs. -Shilpi
Check out the new and improved Mantra! I came earlier this week for casual dinner at the bar. I've been here once before and this time, something seemed different. Turns out that they just recently (two weeks ago) did some remodeling. The main difference is that they took out the huge wall that separated the main dining room from the bar area. Much better! It opens up the place and makes it a lot more inviting. Dinner was delicious! The menu is pretty big and very Indian but the bartender was so sweet and helpful. We ended up ordering too much and had to take a lot home (perfect type of food for reheating). The Chicken Tikka Masala has to be my favorite! Overall great experience, big portions, good prices, helpful staff and great food!
Solid happy hour. Food was decent - some items were just a little too spicy for me, such as the Chana Chat Balls. Rosemary Naan was my favorite.. Service was excellent - my group felt very taken of as soon as we walked in the door. Prices, at least during happy hour, were incredibly good. About $16 for 4 glasses of wine & 3 apps. Oh, and they have Rose wine on draft - delicious!
This place has become more popular since we last came as I last remember having a quiet and intimate dining experience, but on a Friday, it was pretty busy and vibrant both at the bar and the dining area.  We noticed that the menu had a wider selection of food at lower prices.  They had a bunch of starters that range from $3-9.  Last time we came, the entrees ranged from $20-25, but now they were mostly $10-18 in either small or large sizes that I even saw family with children dining here. WIth the changes, we were anxious to order and eat. Luckily, we made OpenTable reservations that we got a nice corner booth seat.  I ordered the Good Karma Cocktail to start with, but after 20 minutes I got impatient and flagged our server thinking he had forgotten my drink, but then he brought it out.  20 minutes for a cocktail is unacceptable IMO.  I was a little irritated and then concerned that our food would take forever too.  It sure did. Our starters came out 25 minutes after we ordered.  We had the Sesame Crisps (sesame fried wonton chips with marinara sauce) and Lamb Samosa.  Don't get the Sesame Crisps!  It's disappointing!  Lamb Samosas were pretty good though. For dinner, we had the large Chicken Tikka, small Seafood Curry, naan, and rice.  We ordered just the right amount of food for 2 people.  The Chicken Tikka was flavorful.  Came garnished with beets, which I'm not a fan of, but with the chicken, it was good.  Even though it was a large size, it seemed like a small portion since it was a perfect size for 2 people.  The curry was flavorful, but it wasn't full of seafood.  It was a good meal, but I wasn't too thrilled after the slow service, poor sizing of plates, and lack of seafood in the curry.  I think this place has gone downhill since the last time we came.  Luckily, we had a $25 http://restaurant.com gift certificate to kill.  Not sure if we'll be back as I think this place has become a PF Chang's of Indian food if you know what I mean.
I went here for dinner the night before Christmas Eve.  It was pretty quiet that night as there were... Read more 
The food was just ok... I've had better at the average Indian buffet, sadly.  We were surprised by the difference in Mantra's interpretation of a raita, the naan was cold, and the paneer was lacking in quantity.  Unfortunately, Mantra was a big let down, with food and especially with service. Service lows: Our app was brought out right away (within 5 minutes of ordering) but we had to wait at least 45 minutes for the rest of the dishes!!  NO ONE came by to check on or update us on the status.  Only after our neighboring table who was seated after us received their food, did we get a comment from a bus boy, "Your food's coming."  And still, after that, we had to wait 15 more minutes.... When the food came, finally, our server acknowledged our HOUR LONG wait.  Yeeesh!!! (Extra tidbits-  No one came by to ask if we wanted beverage refills until our dinner was done and we were overcharged for extra drinks.  While we were offered a free dessert for our trouble, we all believed that they should have removed a dish off of the bill.  There was really no reason for us to stay longer at that venue after a frustrating night.) Would I ever be tempted to return? Definitely Not.  Poor service, whether the food is bad or good never deserves a return visit in my book.
I really like this place. It's definitely not "traditional Indian" -- so Indian snobs might get a bit crabby -- but I find their unique take to be refreshing. The ambiance is chill -- and they seem to play very good music! The servers are extremely attentive -- A+++ My recommendations: Chana Chat Balls Garlic Naan Roasted Cauliflower Soup
Okay food. Very long wait when a group of us went there. They made us wait about 45 mins between appetizer and main course. Super loud. We couldn't hear each other talk. Other than that, the decor is nice. The front lounge area was nicely set up.
This place serves fabulous, sophisticated, nongreasy Indian food. I'd put it up there with Amber India but with a modern decor and some Anglo waitrons. I've had their naan with spreads/dips twice -- so good, especially the orange masala! Their lamb bhuna was delectable, very tender, and spicy but not overwhelming. Once, I had an unusual puff-paste ravioli in a creamy mushroom sauce (maybe some tarragon in there?) that didn't taste Indian to me but was good - very unique. I've been to their lunchtime buffet with people from work, and we all agreed that it was excellent, much better than most Indian buffets. The service I've had has been almost too attentive on a Sunday evening when not many people were there. (Go between 4:30 and 6:30 and it's half off -- wish I had gone earlier to get such a good deal. Not sure if that's just on Sundays or every day.) I'm usually too lazy to write reviews, but I'm writing this one because I want more people to come so Mantra stays in business and I can keep going back.
This is becoming my girlfriend and my favorite go to restaurant in Palo Alto.  It is a great place to sit at the bar.  The staff is very friendly, especially the bar tenders.  The mixed drink specials are great - the ginger ginger is one of my favorites. All of the curries are excellent.   The naan is great - you can' t go wrong with the butter, garlic or rosemary naan.  The ginger carrot soup is really good and the crispy greens are a hit. The happy hour prices are good and they have a late night happy hour which works out well for us.
I went there for the lunch buffet. Skip this place, if you are a vegetarian. * They only had the most basic mixed vegetables and a potato dish as veggie options. * Naan always takes too long to be served. * Pakoras(fritters) are good, but then they are deep-fried! Hard to mess that up! Not worth it for the $11 that you have to pay.
My better half and I went to Mantra for happy hour because I got a gift card from http://Restaurants.com .  We haven't been there since the whole menu was 50% off at happy hour.  So we were surprised to see a smaller menu for happy hour.  First of all we were the only people there.  I told what I believe to be the manager I got a gift card from http://restaurants.com and I didn't print it out, but I'd still like to use it.  He informed me you can't use a gift card on happy hour items.  Which is total b.s.  That's like not being able to use a gift card on a sale item.  So we decided we'd get a few things from the happy hour menu and a few entrees to spend the money ($25) I asked the server when she came if I could use the gift card on regular priced items, she said yea sure of course! So we get our happy hour items.  I ordered a Pimm's Cup, which was on the happy hour menu.   Pretty sure there was less then half a shot in it of Pimm's.  They definitely were watered down so you'd ordered more.  I've had Pimm's Cups there before and this wasn't even the same drink.  Next, I got a drink from the regular menu.  Same thing, it hardly had any alcohol.  F Next we got our regular price menu item.  The server forgot to tell us that the entree didn't come with rice or naan, OK, maybe I'm crazy, but for $15 an entree shouldn't that come with rice and nann? I mean I could go down to street to Junta and get BOTH for half the cost.  So to finish my the rest of my $25 gift card, I order another drink.  So, with the additional drink, entree and RICE, it was well over $25.  Our bill comes, $41.  The server informs me I can't use the gift card, because I didn't spend $50.  WHAT!?!?! Isn't that a coupon? If I would have know that I would have ordered two more Pimms cups and got my 3/4 shot of Pimms! Bottom line, Mantra is penny wise and pound foolish, they are obsessed with money.  If they would have let me use the gift card, I wouldn't have a problem with the whole situation.  But now Mantra, I will NEVER go there again.  They owe me $25. I gave Mantra 1 star because they're food is pretty good.  But that's it.  I'll be going to Junta or Dunbar.  I could buy two entrees, get rice, naan and have left overs for the next day and I bet they would let me use my gift card.
Don't come here expecting good service. I came here for happy hour with my mom because I had a Groupon and forgot you can't combine groupons with other discounts. I asked our server if we could eat the happy hour items at the bar and pay, then be seated at a table to apply the groupon for regular priced items. She came back after talking to the owner and said no... too bad she already entered our order for happy hour or else we would have just sat at a table to use the groupon. Service was slow.. and I mean slow.. for us at least. There were two servers at 6 PM and it wasn't too busy but the waitresses were definitely busting their tooshes. I watched as the owner chatted up his friends at the bar and brought out only their food..never acknowledging other patrons HIS restaurant. We waited at least 20 minutes to place our happy hour order btw.. Food was forgettable. Tandoori chicken wasn't bad but it definitely wasn't authentic. The fried greens were pretty good but the second time we visited (to use the groupon) they weren't good. Wheres the consistency? We ordered the bass the second time and it was delicious. Very moist but the chickpeas it was laid on didn't compliment it. We also ordered a lamb chop dish which was good. The lamb chops were moist but honestly, we make them better at home. My mom ordered the carrot and ginger soup which was pretty good but really heavy. I dont remember what else we ordered but before the groupon was applied our total was $95 and we were full.. barely. Definitely a good experience but we won't be experiencing it again soon.
I'm kind of torn here because while the food was decent, the service could definitely use vast improvement.  We sat down at a table in the bar area, and it took forever for someone to come and take our drink order.  It was a Friday during happy hour.  And at that point, I wanted wine.  Immediately.  I felt a bit bad for the bartender because he seemed to be serving the entire bar area by himself while the rest of the staff was loitering around doing nothing.  Attempts to get help from three other service staff members were completely fruitless as we were just directed to get the bartender's attention.  This response may have been more understandable had the restaurant been super busy, but half the tables were empty.  Waiting for wine makes me grumpy. After we paid the bill, we decided we wanted to split one more glass of wine, which the bartender didn't charge us for.  Free wine!  Maybe he didn't want to deal with printing another bill and running another credit card, but whatever.  Free wine repaired many of my negative feelings about Mantra's sporadic service.
The food was excellant!  However, the employees all seemed too busy during other things to serve the few people in there.  Maybe, that is why there were only a few people.  The funny thing is that there were more employees than patrons!  They also left their iPhone ringer on and it would interupt the background music frequently, which for a resteraunt/bar is just ridicuouls.  These people know how to cook, but could really use thorough training on service and entertainment.  In the right hands, this place could rock!
My wife and my parents went here to celebrate her birthday last night and this place was terrible much to my surprise. When we walked in, there was no one there to greet us. The hostess was on the phone and ignored us for a good 4-5 minutes before another server (never did get her name) seated us. We were handed 3 menus for a party of four...weird. Regardless, we perused the menu and were ready with our order, only to be ignored for the next 15 minutes by the wait staff. I was getting irritated and finally flagged down a lady (not our server) to let her know we were ready. She told us that she'd let our server know that we were ready....10 minutes go by and nothing. I finally flag down a guy this time, and he gave me the same spiel. He went to the bar tender to ask what to do and the bar tender told him to grab a pen and take our order (wtf?) We ordered the Naan and dip, Kofta curry, penchmal (sp??) dal, spicy goan vegetable curry, while my wife ordered the Sea Bass. The food was simply terrible. The best dish of the nigh twas the dal, everything else was lightly or sparingly spiced. There was no flavor to speak of, and it seemed that the chef had completely forgotten to include any salt in any of the dishes. The fish was over done and had the fat oozing out of it. Btw, this was supposed to be a filet, my wife found well over 10 pieces of bones in the dish. The cauliflower puree was bland. No flavor, no salt. The goan vegetables were supposed to have a coconut base and supposed to be spicy. The coconut  base, if there was one, was watered down. There was no spice of any kind to be found and of course, there was no salt what-so-ever We of course asked for the salt, and to my surprise, no salt shaker, the server got us salt on a plate...with a spoon.... Towards the end of our meal, all of a sudden, every server started to come around the ask how our meal was. I was tempted to tell them the food was atrocious, but I did not. Hindsight, for the money we paid, and the quality of food we got, I should have spoken up. I will never go here again or recommend this place to anyone.
Review for lunch buffet takeout only... It used to be the best lunch deal in downtown Palo Alto: you go to the buffet and fill up a takeout box, and it was $6, plus $1 extra for naan. As long as you were smart with loading up your box, you could end up with a ridiculous amount of Indian food for only $7 total (no tax). They recently remodeled the restaurant and changed the buffet set-up, and along with it they raised the price of lunch. Sit-down buffet is now $10.95. Takeout lunch is $6.95 + $2 for naan, so close to $10 total with tax. That said, they did add a couple more items to the buffet (including some nice fresh green beans when I went today), and it's still almost enough food to feed two people for just under $10.... so even though I'm cheap, it's still a good deal for good food.
Time to finally give some love to my long-time favorite restaurant in Palo Alto!  There have been some changes in ownership lately and so the experience here has been fluctuating, although always in the good range.  My last visit was the best, and I am excited to see this restaurant picking up steam again.  Happy hour will suit just about any budget and taste, and dinner is even nicer if you can find a deal through one of these many new restaurant deal sites.  Definitely worth a visit if you have not been here before.
Went with friends for buffet lunch. Not a lot of options but that was not the real complaint. The dishes were too oily and they had no dry dish. Taste is also just OK, nothing great to write about. For the price, it could be much better. I saw very few people during the busy lunch time on a weekday. Pros are good attentive service though need to keep reminding about the Naan, deco, and cleanliness.  Parking is not hard to find as there is a underground free parking available nearby.
Nice atmosphere, but I was disappointed in the food. I had the lunch buffet. It just didn't taste like Indian food and that's what I was hoping for.
It's still pretty great.  A friend and I came here and hit up the: - Chana hummus, eggplant trio: It's a Naan and sauces that came with babaghanoush which was OK, hummus which was good, and some cream sauce in the middle that was pants wetting good.  Get it just for that. - Lamb lollipops on cinnamon sticks: I seem to recall these being super exotic and delicious once upon a time, but they were just "good." - Sea Bass! Their sea bass is famous now (and yes I'll take a little credit for popularizing it years ago on Yelp before it was cool though I am otherwise not a hipster).  It's blackened on the outside and (near?-)perfectly moist on the inside.  It's so rich you're almost better off splitting it with another person. - Chicken Tikka Masala: Call me a philistine, but this was probably too "authentic" for me.  I'm one of those people who thinks that British-style Indian Tikka Masala with insane amounts of sweetness and creaminess represents pretty much the pinnacle of fusion awesomeness, and this dish was not that - despite (?) being a modern Indian fusion restaurant.  It's more tomato-ey  and savory.  Skip it if you're with me. We also got some butter naan which tasted about like you'd expect (money!) and a pint of Kingfisher.  Service was excellent.
A friend and I were lured here by Mantra's happy hour specials - only to find out that such items... Read more 
Service here is really, really slow. The food was not bad but not good enough for me to go back. The ambiance looks great from the outside, but once you're inside, you're unlikely to be impressed. It's almost as if there's a sense of drag in the atmosphere. It's hard to pinpoint, but it's definitely there. Maybe it's because the crowd is definitely not trendy and the feel is definitely not energetic. Also, I was really annoyed that the bartender recommended a brandy to me without telling me that it's $30 a glass! The bartender before him (a woman) did not seem to know enough to make a recommendation of any kind. Hard to tell which is worse. I would agree with other reviewers that the staff here is very nice, but that's just not enough of a selling point.
We have not been to Mantra for the past couple of years and was quite impressed with the remodel of the restaurant.  It's much more open and inviting with a great bar.  The service was very friendly and it's the only place that wipes the table down between each course.  I been to India and their Naan is as good or better than what I ate in India.  I think the basic Naan was better than the Garlic Naan.  Lamb Bhuna curry was excellent, well cooked meat with a touch of heat.  Pitcher of Belgium beer was a terrific value at $16, and the pitcher was huge!  What we had was good as Ambar India, which says a lot for Mantra.
Perfect location, Nice Decor but BAD FOOD for ur Money. Being a vegetarian, tried there Vegetarian Entree's but they were Unseasoned and tasteless even after being asked to season. There Appetizers menu double take as there entree, so nothing new, just appetizers served in slightly larger portion as entree. Bad choice to have Indian Food.
The food was great. Amazing. I was a little bit concerned on the service as they kept me waiting for 20 minutes when I came in. But I will give them a little bit of a pass because it was Saturday night, the waiter got things back on track and he had some good meal and drink suggestions.
I like the happy hour - which happens *twice a day* ... twice... cheap drinks and appetizers twice a day?? Hook me up!  And this magical event happens in a chill, trendy atmosphere that makes me feel insta-cool.  Since it's right around the corner from work, I long ago decided that this should be the place at which I shall become a regular... I haven't made a good effort on that yet, but it's in the works. I've tried take out a couple times for lunches, and the food loses something in translation.  So definitely stick to dining/drinking in.  They have very tasty mixed drinks, and a Great wine list... they pay a lot of attention to the quality of their wine list.  Actually I get the feeling they pay a lot of attention to the quality of everything in their establishment.  Pick pretty much anything on the appetizer list... it's all yummy.
Last Tuesday night, I sat at the bar with an incredibly sexy stud for COCKtails. Before I forget, I must announce to all the ladies that there are hooks under the bar for your purses! Anyway, I had a Pomergrante Crush, a blend of Puerto Rican silver rum, pomegranate syrup and pineapple juice. My hot companion chose the Blue Lychee, which was served with a lychee fruit and tasted like rubbing alcohol. We ordered the non-vegetarian option of Mantra's Savories & Kebab Taste for two people - shrimp lollipops, lamb lollipops and chicken kebab. While all three items were flavorful and served in their own unique pool of sauce, none of them were particularly drool-worthy. Regardless, I was drooling because the guy sitting next to me looked so damn delicious. The lamb and shrimp lollipops (I've tried the shrimp ones before) were ground meat creations served on cinnamon sticks. To be honest, I could have forgone those meat sticks to l-l-lick that tantalizing man like a lollipop. The chicken kebab was slightly disappointing - it turned out to be sliced chicken sausage instead of unadulterated chicken meat I had hoped for. Great for dinner or drinks if you happen to be in the area, but not a place I'd drive far for.
No offense, but I try to avoid Indian food at all costs. I guess it's an acquired taste, and so far... Read more 
As I shared with Connie C. at the wonderful Yelp Elite event, I had picked up a gift certificate for Mantra several months back. After the blast Mae and I had with Yelp, I thought this weekend would be a perfect time to revisit the restaurant and finally use that certificate. On a lazy Sunday night and with the help of Opentable to snag reservations, we arrived shortly before their evening jazz band began to perform. We were seated along the same window seat we had when we had dined at Mantra once before and the atmosphere was definitely pleasant. Jazz music in the air, quiet conversations, and dim interior lighting highlighted by the waning sunlight from the windows.  All in all, I expected a wonderful meal.  Our selections: Hamachi char - cooked hamachi on a bed of potato and apple salad. The salad provided a nice tart flavor to contrast with the fish.  I did find the hamachi a tad overcooked. While the skin had a nice crunchy texture befitting char, the interior was dry and overdone. Day Boat Scallops - an amazing appetizer of 3 large scallops sauteed in an Indian curry sauce with peas. Absolutely spectacular flavor and the one hint of Indian origin in the food we sampled. Lamb Chops - like other Yelp reviewers, we thought the lamb chops were fantastic. Succulent and flavorful, this dish was a home run and a steal at its price. Kobe ribeye - I had eye'd the ribeye at the Yelp event and knew it was my entree. I ordered it medium rare and though it was slightly overdone, it was still tender and tasty.  Overall good, but definitely not spectacular or stand out. Incidentally, this is my 3rd disappointing experience with Kobe beef and a major reason why I'm hesitant to order it at my favorite restaurant, Alexander's. Perhaps I have barbaric taste buds, but I expect the difference between kobe beef and regular beef to be as pronouced as the difference between o-toro and regular tuna.  Especially given the price differential kobe beef usually commands. At the end of the meal, we perused the dessert selection but opted to go to Fraiche just next door. Now for the critical part of the review and the reason for 3.5 stars instead of 4 or 5 stars.  As hosts of our recent Yelp Elite event, I hope the owner and manager take the time to read a few of these reviews and perhaps find some insight into the feedback. 1) While there are many excellent menu selections, I notice that there is an overwhelming # of choices, whether it be the appetizers (10), the classic Indian cuisine (7), the main plates (9) or even the bread (6). It all reminds me of a criticism that Gordon Ramsey often states on "Kitchen Nightmares"...focus your menu. While choices are wonderful, know your strengths and pare down the excess. The availability of both classic Indian fare and Californian cuisine reveals a possible lack of direction and I was confused by what the true focus of this restaurant was. I personally found the Californian cuisine with a touch of Indian flavor to be Mantra's strongest dishes.  Its what I believe catapulted Mantra onto Michael Bauer's Top 100 restaurant list in 2007. 2) Work on the service and waiters. While the manager and owner are friendly, I agree with reviews that found dining room wait-staff too serious and not very friendly. Obviously, many people have been caught off guard by the fine print on the specials, but remember, the customer is always right. If you treat the customer poorly, they won't return and Yelpers (who talk a lot) won't recommend. I myself was off-put being suggested only the prix fixe menu with wine tasting (it felt a bit heavy handed) and the indifferent attitude I received when I ordered something else and when they messed up our drink order.  Our waiter also seemed disappointed by our not ordering dessert (and saying we were going to Fraiche) and my using a gift certificate.  Though I received a casual "thanks for dining with us" as we left, it didn't feel heartfelt given the unsmiling demeanor throughout the meal.  Of note, though I thanked our waiter for bringing our entrees, clearing our table, etc., he never acknowledged it.  A higher end place like Mantra deserves higher end service. 3) Though we were one of a few patrons at the earlier hour, I found the wait for appetizers and for entrees to be long.  The appetizers, in particular, took nearly half an hour, supposedly because of the hamachi char.  Start us with the naan or the prepared appetizer. I worry what would happen with a packed dining room. I wish Mantra well. They have a lovely dining space in downtown Palo Alto as well as some great entrees.  With a restaurant scene as competitive as the Bay Area, they definitely have the ingredients to succeed and with tantalizing specials, nightly Jazz, Opentable promotions and Yelp publicity, they clearly would like to.
Look, if you can't execute on a rainy Tuesday night when you are less than 1/3 full, get out of the restaurant business. Yes, yes, my shortribs were good, and you've spent a lot of money on the decor. But when you rather coldly shunt me to the bar and leave me sitting there 20 minutes, after insisting there is no reservation in the computer under my friend's name, even after I spelled it for you three times, you need to just shut it down.  My friend who made the reservation was already seated, but you insisted no such name was in the book.  I sat at your bar 20 minutes, wasn't offered a drink by the bartender, and tried to raise my friends on my cell.  When I finally snuck past the podium to check, there they were, waiting for me.  Come on now. Yes, yes, you want to present a clubby atmosphere with carefully selected music and moody lighting--but do you have to play the music at such an obnoxious level that most of your guests can't hear each other above it?  No matter what you think you are NOT A CLUB.  You are a RESTAURANT.  PEOPLE LIKE TO TALK TO THE PEOPLE THEY ARE DINING WITH.  THE THROBBING BASELINE DOES NOT MAKE FOR A MYSTIQUE, IT MAKES FOR A MISTAKE. Look, my shortribs were quite good and the Indian-influenced seasoning was a welcome and fresh approach--but I'll never be back.  Inattentive waitering, food served not quite hot, no check backs, a rather skimpy menu with not many interesting sides, oddly priced items, no checking in on drinks, borderline incompetent front-of-the-house management--these all left a bad taste in my mouth that no amount of tender and savoury shortrib can overcome. You get two stars for the food, but you lose stars for your complete lack of undersanding of what a restaurant should be and do for its guests.
I frequent Mantra about once a week if not more for their happy hour food and cocktails. They recently changed their happy hour from 1/2 to 1/3 off everything at the bar, which is a bit of a bummer, but completely understandable as the bar area is slammed every day of the week and continues to do so after the happy hour price change. Their Indian cuisine with Cali influence has never failed to satisfy me. A few of my faves include the Ginger Carrot soup, Chicken Tikka Masala, Rosemary Pesto Naan and the Seabass on curried lentils. Everything they serve is full of flavor, well cooked and light. The only times I leave here feeling nauseatingly stuffed is when my eyes are bigger than my stomach and I decide to order two desserts. Granted, my boyfriend helps with those, but after several appetizers and entrees, my actions here simply equal gluttony. My drink of choice: Lychee martini. Strong, refreshing and goes well with all the meals. I love the bartender John and the manager Torian. They are fun, friendly and make this place one of my favorite spots. See you this Sunday :)
Walt and I went here for lunch today. He wanted to try the food even though we were just here last night for the Elite Yelp event. So he scooped me up at work. On the ride to Mantra, I told Walt that it was one of my favorite places to have happy hour at. Everything was excellent as I had expected, foodwise. Walt ordered his braised lambchops while I opted for the Chicken Tikka and the garlic chili naan. Although, I have a tiff with our server. He was an older gentleman. Salt and pepper hair. Thick..Russian accent. Struggled with his English. Ugh..he was a dickhead. He wasn't accomodating, no sense of humor whatsoever, stuck up and snooty. Walt can definitely vouch for me. (*waiting on Walt's review*) Hmph, where's Heather when you need her?? (Heather's my most wanted server at Mantra) I don't think I'd want to sit in the main dining room next time. You can definitely find me sitting at the bar.
I love this place! Last night, my fiance and I were thinking of having dinner at Gordon Biersch,... Read more 
I went to Mantra on a Friday night during happy hour, which offers 1/3 off everything on the menu.  Overall, the food was pretty good, and with the 1/3 discount, prices were reasonable for a Palo Alto restaurant. I had the Mantra Bhuna Lamb with basmati rice (which you need to order separately).  The curry had just the right amount of spice, and the portions were quite generous.  I sampled the other dishes my friends ordered, and I enjoyed mine the most.  My friends and I shared two naans: garlic chili flake and spicy jack cheese.  Both were thinner than most naan I've had.  The spicy jack cheese naan tasted a bit like a quesadilla, but I enjoyed it.  The garlic chili naan was ok, but I wouldn't order it again.
Their menu is more California-Indian than Indian from India.  They put a modern twist on Indian dishes.  Very creative andthe potential to be very tasty. Let's start out with their naan bread.  They offer modern spins on the traditional flavors, such as a garlic chili flake, a wheat option, and a rosemary-pesto variety.  We ordered the rosemary-pesto parmesan and the plain.  The rosemary-pesto tasted more like flatbread with pesto on top.  I was not in the mood for pizza.  The plain naan was not much better, it had no fluff, it wasn't thick, and the bottom was soggy.  If you start with a bad foundation, you can't make a good appetizer by piling on unique toppings. I ordered the lamb chops as my main dish.  These were smothered with cloves and cardamom.  The sauce that was served underneath the chops was sweet and succulent and complimented the clove smeared lamb chops nicely.  The lamb chops did not have a good texture.  They were medium rare, but they were incredibly chewy.  I had to spend a lot of time cutting the fat out, it didn't peel apart easily. The "classic" dishes are generally better, the chicken tikka masala is creamy and was received well.  The mango lassi is $5 here.  Never have I seen this drink for $5.  It is thick, creamy, but tastes a little too bitter. After our plates were removed and after we pulled our smartphones out to see if my dogs could eat lamb bones, the waitress shoves the dessert menu out in front of us.  Wow lady, can't you see we want to leave now? Mantra is a great idea but executed poorly.
Mantra is pretty much what the bay area needs in terms of Indian food. A classy upscale joint, with a variety of drinks, and a bar that will draw a crowd. The only problem is these guys banked on Palo Alto.  You might have been better off I started out at the bar like I do in most place, and drank the Mantra. Not quite strong enough, so I moved on to one of the martinis, and a couple more after that. 4 Martini's later; I had a mild buzz that left me wanting a cigarette. At 10$ a pop you'd think they'd make the drinks a bit stronger. After my 4 drinks my appetizer came out. I got the cauliflower soup which is basically just a 12 dollar version of Daal, an fairly bland. I was thinking of calling my mom and telling her that she could sell her Daal to these guys. And they put a piece of potato in the middle to make it appear more awesome than it actually is. After the Daal, I decided to go with Kashmiri sea bass which came with mash potatoes, and I pretty much devoured that. I wish I hadn't ruined my appetite with the stupid soup and saved myself for the sea bass. For dessert there was some sort of very warm chocolate cake severed with strawberry ice cream. After getting out my magnifying glass to see the ice cream, I mixed it with my cake, and it was damn good. But this miniscule amount of ice cream threw off my cake to ice cream ratio making me feel like the guy in the damn milk commercial. GOT ICE CREAM? Finally, I went out and had my cigarette, but since they had no matches the hostess came outside with me and lit my cigarette with a flame thrower. Well, not exactly, but you get the idea. Overall, Mantra gets an A for decor and it definitely is hip. The food is definitely an experiment which I'm sure after several trials they'll be able to perfect. Lucky for me, I didn't spend a dime on this meal. The joys of corporate America
I've only been for happy hour so far - 30% off the entire menu.  Holllaaa. Met up with some friends for drinks and food and this was the perfect place to start a Tues. night.  It wasn't busy at all, which, I'm told, is unusual.  The waiter was really nice and remembered my friends from several months ago.  He also was cute when a few gentlemen paid for our first round (one of them had hit my car while he was parking.  But also we're hot.). The food we got:  chicken tika masala, garlic naan, regular naan, veggie samosas, and something else I can't seem to find on the menu but was good.  All of it was up to standard and well-priced even without the discount.  I'll be back and hope to up the stars upon repeated experiences.
Happy Hour Review * Delicious drinks * Good food (Don't expect anything authentic) * Nice Space * Good service * Ends at 6:30 and not 6 :)
We stumbled upon this restaurant looking for some booze at Gordon Biersch. The huge happy hour sign in front caught our attention (exactly what we were looking for on this Sunday evening) and we moozied on in. Lucky for us, it's not only happy hour, it's 50% off all drinks AND food w/seating anywhere Sunday and Monday. We plopped down immediately and ordered snacks and the ushhh. I was so impressed, I brought my parents the following day to join in on the amazing steal! Oh, and the ambiance, trendy date place. Very dim lighting, my kind of place ;) Recommendations: Naan (the last one on the list with the dip) Tofu spicy entree (not the real name but the waiter will know what you mean) Do not recommend: Scallops appetizer
July 26, 2009 - Palo Alto Bar Crawl details (on Twitter under #pabcrawl) Stop 7 - http://twitpic.com/bs9wv - Mantra (Sidecar) Stop 7 on the amzingly awesome Palo Alto bar crawl was the eclectic Indian restaurant Mantra.  Now this is definitely a place I'd bring a date too - very intimate, quiet and cozy - dim lighting, nice decor and beautful ambiance - very tastefull decorated. Perfect for four drunk guys on a bar crawl! LOL - I think we got the same kind of hate filled/nervous looks that a biker gang would get if they rolled into an IHOP during senior hour Sunday dinner (with 50% discount with proof of age).  But the bartender was really cool and freindly as he took our orders.  I had a Sidecar, Kevin and Mike had Rob Roys and Dennis stuck with water (smart guy!!). My drink was really good (wasn't crazy about the sugar rim on the glass but I guess that's how a sidecar is made!!!) Finally, we ordered some food - appetizers but still, some solid nourishment at last.  We ordered something called a Naanizza - yes, it is pizza on a Naan - it was quite good.  And then, we ordered some lamb lollipops which were just out of the world fantastic.  Well, at that time, spam would have probably tasted like caviar but I still think the lamb lollipops were quite incredible - would highly recommend them if you go there. We lost Dennis after Mantra - he decided to call it a night - was nice hanging out in your neighborhood! ~ 4 stars overall - umm, must go back for the food.  Damn, I have all these places to go to now, must start search for pretty Yelper friend to review with :) # 120
-----------Happy Hour Review only---------- The ENTIRE menu is 50% off. It doesn't get better than that. However, I will say that, based on the regular prices, there's no way I'd ever go in for regular dining because the portions are NOT worth the prices. The drinks are decent, the food is good. I especially love the scallops because it sits on a bed of cauliflower puree. Sounds gross but surprisingly SO freakin' good. I think I'd come back for that appetizer alone. If you come here, just order the appetizers because the entree portions are pretty much the same size as the appetizers, for double the price. Mantra, your happy hour is great but if you want to be a 4 instead of a 3, make your prices more comparable to the portions.
The sweet potato and swiss chard side dish is super delicious. I could eat their naan all day THANK YOU FOR HAVING LOTS OF MOCKTAILS! I LOVED my rosewater mojito :-D the server was very helpful and friendly.. need to come back to try the entrees
First Impressions: Out of the university strip in Palo Alto and hard to find parking on the street.  You can park in the garages or parking lots, but it is slightly far from the restaurant. Decor: I walked into the restaurant and it is really nice, there is a bar on the right and dining room in the left.  You can also throw private parties in the backroom.   In general, it is a nice restaurant--perfect for dates because it is really dim and quite, basically easy to hide flaws and great place for conversations.  Some of the tables are quite close and small though, so if you're on a private date, try to get a table that is not dead smack to the next. Service: Excellent, proper, and very delicate.  What do I mean?  I basically think the service is consistent in seeing if you're ok.  Make sure to come by when you're not chewing or talking.  They also open the bottle of wine very gently and seems effortless.  Service = 5 stas! Taste:  Most of the items are quite divine. It is fine dining at its almost best.  The food is actually has flavors and you don't have to add salt.  A lot of fine dining food are too refine that it lack salt.  This place does not have that problem of savory flavors.  It is not heavy though--a lot of the food is actually refreshing. Specialty:  Their Happy Hour!!!   50% off fine dining food and dainty alcohol?! Score!!! Also party room in the back is good for a get together or a party.  Fine dining = impressive date?  I don't know. Price: $35/person Recommendations: Large Day Boat Scallops.  It is barely seared and on the raw side, so please order if you like your scallops lighlty flavored and with a bounce (non-chewy).  I also recommend trying the kebab specialties,naanizza, just Indian bread, but it is light and definitely compliments your entrees. Sea Bass, Tofu and Duck are all titillating.  The classic dishes like Chicken Masala and Lamb delivers (but basically you can get that at any good Indian restaurants).  Most of all, I recommend going here happy hour to test your taste buds on this fairly pricey place.
Excellent dishes.  Wine selection stands out. Lamb chops with the greens were a hit.  Sea Bass with asparagus and mini potatoes were the group favorite.  I loved the scallops which were the size of hockey pucks.  Where do those come from? Pricey for the amount of food provided.  Wines are $10+ per glass.  But this is downtown Palo Alto.  Show your American spirit and increase your debt.
We came here for Palo Alto's Dine Downtown event, so we chose from the pre-fixe menu.  Generally, the food didn't really feel like it had an Indian inspiration, so don't be fooled into expecting Indian food. The salad was absolutely decadent (better than the smoked cheese and potato soup option), with candied macadamia nuts, asian pears, and baby mozzeralla!  The cumin and pomegranate shortribs were very tender, while the winter vegetable casserole was just okay.  The rose and cardamom chocolate lava cake is one of those plates that just makes you stop and close your eyes for a moment... then open your eyes and just say "Wow."  I wasn't a big fan of the lavender saffron creme brulee.  (See uploaded pictures of each plate.) The ambiance of the restaurant is that of a typical nice restaurant:  clean, dim lighting, and light music.  Overall, Mantra was a very pleasant experience with good food, a bottle of wine, and good company!
This is a great place for a date but don't expect it to feel or taste like traditional Indian. It's a bit like a fancy Silicon Valley Indian fusion restaurant. Mantra is to Indian as P.F. Chang's is to Chinese. Nevertheless, it was still a great place for a date with my girl, Liz P. The service was off to a clumsy start, as I had to interrupt the host in the middle of an idle conversation to get a table. However, after we were seated, the atmosphere and service was impeccable. Our server made a few drink recommendations which both went very well with the meal. I was disappointed that the menu didn't have many vegetarian dishes to choose from. We ordered the Mint and Paneer Koftas and the Paneer Ravioli. Both were good, but nothing to write home about (or much of a review on). I will say that the appetizer we ordered, the vegetarian savories and kebab taste, was really tasty; a fantastic sampling of Indian flavors. And the desert, the dark chocolate cheesecake, was surprisingly good. Not too sweet with a full mouth of flavor! We also ordered both the plain and the pesto/parmesan naan baskets. The plain seemed to get stale entirely too quickly and the pesto, as tasty as it was, didn't really pair very well with the main dish items. The food was a mixed bag but the drinks, appetizer and atmosphere will bring me back at least one more time.
Over here on the Stanford campus, we've been relentlessly assaulted with advertisements and coupons for Mantra in the last couple of months.  Chalk it up to the lackluster flyer design, perhaps, but I didn't really give it more than a passing glance until I read a rave review for the place in a recent issue of the AAA members' magazine that made it seem imperative that I go try it out. Upon entering Mantra, the interior of the dining space is clean and swank without being pretentious or snobby--overall it has a modern, elegant feel.  We went on a Monday evening around 8PM, but business appeared pretty brisk.  Service was quick--perhaps an improvement made based on prior reviews here--but still, as others have mentioned, unattentive (my water glass remained unfilled the entire evening...which is pretty unfortunate, considering that this is an establishment that boasts bold and spicy flavors). My dining companion felt that our waiter was too pushy...indeed, he pretty much forced us to order an additional side of naan, rattling off the choice of flavors no less than three times.  Admittedly, I was leaning toward getting it anyway, but if I hadn't been, this would have been grating.  He also did not inform us of any specials, although I did hear him relate them to the table next to us (I suspect because they had been more liberal with their wine order). Nevertheless, despite some service flaws, the food was excellent.  The menu options are all quite intriguing and the descriptions certainly pique one's tastebuds (halibut with chocolate sauce!).  The fare is better described as Indian-influenced rather than Indian proper, so if you're craving traditional Indian food, this isn't your spot, but it is a decent attempt at fusion. We started off with the paneer cuboid, which was quite good.  The dish, however, was accompanied by a shot of chai that had been infused with some sort of vegetably flavor--not so good.  For starters, the dish was billed as a share plate, but until someone comes up with a more clever way to share a shot of something, it's pretty difficult for more than one person to partake of that portion of the dish.  And then there is the fact that some flavors are just not meant to go together, as funky and exotic as the combination sounds.  Vegetables and chai, I have decided, are one of those unfortunate pairings. For entrees, my dining companion couldn't resist that prosciutto-wrapped halibut with the chocolate sauce (I had a bite--it was excellent).  I had the cranberry and madeira braised lamb shank, which was served on a bed of wilted creamed greens.  I can't say enough about the lamb meat--so tender it fell off the bone, no joke.  The portion size was also satisfactory, unlike similarly priced establishments, which will leave your stomach about as empty as your wallet.  The flavor was intense--maybe a touch overly so, and I felt that the cream sauce with the spinach did not meld perfectly with the onion and cranberry flavors of the lamb sauce, but overall I was sufficiently impressed with the quality of the food.  (We did, also, by the way, have the onion, garlic and paneer stuffed naan--ordered under duress, as you will recall--which was very tasty.) I would definitely try this place again, although it does run a tad pricey.  The owners are very friendly and seem very excited about drawing more of the college crowd.  From what I gather, the menu is constantly being developed, and I would be curious to see where this place can go.
My parents come here like its their job. And apparently theres a creepy single guy who does too, because they come in for the amazing 50% happy hour almost everyday and wave an awkward hello to each other. That's 50% off your ENTIRE bill from 4:30-6:30 drinks, food, entrees, and all! This. Is. A. MAZINGGG I think I let loose a little too much when ordering, but that just means more for later! What I thought could be better was the naan (boo on burnt naan). What I thought was great was the Flying Horse beer (mmm foreign beer tastes so clean and crisp!), the rack of lamb, and the filet. Plus, who can argue with Mantra when it is so conveniently located next to Fraiche. Froyo for dessert anyone?
It's funny how much I yelp to find the right Indian restaurant to hang out with desi friends and end up being disappointed :) The restaurants with higher ratings end up being either bland or far from authentic. What I like about Mantra being an Indian foodie is: - They have very contemporary authentic Indian food coupled with Italian flavors.  Delectable!Like the food you may find in the metros back home -Their vegetarian options are as extensive as their non veg options.I love love their paneer ravioli and dream of having it everytime I miss lounging in Bangalore. They also have a yummy biryani and very interesting dessert and cocktail options _Their bar is well stocked What I don't like about Mantra which prevents me from giving them a 5 star is thier price. They are way more expensive then other Indian restaurants in the bay area.. Will howver keep going back to stare at those beautiful Hussain sab paintings and yum yum fusion food!
I rarely find myself in snazzy places like Mantra, but my boyfriend wanted to check it out and decided to take me there for dinner one night. I didn't know what to expect. I'm glad I didn't go in expecting Indian food, because while the spices were definitely pulled from Indian cuisine, the menu choices were a mix of creative contemporary grub. Mantra is very, howdoyousay, PaloAltoish. It definitely has an air of pretension to it that some might enjoy and others despise. The host almost had a "I'm better than you" attitude that made me want to crawl down into my seat and melt away into the fine-dining flooring. But -- the food was interesting and almost worth the gourmet fees. My butternut squash soup was unfortunately bland, but my main dish - which I think was some kind of fish - was delicious. Somehow the spices in the meal were constantly ignited by each sip of the tangy pinot noir I ordered so my mouth was constantly on fire. Nevertheless, I enjoyed the meal. And my boyfriend seemed thrilled with his dish that had a bunch of different meats. Would I go back? If someone else invited me. But I'd probably avoid the place until, perhaps, I transform into a pretentious Palo-Alto type. Then I'll be there every night. The color scheme with its purples and rich gold /brown tones certainly is a plus in my eye.
3.5 stars rounded up. Food is good, if not too sweet (every 1 of their courses).  If not for the $25 prix fixe menu on Mondays (and Sundays) of this month, I do not think I would eat at Mantra.  The prices are high, and the portions are small.  The service leaves a bit to be desired (slow).  However, I have to give props for them hosting the Yelp Elite event, and for the pretty good food. I recommend the carrot soup (unless you are highly sensitive to coconut), and any entree that comes with mushroom risotto.
Nouveau Indian fusion?  Not sure what is Indian about salmon sashimi with cream cheese on a crostini but as long as it is good it's all good.  I especially enjoyed the beef short ribs.  The lamb kebabs were good, although weren't served piping hot.  My chocolate mousse in the mandarin orange sauce was interesting - I'd try something else next time. Service was fast and attentive.
Michael the Bartender is AWESOME!!  They can run a full bar and restaurant with just 2 bartenders and have great service. I was here on a Tuesday and had so much fun.  The owners Ashwani and his wife ( I think?) are very service oriented.  The food was fabulous- we had some type of lamb dish and they have great wines by the glass. I never was a big Palo Alto fan, however, this place is worth taking a look at :)
30 min from when we sat down until a waiter came to our table. Calamari was horrible. The rest was reasonably good but overpriced.
Mantra is supposed to be Indian fusion, but I don't know what is remotely Indian about Mantra, other than the fact that they sell naan.  Which is a ripoff, btw, because you pay around $4 for each round of naan (each serving gets you about 4 slices - a buck a slice! pricey!). Don't get me wrong.  I liked the food (for the most part).  The service was fantastic.  But the prices are much more than I think they should be.  I had the halibut and my friend had the lamb.  My halibut was pretty good - the flavors were more intense than I would have liked, but it was still not bad.  However, the lamb was a real let down.  It wasn't particularly tender, and the sauce drowned out whatever lamb taste there should have been. Like I said, I thought Mantra was good... enough.  They've clearly tried really hard to make this a nice upscale restaurant.  And I must say that the service was some of the best I've ever had.  But for the price... and the quality of food... I'm not sure I'm going to come back again. EDIT 4/26/07  I came here last night with a school group, so I didn't have to pay.  Normally, that would have made me less picky, but Mantra disappointed yet again.  I don't know what it is about this place - the atmosphere is great, and service is fantastic, but the food leaves something to be desired.  This time, I went with the Anari steak, which was smothered in so much sauce that I might as well have had microwave salsbury steak.  I know this is Indian fusion and all, and that Indian food is all about the spices, but geez.  There's a reason why normal Indian food sticks with the basics of chunks of lamb or chicken, rather than ruining an otherwise good steak (or fish, or lamb shank, or whatever you are having).  I dunno... maybe I'm coming from a wacko perspective, but these meats have flavors of their own that should be enhanced, not overwhelmed.
This was a surprisingly bad experience. We ordered drinks, apps, entrees from teh beginning and didn't see our waiter for 30 minutes ... no drinks to be found. When he finally came over to tell us the kitchen was running late, we told him we didn't get our drinks ... which should have been obvious with near empty water on the table.  . An hour after, we finally got most of our meal, and found out one of our apps (lamp lollipops) were no longer available. So we ordered the channa chat poppers. The food was incredibly poor quality. We ordered the most expensive entree (sea bass) at the advice of the waiter. The portion was tiny, and it was bland an rubbery. Also, they gave us chicken curry instead of tikka masala. We only realized that when we got the bill ... we just assumed it was a bad tikka masala (consistent with the rest of our experience). We got the chaat, which were lacking flavor; hard to believe they would create chaat without tamarind chuney. And, the garlic naan was cold, burned ... probably the worst I have ever had. The one good app was the crispy greens, everything else a disappointment. Also, when we got the bill, they charged us for the lamb pops that never came. I'm not sure what more could go wrong, and it puzzles me how they can still be in business in Palo Alto at those prices! There are so many other better options.  We will not go again.
The evening started off very nicely with a mango lassi for me and a rosewater mojito for Kyle. The channa hummus appetizer we ordered was  full of flavor, a nice blend of garlic and spices, with red peppers on top. I started my meal with the carrot ginger soup, which tasted to me like yellow curry - delicious, but I could only handle a few spoonfuls but Kyle loved it. We thought we had found a new fine dining place for those special date occasions until our main entrees came. I got the Pan Roasted Sablefish, which tomato basil biryani, spinach, and red curry sauce. It was decent; their website claims California cuisine with Indian influences but my two dishes had more of a Thai influence. Kyle ordered a lamb dish that was 'slow braised' (which isn't on their menu online) but on paper it sounded good. When his dish arrived, we said to each other "do you remember it saying anything about noodles on the menu?" He proceeded to eat it. The lamb was dry - think dog food. It didn't really have a sauce, more like the juice of the meat with spices. The dish was topped with a diced tomatoes, cucumbers, and fresh cilantro. It had shaved paneer on top - like cojita. It was a cluster of bad tastes on a plate. I just looked on their website at their dinner menu and see what arrived last night. The Braised Lamb Fettuccine. That is something Kyle wouldn't even consider ordering. We ended the night with the chai creme brulee with blackberries. It was a good way to end our meal. I really wanted to like this place. The decor is great, the service was impeccable (other than the dish mix up), but unfortunately, we won't be back. Oh, the other thing I didn't appreciate was that the staff started rearranging the tables around while we were eating.
Ok, I've decided to weigh in on some grave concerns I've got about this place as of yesterday. I work a couple of blocks away from Mantra. I've eaten there several times, going back to the week they opened. In the past I've had great, innovative food and super-professional service, but had such a bizarre experience yesterday that, given the wide range of dining options in town, I doubt i'll be returning any time soon. Here's what happened. My girlfriend had made note of the sign on the bar that stated "$2 draft, ALL DAY, ALL MONTH' . Being as the lunch item would likely run $10 - $15, the idea of a $2 beer was appealing and we decided to take a long lunch at Mantra to break up the Friday. There appeared to be one waiter on hand, and he led us to a table by the window. Both my girlfriend and I noticed there was dried food scum on the tablecloth---not what I was accustomed to at Mantra. We ordered our lunch, and draft beer. I thought to ask the waiter, "The $2 beer special, I assume that applies to the dining area as well, doesn't it?" The waiter then stated, "Oh, no, that is only during the dinner hour." My girlfriend and I looked at each other for a second, eyebrows contorting in bewilderment. "The sign says, 'All day,'" she pointed out. "Oh, that is a mistake," the waiter said. "I pointed it out to them, I don't know why they haven't changed it yet." "But it has said that since last week," my girlfriend added. The waiter just reiterated that it was "a mistake" and that he had told "them" to change it. My girlfriend and I looked at each other, pondering next steps. It's not that we are cheap--there was a fundamental customer service tenet in question here. You advertise a price, mistake or not, and you are obliged to meet that price. We gave our waiter ample opportunities (we asked for the manager, he informed us that she wasn't on the premises but it wouldn't change matters) and he never backed down, even as my girlfriend and I rose to our feet and suggested we were off to a different location to eat. We also noticed that the menu has recently changed, seemingly to have less of an emphasis on small plate/appetizers but I can't state that for sure. And since we left, I can't vouch for what the food now tastes like. I know they fell off the Chronicle 2008 list...does anyone know if the chef/kitchen staff has changed?  The "front of house" staff sure has fallen off their game, if this lunch was any indication.
A couple disclaimers: this is not exactly typical Indian fare, it's much more contemporary than what you are likely to find at many of our favorite hole in the wall places. The prices definitely reflect both that fact and Mantra's Palo Alto zip code. There are so many things on Mantra's menu that I'd really like to try, sadly, my date was less adventurous. As we discussed our appetizer options I favored the beet salad or veggie samosas, he ordered the lamb lollipops...oooookay. It turns out that the lamb lollipops are actually pretty good. I ended up ordering the pomegranate and cumin short ribs. They were awesome. Very well seasoned, appropriately spicy and simply delicious. He ordered the biryani which was very good, but my dish was definitely better. For dessert we shared the chai creme brulee which was a really nice finish to our meal. Our waiter was incredibly nice and appropriately attentive throughout our meal. He guided me toward the Mantra cocktail at the beginning of the meal and I loved it! I wouldn't have combined brandy and St. Germaine on my own, but it worked. I am very much looking forward to my next meal at Mantra.
My husband and I found Mantra over the summer. Normally, when we go to eat we have our 3 yr old along- but we were out alone on a date in over a year and discovered Mantra. What a gem! We decided to check out the Happy Hour Specials. We were amazed at the food and the service (Happy Hour prices 1/2 off!)! We decided to sit at the bar (great for date night since we always have to sit at a kid/stroller friendly table). Immediately the bar manager, Torian greeted us and recommended some great things to try on the menu. We started with the Spinach Salad and Scallops (my fave!). Both were fab! We then moved on to our entree which consisted of the Tandoori Sea Bass & the Madras Shrimp- both equally delicious! The Sea Bass was tender and the Shrimp was full of flavor with a little kick. (If you order the Shrimp you have to order the Naan to soak up all the yummy sauce.) We have since been back at least 4 times over the last few months and the service and food are ALWAYS excellent! We have ordered several different items on the menu throughout our visits: Chicken Tikka, Hamachi and Lamp Lollipops- all wonderful! Drinks that need to be mentioned: We have tried several beverages/cocktails during our visits. All below were recommended by staff and loved them all enough to mention(except the Absinthe....just cant quite acquire the taste)! For a special occasion or Champagne Connoisseur: * Heidsieck & Co. Monopole Blue Top- THE BEST Champagne I have found! Really! And 1/2 off during happy hour!!! yay!! Wine: * White: Tandem Chardonnay Coffee/After Dinner: *The MOXII (pronounced Mox-i, not a crazy drink with Roman characters: The Mo-12!! Really, I thought that!) whatever its called it is yummy!!! ABSOLUTE MUST: THE CRAZY WHITE LADY!!! (only Torian, the Bar Manger knows how to make this. If you like coffee/after dinner drinks ask for this!!! He will LOVE you for it.....I think it is his fav drink too ;)) I have to tell you Torian really has made our visits at Mantra great! He is always willing to explain the menu, various cocktails and educate us on the wine list. He is also a great resource for many places in the area..........like where to get you hair cut! Serious!! Just ask him about a great place that cuts hair- he will be happy to share his spot - I'm sure......:)
I owe Mantra Lounge for motivating me to become a Yelp member and write a review for the first time ever! I feel so strongly about my experience here that I am left with no choice but to air it here. I have to say by far, hands down Mantra is the worst experience of my LIFE! I am quite savvy when it comes to restaurants all over the bay and beyond, and quite tolerant, if you will, of the service, ambience and food, generally. However, I am amazed at how rude, inconsiderate and inconsistent the restaurant staff, service and food can be at a restaurant. I will admit that I did patronize this restaurant when it first opened and quite enjoyed the cocktails and food, and hence considered it a great place to bring a bunch of my girlfriends to share my experience. Alas, I left not only my friends appalled but also myself. Here's some facts for you, to support my case: 1. The so-called manager/bartender at the restaurant, let us know as soon as we got to the restaurant, we only had our table for 1.5 hr and better make the best of it. 2. 1.5 hr later, quite promptly, while all of us were still in the middle of our wine/cocktails and appetizers, we had a group of waiters around us, ready to shoo us out, so they could re-arrange the table for a larger group. 3. When we complained, suddenly they were able to come up with alternatives (why they didn't consider them before, is beyond me) 4. The waiter serving us forgot our order and when asked about it, quipped "do you, really, still want it?". NO KIDDING!! 5. Water server dropped water all over the table and didn't even blink, much less apologize. 6. Our orders for wines were delayed by a good 30 minutes. Beyond all this, I will say that given the economy these days, you would think that paying, respectable, well educated customers would be treated with some dignity and warmth, if not for anything else, but for the money (we spent ~$300) during the evening! Whatever happened to the concept of repeat business. I can safely say that not only will I never return to this place, but will ensure that all my (rather large) circle of friends are warned about it.
The 50% off happy hour is no secret here, and why we chose a Thursday dinner at Mantra.  It's 4:30-6:30pm every day and includes everything -- drinks, wine, appetizers, entrees (though it seems they have some prix fixe menus that are only avaialble after 6:30pm).  I hear they'll even let you have their top bottles at the discount. My friends said "it's usually not this crowded" but apparently the happy hour only applies to the lounge area, and not their dining room, so there were hungry groups that were gunning for open tables.  We had to defend our late fifth's chair. The five of us shared four appetizers, three entrees, two orders of naan, and were STUFFED. Appetizers included chicken tikka (six pieces, good), pepper flank steak with vegetables (ok, meat a little tough), bayboat scallops (good), and lamb lollipops (like lamb meatballs wrapped on cinnamon sticks).  The garlic chili flake naan was thick and doughy, and the other naan (or rothi?) we had with this fantastic coconut-chili-peanut (I think) Entrees were a great seafood risotto, the organic mint and paneer cheese balls, and a half chicken that I didn't get to because I was so full.  Add rice and raita. All this for $88 minus tip (and we left about 25%).  But all ordered before 6:30pm. *The four stars only applies to Happy Hour.  As others have mentioned, not sure if I'd come back full price.  I didn't love it enough for double the cost.
Not a good experience at all.  This was my first and last time to Mantra.  I can see this restaurant being good for a drink as the bar is huge, but I came for lunch. The service was SLOW and generally poor.  Our server was nice, but the manager and owner were not knowledgeable nor friendly. In fact, we got into a 5 min debate over whether we could use our Groupon for lunch or not. Naan took 20 mins.  The food was flavorless and barely warm. I won't be back.
Naan + Pizza = heaven on earth. If anything, visit Mantra during happy hour for their half-priced appetizers and try each of everything.  The waiter wouldn't allow us to sit in the main dining area but with it being half-priced, we didn't really mind.
It was some Friday, and I just didn't want to stay home. So I ping a friend on chat and we're off to try a new dinner place. I get the gentle reminder that "Ugh it's far from where we live." But I just wanna go, and he caves. Besides it's on the Passport Bogo list! Hurrah!. I had the seabass, and it was yummilicious. I actually forgot what my friend had. Man, must not have been that good. But as usual the naan was good and for BOGO prices, it's a win.
I felt like celebrating on Friday night so I sent out a last minute invite to a few of my closest buddies "Tonight: Happy Hour, Mantra 50% entire menu, be there". About 8 of my buddies showed up and we feasted on Mantra's expansive menu of drinks, appetizers and main entrees. I ordered (yes, all for me): DRINKS: 1 Blue Lychee Martini (BEST ONE, I love lychee!! I shall keep coming back for this drink alone) 1 Temptress Martini (with a name like that, who could resist?) 1 Savona Cocktail (bc I was already tipsy and felt like it) APPETIZERS: Large Day Boat Scallops (Szechuan Pink Peppercorn & Fennel Marinated Scallops, Caviar, Lobster Nage) I love Szechuan Peppercorn and I love Scallops. Perfect combo. Scallops were cooked perfectly, not overdone at all. Possibly my favorite dish of the night. Hamachi CHAR (Mini Steak of Hamachi marinated in Pink and Red Pepper Flakes, Chutney of Peanuts and Pears, Fuji Apple Salad) For some reason I was picturing something like a hamachi carpaccio but I was sadly mistaken. I felt like the Hamachi was a little overcooked and I wasn't a huge fan of the pears and fuji apple salad. Blah. ENTREE: Tandoori Sea Bass (marinated Sea Bass, Cumin & Scallions spiced Potato Puree, Asparagus, Baby Carrots) The sea bass was really quite good but I'm not sure how memorable it was. I remember liking it, but by then the alcohol had fogged up my memory a bit. Grr, I bet *serious* yelpers don't drink and review. So all this came out to be around $50. Which is fine with me, because I felt like eating. lots. and lots. so there.
I came here with Jeremy G. after getting two Groupons.  (I just can't say no to great deals on Indian food)  When we first walked in, my impression wasn't entirely positive.  While the decor is gorgeous, the host was so involved in speaking with a couple of people trying to understand the (apparently) complex world of Groupons that he didn't even offer to seat us.  So that was not so great, and I was worried it was going to be a not so great kind of night. Once we finally had a table, our server offered us cocktails.  I got the Temptress and Jeremy got the Pomegranate Crush.  Both were delicious and beautiful.  We had the Vegetarian Savories and Kebab Taste to start which was DELICIOUS.  Every item in it was unique and flavorful and a delight on the palate. For our mains, I had the Paneer Ravioli and he had the Organic Mint and Paneer Koftas - both were tasty and had great combinations of flavors, though I found myself more drawn to the more traditional flavors of the Koftas.  With them, we had the Rosemary-Pesto and Parmesan and Plain Naan breads.  The Naan were all delicious - warm, pillowy, and soft.  While the rosemary-pesto and parmesan naan was delicious, it didn't really pair well with our more Indian entrees.  The whole place seems to have an Indian-Italian fusion thing going that I'm still kind of torn about. For dessert we had the dark chocolate cheesecake gelato with the suggested wine pairing (I believe it was a port).  It was great, not too sweet and plenty rich. Overall, it was a great meal.  However, the Indian-Italian fusion thing is still throwing me off and I can't give it a full 5 stars.  I know I'll be back at least once more (thank you, Groupon!) so I'll re-evaluate then.
Mantra is a breath of fresh air.  In the same space that used to be Higashi West on Emerson Ave., the decor has rich wood, low lights and tables in the bar, and the dining room boasts a fountain and long draping curtains that separate the various areas of the restaurant. The food is great - choice of appetizers ranges from salads to curries and nan while the main courses consist of various fish dishes, curried chicken with jalapenos, paneer/veg type stew, mixed grill, etc.  The portions are average and prices range from $18-$25. I recommend a try of Mantra at least once.  While the ambiance and food are great, I think their wine list (especially by the glass) could be upgraded a bit.
This was my first time eating at an Indian Restaurant and I was impressed. Everything tasted so good and we had wonderful service. Panroasted sablefish, Traditional chicken tikka masala, eggplant and potatoes, basmati rice and naan completed my meal for two. I thought I ordered way too much, but luckily the food was just enough and my boyfriend did most of the work. The eggplant and potatoes were super tasty and had a spicy kick to it. The chicken tikka masala was on the sweet side, and goes great with naan because you can dip the naan in the sauce. The sablefish was meaty and perfectly cooked.
I've ordered a few lunch dishes through Waiter dot com and had them delivered. I like the full flavor of the Saag Paneer but when I ordered the Lunch Box the Saag Paneer came on top of the rice already [see pic]. I personally like to mix my foods myself. I've seen other restaurants put that side dipping sauce in a small additional container and put the Saag in the smaller side compartment in the take out container. Also, would have liked to see more paneer. I only had 3 chunks. When ordering take out: - presentation is meh - flavor is tasty! - not enough paneer for 2 meals - lunch bread is free so get that instead of the $2 M3. plain naan (it's the same thing)
I came here for Dine Downtown and had a good experience!  I reserved weeks in advance on http://opentable.com , and when I adjusted the number in my party on the day of my reservation, I had no problems.  There seemed to be a lot of availability.  Maybe because it was a Monday night, but I heard that Palo Alto's Dine Downtown brings a lot of diners out, so I thought it would be more crowded. I was greeted by a nicely dressed gal and was seated right away.  The profile on opentable suggests business casual and is considered "fine dining", so I thought you had to dress up a bit.  But for Palo Alto, I guess jeans would be considered business casual.  The entire restaurant had a nice ambience with soft lighting and warm-colored walls.  When you first walk in, you'll see the long bar and a wall separates the bar with the main dining room, which is nice.  I can't imagine eating here with the bar packed with people.  This particular night was not crowded at all.  The tables are spaced out nicely so you don't feel like your conversations are being overheard.  They also take care to seat you at least one table away from the next patron, if seating is widely available. In addition to their regular menu, they had a prix-fixe menu that included items from their regular menu but at a set price (duh!).  They also have an extensive wine list with wines from all over the world!  Their specialty drinks had exotic ingredients such as ginger and kaffir leaves, The food was also made from exotic ingredients such as mango, mint, lemongrass or saffron, so it seemed to me more of a southeast Asian flair than purely Indian.  The food is exotic, so if you're not used to Asian fusion or not adventurous, you may be disappointed. The portions were small but the presentation was great!  Exactly like the pictures on the website!  If you order the onion soup, you'll get a bowl with a white asparagus and what they call tomato custard, and the waitress will pour the soup out of a small teapot!  That was cool! We each had the ginger creme brulee for dessert which was pretty good.  The ginger flavor did not overpower as I was expecting it might, but the hazelnut/caramel cookie that accompanied it wasn't as sweet as I wanted it to be. There is a semi-private room in the back past the bar, which could be made private by letting down the curtain.  There are 2  restrooms both of which are single stalls, so you'll have to wait you're turn. Staff was friendly and service didn't seem so bad.  Our water glasses were filled, and the food came out in good time.  We weren't waiting too long in between each serving as other reviewers had mentioned.  However, we didn't get the basket of bread that others raved about.  I was kind of looking forward to the chutney...  But all in all, it was a great experience!  I would definitely go back!
Mantra has a very good happy hour.  The appetizers are all half off and the drinks are at a good price too. There is a very good wine selection and the bartenders know their wines, so you can trust their recommendations for the tastes you want to taste. On certain days, there's live music that plays and that's always nice. High ceilings (always a plus) very romantic/sexy appeal to this place.  Dim lights and a candle at every table.  Sexy and intimate.  In that sense, I'd only come here for a certain occasion to actually dress up for.  Not very casual...more business casual.
I don't know about being the best .. but its worth the experience.. as people say its an Indian Fusion place.. The restaurant has its share of chicken tandoori and naan.. The entrees definitely of an Indian twist. I got the lamb shank with curry.. it came in curry.. so it was lamb shake and curry.. The dessert was so so.. I would suggest this place for people that want something different. This place is definitely on the expensive end of dining. For our 6 people dinner, the total came to about $300.. we ordered a bottle of wine.. it came from Argentina.. Spicy wine is good with spicy food. Alas.. a lot of true Indian Connoisseur's would not like coming here because I'm sure they aren't  used to paying exuberant prices!
Steve L., who is my guitar instructor, has just bashed my favorite restaurant, so I have decided to chime in. I cannot speak to any of the dishes he ate, but I can say that I have always found Mantra's food to be delicious. Their food is Indian but different. I am vegetarian so I get dishes such as the Organic Peas Bhurjee (yes, that's right, organic). Some of their dishes are a little more traditional and some are a little more unique. If you want some Indian food like your mama used to make it back in Rishikesh or Dehli (both places I've been) then this isn't your place, but if you want a fresh and healthy alternative to Indian I highly recommend it. The flavors are more mild than traditional Indian food. Steve calls it bland, I call it subtle, so I guess that is a matter of preference. Also, I feel their food is a little healther, which may contribute to the milder flavor, but also means (for me at least) that it is easier to digest. Again, I haven't eaten the meat, and Steve has, so I cannot speak to the dishes he had. I love the food and love the drinks, though I admit I always come during happy hours when the WHOLE MENU is half off (4:30-6:30 Monday-Friday). I am a student so I can't afford to eat here during other hours. After writing this review I have noticed that Steve L. wanted us to know that he "loves sharp knives," so if you don't see me post another review within the next couple of weeks, then goodbye Yelpers... I will see you in the afterlife.
Was looking forward to my dinner at Mantra. The food was disappointing. :( The space, however, was very nice. Tall ceilings, sleek decor, nice lighting, little waterfall wall thingy. A nice bar to go to for drinks and appetizers perhaps, but I won't be back for dinner anytime soon. I had (got the descriptions from their website): Anari Steak  24 Pomengrenate marinated flank steak Served over Fuji apples and jicama, cilantro tequila cream Sauce was overwhelming. There was a weird spice that kept getting stuck between my teeth, the meat had a strange consistency. Not very tender. Fennel Rocket Salad 9 Tossed Arugula salad with fennel, red onions spiced walnuts in a mango passion fruit vinaigrette Decent salad. Waiter looked like Will Ferrel and was very friendly. Water was constantly refilled. Dessert was pretty good. Had a hazelnut mousse. Overall, a so-so dining experience.
I don't like fusion food. I think it's largely ethnic food for white folks, and is usually 8/10's western food and 2/10's maybe, of whatever it's fused with. It's a way to make new flavors less scary for the fearful palette. its like a crap or get off the pot type thing, if youo wanna eat something new just do it and don't try and ease your way into it. their fusion dishes are basically well made french food with punny names (har har get it?) think lamb vindaleaux. and since we know that puns are the highest form of humor the lose one star. it's good french food, and their isn't really anything indian about it. all the indian flavors are muted by the more traditional  ones to the point that it makes you wonder why it's considered fusion. 95 percent french, maybe 5 percent indian.
Disclaimer - Based on just the lunch buffet. Small number of standard options which were pretty insipid. Some of the dishes were lukewarm in terms of temperature.  Looks like they don't see the lunch buffet as a priority and it shows. Have had much better. Sakoon and Kebab and Curry for example are a different league.
Yay, my first Yelp review :) Now that the weather has (finally) gotten better, it seemed like a good time to start going to the restaurants around University Ave. Mantra was nice without being stuffy...A couple of skylights brought in some natural light and overall it was a relaxed atmosphere. I'm not usually a fusion person - but Mantra wasn't typical fusion. It wasn't like crapified Asian food, but something completely different. You don't normally see beef and pork at an Indian restaurant, but then again this isn't really an Indian restaurant. The hostess was all smiles and waiter was attentive without crowding us. This might seem like a minor point, but he never seemed to interrupt my gf and I in the middle of our conversation, he always came by at an appropriate time. So if you don't like awkward interruptions, you'll like that. What we got Cocktails: a Hendrick's gin and tonic and a Hendrick's martini. Ok, that's more like what I got, and the drinks were strong and great. I would come back just for the drinks. Appetizers: Bread basket - I wasn't a fan. Didn't taste all too great, the chutney wasn't tasty, and overall this didn't seem worth it. Jumbo scallops, leeks, lemon and champagne foam - Delicious. I'm not even a scallop person but I would definitely get this again. Entrees: Tandoori Mix Grill - This was decent, but not something I would get. My girlfriend thought it was just alright. Veal Tenderloin - I got this, and this is what sealed the 4 stars. It was cooked to perfection, the sauce was great, and the potato made a nice little perch :) I dipped the extra naan in the sauce. Oh yeah, the laguiole knife was a nice touch. Also, the waiter brought us something from the chef after our appetizer - spinach wrapped in ham, like a sushi roll. That was pretty good. Overall the drinks, veal, and atmosphere made it a nice meal. Next time I think we'll pass on the tandoori mix grill and the bread. The bar seems like a good place to go with coworkers after work too.
#87 I came to Mantra about a month ago with Cece C. Before writing anything more, I highly suggest that you ONLY come here DURING HAPPY HOUR - 4:30 to 6:30pm. They offer 50% off anything on their menu! Otherwise, you're looking at food that, in my opinion, is a bit overpriced. That Friday's happy hour was quite crowded. We were able to get one of the last tables, arriving at 5pm. However, they asked us if we would move to a different table so they could fit a larger party in the space next to us. I didn't really appreciate that but I do understand that Mantra is a business, and a business exists to make money. The crowd seemed very yuppie-ish which I guess is the case with happy hours, but perhaps more so being in downtown Palo Alto. All that aside, here's the rundown on what we ordered: -Vegetable samosas: The menu says they are handmade ... but what samosas aren't? I guess they just want to emphasize that they aren't brought in from somewhere else. -Mantra's Savories & Kebab Taste: We ordered the non-vegetarian variety, which came with duck, lamb, and chicken. -Dry rubbed filet mignon: IIRC, we ordered medium rare. However, it was definitely not. I'd say they cooked it medium at least. -Rosemary-Pesto and Parmesan naan: I really like naan so this was a great combo. They also have a number of cocktails on their menu. We (I should really say I since I ended up drinking both pretty much) ordered the: -Temptress: raspberry vodka, orange liqueur, fresh lemon juice, touch of cranberry juice -Blue lychee: vodka, lychee juice, blue curacao, lychee fruit It's a cool spot for happy hour but not good enough to make it worth your while otherwise.
"If you have the money, don't know what indian food tastes like and have to eat on University Ave., then Mantra is for you" I cannot agree more with this quote by another Yelper. Food: an overpriced 2 stars Service: 4 stars The ambiance is nice, the service is great, and cocktails are exotic. The food is NOT "real" Indian, it is in the realm of hoity toity Indian fusion. It is a place to be seen and chic with your cocktail. It caters to the rich who wants to experience Indian food within their comfort zone. I had the duck and my girlfriend had the sea bass, it was great but way overpriced and under portioned. Twenty two dollars for a plate?!? Even the naan portion was not suffice. My stomach was not content. I'll take my smelly, hole in the wall, lack of  service Indian eatery over Mantra any day. ...and they didn't even offer chai tea, blasphemy!
They introduced a take out lunch for $6 some time ago. Since then we have been there about 2 dozen times. It's good food and the price is really a big argument for us. The curries are not bad but are not exactly super fresh or super tasty. It's a lot of food though that you get for a small amount of change.
I still really like Mantra, although nothing beats their happy hour special (while at the bar) where everything is 50% off. I think that is worth an extra star (my previous review had 5 stars because I got the HH special). We came for Valentine's day and although there were bar seats open, it was Valentine's day after all and what better than staring across the table at the person that you love? I made the slight mistake of not carefully reading the menu and thought the paneer beet salad had green leafs in it - nope, all paneer, but still very good. I also liked the carrot ginger soup which was poured soup into the jelly.  Again, I had the chicken tikka masala and it was delicious! Perfectly tandoored tandori chicken in an amazing tomato butter sauce. Their naan is also flaky but chewy. Next time, I'm coming back for their Happy Hour special...What a deal!
Wow, their happy hour special, 50% off of EVERYTHING really rocks. The food is Californian Indian... Read more 
I just moved here from NYC and am desperately in search of some good Indian. My boyfriend and I came to Mantra a couple of weeks ago and were (finally) encouraged. it's been a while so I don't think my review will be as detailed as it should be, but here we go. We ordered the shrimp madras, chicken tikka masala, chicken tikka kabobs as an appetizer and a side of asparagus. At first I thought, asparagus with Indian? These guys must be a little "off," but it was actually reaaaally good. That said, I could also use some more traditional accompaniments though. You don't expect to go to a Indian restaurant and see no cauliflower, spinach or potato sides. Yes, I know it's fusion. Whatever. The shrimp madras and kabobs were great but my favorite had to be the chicken tikka masala. I know that's like the most boring thing to order, but you have to understand how badly I needed a good tikka masala. It lived up to its reputation in my book and was the right mix of creamy and spicy (I believe we did tell them to spice it up a bit more than usual too). While I don't think you'd call this authentic, it was still flavorful and the dishes had a lot of depth. The ambiance was cool -- another big thing I look for as a New Yorker. Also, the service was great. Joshua was our server and took a lot time to help us navigate the menu. I hope he is our server when we go back!
Dinner review. One star because they flaunt all the raves and reviews at the entrance, beam a nice vibe, and are not shy about their prices, but none of the food holds up. Appetizers: Sea Bass Ceviche and Grape-Leaf Wrapped Goat Cheese. - Ceviche: very, very sloppy knife work on the tomatoes and onions -- large, uneven pieces, larger than the sea bass itself. Not to mention, the fish is so subtle that the onions obliterate its flavor. Tomatoes tasted very bland; it's out of season, so maybe they should do another dish. This was basically a $9 salsa that happened to have fish. Except, Chipotle's salsa is way better and is free with a $6 burrito. - Goat Cheese: nice dish served with naan. Cheese and bread. Good, but nothing exciting. (Remember, these are $10 apps.) Entrees: Lamb Shank and Duck Breast - Lamb = leftovers. Tasted like it was freshly made a few days ago, refrigerated, then reheated. Dry. Served with swiss chard, artichokes, and cauliflower puree. Swiss chard was over-seasoned, saltier than the lamb, so that's what the dish tasted like. Artichokes were over-cooked (mush), and the puree was nice, but it's a lamb dish. - Duck Breast -- cooked medium rare, had a nice flavor and none too greasy, and seasoning was good. But what in the world was it resting on? A bed of napa cabbage and shiitake mushrooms -- flavorless, no personality, no reason to exist with this duck. The red sauce on the bottom was nice with my side of naan and added something to the napa and shiitake, but I much preferred the duck without the sauce. It was a confusing dish at best. Looks like I need to go back during happy hour, and get a beer and naan. Looks like Mantra = bar food.
Wine: 07 merlot millbrandt winery 07 chapallet cab Appetizer: Large Day Boat Scallop: VERY salty!! Had to drink a gallon of water for this Chicken Tikka kabob: Pesto and Tamarid dipping sauce. I liked both sauces! We saved it for the naan and it really hit the spot. The chicken was a bit dry but flavorful. TIP: SAVE THE SAUCES! Entree: Mantra Bhuna lamb: SPICEY! The lamb was tender and full of flavors. I don't eat lamb, but the bf liked it. Traditional Tikka Chicken Masala: Can't go wrong with that right?? RIGHT! It was awesome. One of the best tikka masala i've had. The naan went perfectly with the sauce. Wished I had more right now. I'm salivating as I write! Also had the original and garlic naan: both good, nothing bad to say about it. Great ambiance and waitress was always checking up on us and making sure we were okay.
Contemporary Indian food done right. If I were to review just the food alone, I would give it close to 5 stars. However, service was slightly lacking and at these prices, I expected better. On to the food... We started with the Hamachi Char appetizer, which was tasty, but like Randy F., I found a tad overdone. Served with grated potato and apple slices, this dish wasn't as successul as the next app. The Lemon Thyme Chicken Tikkas were served over two sauces, a mint chutney and a sweet tamarind sauce. The chicken was cooked to tender perfection, and the sauces complemented the spicy seasoning. This came in quite the portion as well, 5 of us had more than enough of this to share. My friend had raved about their Tandoori Sea Bass, and with good reason. The moist, delicate fish was the perfect vehicle for the subtle, but complex tandoori spices. The fish was served atop cumin spiced mashed potatoes, which I found to be a revelatory pairing. Garnished above the fish were fried onions and a delicious basil butter smoked chili sauce. This dish was 5 star worthy in its own right. I'd love to try more of what the chef has to offer.
On our recent trip to the West Coast, we met a friend for dinner at Mantra. One of the draws was the fact that it was open til 10 on Thursday night, and it was already 8:30.  There were no open tables in the dining room, so we opted for a table in the bar, which was perfect. The bartender doubled as our waiter, and he was attentive and helpful. This Asian fusion establishment and decor were fantastic. Our friend would have ordered everything on the menu, as everything was so appealing, but we settled on the following: Chana hummus and naan, Nawabi Nurg (tandoor chicken marinated in yogurt, saffron, cayenne and smoked paprika, ashew and pistachio curry sauce, bok choy, and jalapenos), Mantra Bhuna lamb (saffron, ginger curry sauce), and cumin and pomegranate short ribs (turmeric and cumin-accented paneer polenta). The portions were average size, and we finished everything, but we decided to share Chocolate Cigars, I think they were called. They were flaky and chocolaty and yummy, and they hit the spot. The presentations excited the senses and the food was outstanding. We'll definitely return but we would not likely sit in the bar area again. The upholstered seat against the wall sank way too much when I sat in it, and I felt like I were two feet below everyone else. Mr K and I switched seats so I could be in a regular chair, and he needed to sit on his coat to be somewhat eye-level with my friend and me.
I first went here opening night- i had amazing food, but crappy service. then on successive trips, the service got worse and the food plummeted. In the really dismal days, the maitre'd was a coke addict and also dispensed coke to all the waitstaff, according to a bartender that left. It really showed. It's like they didn't give a shit. But, I'd heard that mantra did an about face recently due to new ownership/chefs, so yesterday we headed over there to check it out. I wanted to have several drinks and didn't want the stuffiness of the main dining room where any service problems would be amplified. We ended up ordering mostly from the bar menu with a little bit from the main menu. THANK THE LORD, the rumors were right, it was simply delicious. First off, the drinks are INCREDIBLE. I had a strawberry mint and two pomegranate martinis- delicious and strong. Food came fast and was very good. It was less insanely priced than I remember, much more on par with the rest of the prices in palo alto. I highly recommend the rosemary pesto naan, the stunning "naanizza" (way better than zantes or amber cafe) and the chicken curry which this time was tender butter chicken. Their daily daal was chickpea, also delicious but the least impressive out of what we tasted. The bartender was GREAT at steering us through his recommendations, and I would say, if you want to have a good meal here, heed your server's suggestions. The bartender here was very competent and apparently had created our delicious cocktails. The only minor complaint I have is that he kept randomly, and very rudely, leaving us in the middle of ordering to bark at runners. Like as soon as we placed an order, we'd begin talking, and then he'd leave us talking into air. I love this space, it feels like you've stepped out of Palo Alto- though the clientele remains totally shallow alto.  So I'm basically thrilled that Mantra has figured their sh*t out. We're definitely going back.
We had a business dinner here during the week and the crowd started filling in as we dined. We shared the following appetizers: Tuna "Torchon" - Thinly cut Tuna Ribbons mixed with radishes, mozarella cheese balls and micro greens Rosemary Pesto Parmesan and Anandara naan breads with vegetable curry The ahi tuna was flavorful although the naan breads was lacking taste since I would imagine the rosemary pesto naan to be mind blowing...I think naan in other places seemed to be more flavorful. For entree, I was debating between the seabass and the Tandoori Mixed Grill and the server suggested the latter. The entree consists of  Clay oven roasted rack of lamb chop, rosemary chicken, pesto marinated Sea Bass, ajowain shrimp served with dried cherry and date chutney, cilantro pesto and chickpea and potato salad. I figured it was a good tasting option to try out the different meat and fish. The seabass was good but the shrimp was completed drenched in this red sauce or spices...my colleague was complaining that there was something wrong with his shrimp coz it was this shocking red shrimp which didn't look very appealing. The lamb chop was succulent and tasty although it did smell quite a bit and some other places execute lamb chops better (Hint: Kokkari and Evvia!). Something in the sauce was too salty. We shared the following desserts and passed them around: - Lavender creme brulee - Passion Fruit Soup with a Milk Chocolate "Bombe" Honey and Pistachio Nougat - Chocolate Lava Cake, Strawberry Compote and Sorbet - Chocolate mousse My favorite was the chocolate lava cake although it was still a teeny bit dry but it was aromatic but it wasn't oozing chocolate in the center. :( The Passion fruit soup was way way way TOO sweet! It was an overkill. My colleagues all took a bite and simply left it on the table. I am a passion fruit lover but this was dissapointing. The rest of the desserts were just eh, so sad considering they have such exotic names and nice description. Such a waste and I wanted to like this place considering it had great ambience, high ceilings, tasteful decor....sigh....
A decent meal is to be had at Mantra, aka The Place in Palo Alto Where Non-Indians Go for Indian Food. Food:  3 stars.   I never tried Californian-Indian fusion food before, but if everything on the menu was as good as the Kashmiri sea bass, then I would be trying it a lot more!  Unfortunately, the other items on the menu were not as good as the Kashmiri sea bass. Service:  3 stars.   The server was really  nice - she even recognized my Indian dinner companion that dined there 3 months prior (probably because she was the last Indian person to go to that restaurant in the last 3 months).  Service gets knocked down a couple of notches for the bussers (who kept trying to take our plates too early) and for the other servers (who tried to serve our entrees to the couple next to us).  There was also no mention of a tasting menu by the server, although it's mentioned in the website. Atmosphere:  3 stars.  The place is really loud, so what do I do?  Talk louder, of course, especially after a couple (or 3 or 4) glasses of wine.   The place looks average, nothing special.  The crowd matches the place. Hits:   Kashmiri sea bass, lamb kebobs Misses:  Golden cumin cauliflower soup, naans, not enough vegetarian options for an Indian restaurant If You Like This Place, You'd Probably Like:  Junnoon, Gaylord India
I can't wait to go back to Mantra for dinner with the girls!  The samosas were divine!  Peas + potatoes + deep fried in dough + yummy sauce = delicious. At the Yelp Elite the staff did a fabulous job of rolling out appetizers & drinks to a very hungry & thirsty crowd.  The vibe, food & service will bring me back very soon! I noticed some pretty good happy hour specials on the board in the bar, $2 drafts all day every day in the month of July!  Good drafts too!  $7 appetizers, and they're not talking fries & wings. Thanks again Mantra!
Maybe we picked the wrong day. I don't know. But it was by far the worst dining experience ever. We reserved a table for the "mimosa brunch buffet" on mother's day. We stood at the entrance for 10 mins before someone came to ask if we had a reservation. Took another 10 min to seat us. We went to the buffet to get started with appetizers. No plates. Waited 5 mins then had to yell at the guy who seated us to get some plates. When the plates finally came, they had run out of appetizers. Had to chase down the host again and point this out. Finally 40 mins after coming there, the first morsels of food went into our mouths. We had to remind the waiter 3 times about our son's Mango Lassi. He forgot the straw so I had to go get it myself. We had to ask for the Mimosa that was part of the brunch, only then did it come. They were out of plates again for the main entrees. The Kofta curries only had gravy by the time we got to them and they never bother to bring a fresh batch. I could go on but you get the idea. They were short staffed and totally ruined the experience. I was so annoyed I did not really notice if the food was good or not. To top it all, they added a mandatory 20% service tip to the bill at the end even though they did nothing to earn a single cent in tips. I am never going here again or taking anyone there. I hate restaurants that take people for granted.
I've only been to the bar for happy hour, so I can't  comment on the restaurant.  They've got two happy hours every day, 4-6:30 and 9:30 to close.  Beer is half off, well drinks are $5 and appetizers are half off, so it's a great deal. The bar tenders and host are super friendly and always aiming to please.  I've had great service every time. I'm not huge on Indian food, so I love the "fusion" aspect of this place.  The samosas and mantra chips are delicious.  The naanizza was good, but a little dry, probably because my favorite part of pizza is the sauce and this version only has chopped tomatoes. All in all, it's definitely worth checking out for a drink after work if you're in the Palo Alto area.
Superb place to unwind after a long day in a colorless Silicon valley office. Yes, it stretches the wallet, as well as the definition of "Indian" food, but it is fusion cooking at its finest. I generally eat in the lounge area, where they allow you to order from the main dining menu as well. They have an eclective mix of Indian and not so Indian entrees and appetizers, the best part being that even the use of non traditional ingredients to cook Indian dishes is so well thought out and executed that it feels right....makes one wonder why no one's ever thought of it before.... Top dishes here include the pricey, spicey and tiny little samosas, excellent paneer cuboid, (which is a paneer tikka with a twist of Palo Alto), a pretty decent vegetable stir fry (Indian summer or something..) and the pudina alu. But absolutely the main reason I keep going back there is their awesome dal of the day. Yellow or black, it is superbly done, and is easily the best dal I've had outside of India. The spices, condiments and ghee are just perfect. Makes one want to hop on the next flight eastwards.. The lounge is cool, great drinks, chill decor and friendly, generous waitstaff. Some inventive cocktails and fine snacks. It's also a great place to go just for drinks and appetizers, with two happy hours: early evening and late at night.
We took my Mom here for Mother's day.  I didn't expect anything amazing going into it, because it was one of the few "nice" places that had an opening for Mother's day at the last minute.  Logic being if it was so good then it should have been packed. Well I was pretty far off on that assessment.... The food and drinks at Mantra turned out to be great and the only real area for improvement was the service, which was a little slow. My personal favorites were the lamp chops and the chicken small plate appetizers (don't remember the exact name).
For Palo Alto this place rates 5 stars in my opinion.  With respect to SF, I'd say 4 stars.  Food here is delicately prepared and flavored although none of the tastes are demure.  Flavors jump out at you right away.  The chef trained at French Laundry in Yountville. We had an excellent meal here.  Tofu is incredible, as well as beef medallions in the wine sauce (melts in your mouth.)  Service was excellent except for one major glitch.  Dessert!  Ice cream wasn't served cold enough.  It took the waiter 40 mins to let us know chocolate cake would take another 15 minutes to prepare so we waited a long time and personally, I didn't think the cake was worth it.  However, they were so incredibly nice about it -- they comped our dessert wines and the whole dessert order!   The setting is elegant, relaxing but hip, quiet enough to talk but noisy enough where a young, well-behaved child doesn't feel out of place. This place is good enough to merit a drive from SF, SJ or the East Bay!  Hands down the best restaurant on the peninsula, a near rival to the now closed Elizabeth Daniel, Fifth Floor and similar big city restaurants.  (2nd best is Lure in San Mateo.) PA downtown is always hopping too so after dinner you could take a stroll down University Ave for shopping or people watching.
This is my favorite restaurant and I love sitting at the Daru Lounge (which is their bar).  I've eaten almost everything on the menu and can't say I don't like any of the dishes. The Sea Bass is awesome. The Mantra chips which are also called pani puri are awesome as well.  The Mantra Martini is my favorite drink. My favorite is their Daal which isn't tainted with heavy cream.  A really ingenious idea is the Naanizza, which is their take on indian pizza.  Its Naan, pizza sauce, fresh veggies and just enough cheese for flavor.  I can easily eat a whole pizza myself. The whole experience is very enjoyable.  One day I went their with a friend and was sitting at the bar. Then, the owner plugs in his Ipod and let  us pick the music. This is must see restaurant and is very well run.  They spared no expense on decor and the food is impeccable.
So me and a few friends decided to go here to celebrate a birthday. Service :- Great 10 /10 Portions :- Enough Food :- Good Drinks :- can be a little more stranger Bar Tender :- Always angry (maybe he could get a few smiling classes) Music :- Lounge Overall :- Will go again for sure ....but not sit on the bar :)
I came here for the Yelp Elite event last night.  The food itself (the one dish we had) was really good.  However, the drinks and service were not. We were seated pretty quickly, but the restaurant did not seem to have enough staff to wait on everyone.  We didn't fill the whole restaurant, but I guess there were enough people inside.  They even turned away some elite guests!  What the heezy...if they were a little faster with service, we would have been out of there! I got there at 6:30 and pretty much was seated at 6:35.  We didn't get our menus until 7, when it was almost time to go to the next spot of the event.  I quickly ordered a drink and the Sea Bass, since a friend mentioned how delish it was in his review.  The sea bass did not disappoint!  Too bad there were more garbanzo beans than sea bass.  Haha.  It was super tender, flaky, and flavorful.  A REALLY good dish.  I also ordered the Lychee drink which was supposed to have Blue cacao (or something), vodka, some other stuff and lychee, but it straight up tasted like warm vodka with no lychee in it.  The only lychee flavor I had was the lychee on a toothpick in the glass.  Not a good drink.  We were going to order the samosas and some other appetizers, but due to the lack of service and how pricey some items were (compared to other Indian restaurants) we decided not to. Mantra is a spot I'll come back to when I'm craving some pricey contemporary Indian food.
Came here for a company dinner.  Although we were a large party, 1.5 hours is too long to wait for food to come after sitting down...this is after 1.5 hrs of pre-seating "mingling".  Wine can only do so much to kill time. 3-4 stars for decent food; 1 for everything else.  2 overall.
This is based on my memory of the first week they were open. FIrst impressions: Great ambaince and nice space although the dining area seemed a bit crowded because of the structure that separates it  from the bar. Food was good some unique twists on some traditional flavors.  Had the rack of lamb with some sort of chorizo sauce. Portions were a bit small for the price. Good drinks/wine list. Dessert was actually quite good and Im not really a dessert person (trio of homemade ice creams). Service was good but not completely organized since they had just opened. There was another couple next to us that had been there probably 15-20 min before us and got their food just right beforehand. I think they have a few things to iron out as they are new and if they do so this place is capable of becoming a 5 star place. Definitely worth a try if you haven't and I'll try and check back in a few months to see if they've gotten things running smoothly
Let me start by saying I rather enjoyed the food.  Nice flavors, fun presentation, excellent service.  We had the ahi app which was good, a relatively small portion.  My co-diners went with the prosciutto wrapped halibut and raved about it.  I had the ginger chili lamb chops, which were also very good. Couple things dragged this place down.  One the zen like waterfall in the dining room is in dire need of a cleaning.  The odor reminded me of a college dive bar or an aquarium full of goldfish.  The other was the price gouging for simple sides like naan.  For the 3 of us the bill was north of $175 and we only had 4 beers and 1 glass of wine.  Lastly, the deserts...awful.  We shared the homemade ice creams...one tasted like paste (and I ate paste once in kindergarten so I would know), and the almond pine nut thing...it tasted like sweet saw dust.  I haven't tried saw dust, but if I had to venture a guess... Bottom line...cool atmosphere/bar (assuming they clean the waterfall thing), good entrees with awesome flavor, value on items outside the entrees are suspect.
I just wanted to give a shout-out to the fact that Mantra has the best happy hour in Palo Alto. 50% off the entire menu means I come here at least once a month. Big up to the lamb lollipops, and the samosas are the nuke!
I don't even like Indian food, but I like this place.  The sea bass dish was a bit too salty, but... Read more 
Happy hour here is a fantastic deal - EVERYTHING is half off from 4:30 to 6:30, including drinks, apps, and even entrees.   Everything we tried was fantastic, incuding the lamp lollipops, chicken tikas, and samosas.   Drinks were excellent as well! Update (09/2011): The happy hour went to 25% off, but has returned as 50% off, but now only applies to a selection of small plates and drinks.  Entrees are no longer half off.   Its a shame, because I'd like to try some of the more substantial things here but they're pretty overpriced before the discount.   Still, with 10-ish appetizers on the happy hour menu, its definitely one of the best food happy hours in PA.
A few years had passed since my first visit to Mantra. A restaurant at this price range averaging only a 3.5 stars rating on Yelp usually does not result in a repeat visit. However, the fond memory of their lamb chop and a $25 for $50 Groupon convinced me to give Mantra another try. Their Lamb Chops 'Vinhaleaux' is still excellent. Perhaps even better than I remembered. I have no complaints on the texture of the meat. It was consistently tender and juicy in every possible ways. Some might find the taste of their lamb chop a bit strong but I think this slight hint of gaminess is very appropriate. The fragrance of the lamb is enhanced but not masked by the spices and seasonings. If you like lamb chop you won't be disappointed. Their lamb chop is one of the better ones in this price range. The Rajasthani Duck, unfortunately, wasn't my favorite. I found the taste of this dish simply too ordinary. One could possibly use chicken in this recipe and it would not have made too much of a difference. The spices were strong and overshadowed the rich and complex flavor of the duck meat. This dish is still very tasty just not outstanding. The Red Curry Scallops were a complete miss. The scallops were overcooked to a point they were chewy and rubbery. Very disappointing. Dessert was rather uncreative. Ordered their Indian Cigars with Vanilla Bean Ice Cream which is essentially just fried bananas. Nothing even remotely Indian inspired. If you want a typical or authentic Indian meal, Mantra is not the place to be. Their 'classic' Indian dishes aren't even their strongest selling point. It is really just a contemporary Californian restaurant with some Indian influence. Mantra is one of those restaurants that you really need to know what to order. There are excellent dishes on the menu but also a lot of misses. Service could really be better. I understand Friday night is typically busiest time but having to wait over an hour between appetizers and entrees is still unacceptable. Would I dine here again? Possibly but I will just stick to the lamb chop, avoid the weekend and only come here when they have specials going (like 1/3 off your bill).
Horrendous service. We were a party of six, and it took us two and a half hours to eat dinner, and it was not even crowded!  The wait staff is very inexperienced...the waitress was standing still on one side of the table and kept saying "I can't hear you" to my sister who was sitting just on the other side. I finally asked her to please walk around so she could hear and take down the order! Very average food..my wife ordered some beef dish and asked for it to be medium well, with no pink. Sure enough, it was cooked on the medium rare side. Rest the dishes were absolutely nothing to write home about. Cocktails were just average. I wont be going back...
I came in with my gent for a drink  - no food.  Weeknight atmosphere, very quiet spot. The bar area was nice.  Not what I'd call posh, but not a dive.  Over the bar there were hanging lights that were set to sort of flicker like candlelight.  I thought I was going to have a freaking seizure.  It was a bit much. Although the host was very sweet, one of the bartenders was very short with us and had an attitude.  So not cool.  It didn't seem like the other waitstaff had the same temperament, though, so he must have been a bad apple. After being cautioned that the Temptress cocktail was very sweet, I went with my usual (cosmo w/o triple sec).  It had too much lime juice, but was otherwise fine.  My date had the mango lassi, which  was a little intense to me.  It tasted like melted mango ice cream (which makes sense, since it's yogurt-based).  Not bad, but not my thing. I'll may be back for happy hour at some point, but for full price I'm not sure that it's worth it.
I think the food has improved a lot in the past year. Pros: - long bar where it's pretty easy to have a private conversation - happy hour prices are fantastic. - large selection of scotch, reasonable pours. Good: - Chicken curry and lamb curry were both very tasty (though not particularly spicy). - chicken tikkas - chili nan Just ok: hamachi char, lamb lollipops. Will definitely come back.
I had lunch and it was great to pick 2 dishes for $14. I got the vegetable salad which was bright and refreshing. For the second dish I had the Tikka Kebobs (4 cubes of meat, chicken, salmon, sausage, lamb) which were flavorful and you had a choice of smearing from the plate different sauces to dress up the meats. The chicken was still raw in the middle and the lamb and salmon were dry. The dishes tend to be very small and I would have ordered 1 side to round out the meal. I would go again to try dinner and the lounge area but not completely sold on the place yet.
A very solid four stars, based on one visit. I started out with a fru-fru cocktail, the Jaipur something or other.  Like a pina colada, but exceptionally, exceptionally good, the best pina colada-like drink I have ever had :-)  Dinner was the potato soup (tiny portion, pretty interesting, but a huge creme fraiche to soup ratio which was off putting), the shortribs (best ever!) and the lava cake (I don't much care for desserts, but this was well done, especially the ice cream on it). The flavors were unique without being confusioning, as in fusion can confuse the senses...corriander was found in almost everything, almost like a unifying taste that was nice.  The food did not feel Indian, just barely Indian inspired, but still very much one of a kind, which I loved.
The food at this place is pretty good. The servers and bartenders are knowledgable and friendly. The food is pretty good, but it's more of the "big plate, small food" idea and I'd much rather go to somewhere that has more traditional Indian food than the "Californian" influence. but the owners of this place walk around the restaurant like hawks and aren't friendly to their employess. They do things like come up and interrupt the host while she's trying to help customers and ask her to clean the windows (at dinner rush???) and sit and eat and drink at the bar which i think is inappropriate. Also, even though they try to be friendly to guests, they are pretty fake. I most likely will never eat here again based on the actions of the owners, though the service was really good.
I just came here for lunch buffet.  The food was underwhelming.  There were some nice things.  But, there were a lot of dishes that were just unpleasant.  But, it was only 10 bucks for lunch.  So, it was reasonable.  However, I will not be coming back for lunch buffet. I will probably only return for drinks at happy hour in the future.
Mantra is to echo what has been said by other reviewers trendy, expensive, tasty, Indian fusion, in... Read more 
Food is good. They have region specific items on the menu. Service is just ok. The noon lunch is a small spread but inexpensive too. They have the all-you-can-fill lunch box at buffet for about $7 and thats a good deal. This place is better (but slightly more expensive) than nearly 4 other Indian restaurants in a few blocks of radius.
My gal and I just spent a lovely evening at: "Mantra"...Great food, Great decor and Great wine!! What more could you ask for? Decor? very clean and modern with a little charm to boot. Bar? very classy... Location? very easy to find and parking not too far away... I loved it and would definitely recommend it to any of my friends!!
So here goes my first restaurant review on http://yelp.com EVER and it doesn't get any better when I write a review for my most favorite restaurant in the peninsula. My girlfriend lives in Palo Alto and she introduced me to Mantra in the downtown area. At first the whole fusion concept seemed a little intimidating but here is how I can break this down based on our 3 visits to the place, the most recent one this past Sunday: FOOD: They have a great blend of both fusion entrees and classic Indian curries. Chicken Tikka masala is off the hook (5 stars hands down) and the other curry we really loved is their Bhuna Lamb curry (if you're craving something spicy). I think their Ginger carrot soup is worth having on every visit and so is their rosemary naan bread. My girlfriend loves seafood and our server recommended their scallops appetizer which she is still craving about.... SERVICE: Coincidentally we were served by the same server 2/3 times and in simple words- this guy is awesome !!!  All his recommendations were great from Bhuna lamb curry that could satisfy my Indian taste buds and I'm impressed by the level of wine knowledge that the guy had. He recommended a glass of cab from chile for my curry and a chardonnay for my girlfriend's sea bass entree (btw - if you love fish,their SEABASS is a must try). We both loved the wines he recommended in accordance with our entrees but he gave a nice description of some others on the list that all sounded good but we chose to let him decide for us and nevertheless we made the right decision. The part we loved a lot was the way he gave us our space but also checked in at regular intervals, and yeah shared a nice joke at the end of our meal. I think he introduced himself as Ankit or Anant but not really sure. To sum it all up, great food combined with excellent wait staff. Would love to go again with family & friends and celebrate good times. 4 stars - food 5 stars - service Overall 4 stars due to lack of a good traditional Indian dessert like Kheer or my favorite Rasmalai.
I went here again and decided to go with another dish simply try something different. I did decide on getting their Lamb Lollipops, and again they were solid. Their Panner Ravioli was also very good. I didn't know it was going to be one big pie, I was pleasantly surprised and it was nice change to regular ravioli. Keep up the good work guys, the only knock is they are a tad pricey
Seabass was the the best thing in the WORLD
Mantra is living up to it's mantra of great food and wonderful ambiance. I went to Mantra on a Tuesday night and walked a little before they closed. The waiter was extremely gracious and allowed my friends and I to eat in their bar. He even made sure the kitchen stayed open long enough to order. One of my friends was vegan and the other vegetarian. We were very excited that they had a special menu that they could order off of. The waiter was very helpful and waited on us attentively and never made us feel like we needed to leave even though the whole restaurant and bar area was closing and people were obviously breaking down the restaurant for the night. The extra special gift they gave us was 25% off our entire order. Between the hours of 9:30 and close, the whole menu is 25% off. I checked the website and happy hour is 4:30 p.m. to 6:30 p.m. where you can get 30% off the entire menu. Honestly, I wouldn't mind paying the full price. The food was delicious. My friends and I shared the "Roasted Cauliflower and Organic White Asparagus Soup," $7, the "Smoked Chili Organic Tofu," $18, the "Plain Naan," $3, the "Plain Wheat Roti," $3, "and the "Vegetarian Risotto," $19.
Don't be fooled by the happy hour here because it doesn't bring the price down that match, things will still cost you a pretty penny. This place is trendy and expensive.  I am sure they are good on normal days but they certainly don't handle a crowd well. We had to wipe down our own table, they forgot to make our drinks and the food came in paltry quantities. All this came at an unreasonably high price.  To be fair though the bartender personally apologized about forgetting to make the drinks and he extended the happy hour price to our next rounds. The drinks, when they came, were spot on and the food was delicious though there certainly wasn't enough of it.
while the ambience was nice, and the waitress was real attentive, and helpful, the food was terrible.  It was burnt, and a couple of the dishes we tried tasted pretty much the same.  There are a lot nicer restaurants to go, especially at this price range!
I visit this place quite often. Being an Indian, I know what good Indian food tastes like. The place is nice and cozy. The waiters are prompt and food doesn't take much time to come after ordering. Though they do have a short menu, but whatever they have on that list is great. I personally love the chicken tikka masala here. The naans are very fresh and completely done from inside. I tried the dal (a side order) here yesterday and it was amazing. The wine list is pretty elaborate as well. I would recommend this place to anyone wanting to try out good Indian food. Get their discount coupons at http://www.restaurant.com
For an unknown reason, a bunch of upscale lounges/restaurants have popped up in Palo Alto recently.  Heading into Mantra, it was immediately clear that this place belongs in SF, not PA.  Dim, shiny, clean-- not designed for a college town. I came here after the kitchen was closed, so I couldn't sample the food.  And we didn't stay too long because there was some really loud Indian disco music being blasted from the back room.  While it was amusing to see a lot of older Indian folk dance to "Dance the disco forever!" or whatever song they were playing endlessly, the music was too loud to even talk at the front of the bar.
Decent lunch.  Good for business meetings; there were lots of them occurring, our table included. I had a good enough lamb sandwich that was a bit too salty.   Everyone at my table had the same thing.  Many of the other mains sounded great, but more like heavier dinner fare. I will return, but it was only good not great.  However, a VAST improvement from the opening which had a different chef.
I'd like to give this place a 4.5, as it's very good but not as insanely good as Evvia was. I've been to the very good happy hours (early and 9:30-close) here many times to get cheap drinks and half-price appetizers.  The half-price naan makes for great bar food, and the prawn trio is a particularly good deal.  Sadly they no longer offer the cocktails half-price. I finally took the plunge on Monday night and tried the "Dine About Palo Alto" prix fixe 3-course dinner for $30.  We also split a wine pairing, which was a mere $15. We started with a pea and fennel soup, which was poured over chopped apple and mango table-side.  It was decent, and the presentation was a very nice touch. Next up, I had escolar over squid ink risotto while my girlfriend had lamb shank with spinach.  Both were very good to excellent.  The lamb shank was probably better at Evvia, but the sauce they served with it was excellent.  My escolar (butterfish) was very good, as was the risotto. Finally for dessert it was some sort of flavored creme brulee which was OK but not great.  It was flavored with saffron and something else but to be honest I couldn't taste it at all and it was a little overdone.  The fresh berries and cookie were good, though. So, it was a very good deal at $30 and the food is very good.  The bar food is an amazing deal during happy hour and I would highly recommend it. Service was a bit slow to start as they didn't appear to have anyone at front of house.  After a few minutes someone realized that we were waiting, but not until at least 5 staff walked by.
I came here for a second dinner after sharing a burger at the Counter.  So I have to put in this disclaimer that I wasn't all that hungry, but I definitely had room to graze and sample. Here is what I tried: 1. red curry scallops: pretty good, I'd get them again.  it had a nice flavor to it. 2. braseola naanizza (Cured Beef, Pepper Jack Cheese, Cilantro, Tomatoes, Caramelized Sweet Red Onions), $13: very nice, though it wasn't as good as I expected.  Perhaps better than the Indian pizza you can get at Tasty Indian Pizza, but I expected to love this more than I did. 3. pan roasted sablefish (Sustainable Fillet of Chili Marinated Sablefish, Tomato Basil Biryani, Asparagus, Mozzarella, Cardamom and Peanut accented Red Curry Sauce), $21: terrific flavor and very tender. 4. typhoon cooler (a sweet infusion of blue curacao, pineapple juice, lemongrass syrup, sparkling soda), $6: This drink was just okay.  It was too pricey for a non-alcoholic drink.  I've had the Ginger! Ginger! drink before and that was delicious.  I don't recommend this typhoon cooler. All this being said, I think the food is flavorful and pretty, but overpriced.  You pay for the nice ambiance and the beautiful plating.
Great Indian Fusion cuisine!  Some of my B.A.S.K friends (meoow!) and school buddies went there recently to celebrate ... eh... our recent success.  We ended up having a great time sitting near the back, chatting up each other, the manager, the waiter (cute guy who's an environmental engineer grad), and the owner. We ordered practically every main courses and enjoyed every one of them.  Mine was the Tandoori Mixed Grill, chockful of chicken and lamb. And for you winos, they actually have a 2003 Dehlinger Chardonnay  by the glass.  It was my first time tasting a Dehlinger Chardonnay and I was pleasantly surprised.  Not a lot of oak, a bit steely and racy, reminiscent of a good white burgundy.  Okay, okay, it didn't go with the grilled meats but we were also drinking bottles of Moncuit Champagne (thanks to Victor Pugliese's recommendation from Vin Vino Wine).  That went great with the dishes. Another high point was meeting Ashwani Dhawan, one of the owners.  He is a high tech entrepreneur with several startups under his belt yet he freely admits that running Mantra is easily the toughest startup he has ever done.  Way to go, Ashwani!
This was the most oxymoronic meal i had ever eaten..  Indian spice steak... BUT it was also the tastiest filet mignon I had ever eaten.  The filet was rubbed with dry Indian spice, which gave it a really good favor.  Much better than the usual sauce that main stream steakhouse put on their filet. I also like their pesto and Parmesan naan, it was sorta like eating a pesto pizza but lighter and with the chewiness of naan. I didnt think that highly of their rose mojito, which has no alcohol, but I couldn't really smell the rose and so it almost just tasted like sweet mint soda water.
I really liked the food that I had at Mantra, but I'm giving it three stars because I don't think its food lives up to its prices. I split the meat plate with a girlfriend and split the scallop appetizer as well. The food was heavily seasoned but for some reason it still tasted great. I personally think it's because I was sharing my food; had I eaten the two dishes alone I think I would have been overwhelmed. So go and have a drink, share an appetizer (the bread baskets are good) and the meat plate. You should come early in the evening when you're not ravenous (because it gets crowded), don't mind splurging a little, and just want to eat something yummy.
I've been coming to Mantra for forever because of their 50% off happy hour, which means I'd only eat in the bar area and scarf down their naan (which is actually really good, I am particularly fond of the spicy jack cheese variety). Recently I had the good fortune of actually dining here, and now I am looking for reasons to go back.  I had the Nawabi Murg, my friend had the short ribs, and the meat on both was prepared excellently.  Just thinking about it is making my mouth water, the meat here did not disappoint; it's so good it reminds you why you want to be a carnivore (just in case you forget, some folks do). I plan on trying the warm goat cheese wrapped in grape leaves next time...
I have been complaining for years that there are no good restaurants in Palo Alto. I can no longer complain. I live in San Francisco, so I have had the pleasure of dining at 5-star restaurants on countless occassions; but Michael Mina can't hold a candle to this place. The chef here has a way with balancing complex spices, and the result is nothing short of staggering. BRAVO!!!!! You have finally saved Palo Alto from it's own pretentious, repetitive, over-priced, bland epicurean nightmare. Thanks, Mantra!!!!
Drink: Pomegranate Crush. Fruity fun. Appeteaser: Ajwain Ka Parantha w/ Chili-Coconut Milk-Cashew Sauce.  Bit spicy, nom nom nom! Meal: Chef's Tasting Menu I forgot which salad was featured... fail, I know. Roasted Cauliflower & Organic White Asparagus Soup - a bit bland and the lemongrass oil was strange Pan Roasted Sablefish - fish was delish and curry was fragrant Saffron Panna Cotta - smooth creamy goodness... that's what she said! My friend's ordered the following: thumbs up for both entree choices Dry Rubbed Filet Mignon Cumin & Pomegranate Short Ribs Overall, great experience with 3 of my friends.  Though prices are high (woop... Groupon!) and portions vary in amount, (filet and short ribs were filling, fish... not as much) it's a good place to try on a special occasion... wink wink.
This place is killer! I happened upon this place through a Groupon and decided to go with 4 friends. The food was excellent! Everything we tried was delicious. Not only were the entrees themselves excellent, even every little added thing was good too! The sides, the sauces, the naan, the drinks. I had the pomegranate short ribs which come in a bowl of polenta. I don't even care for polenta, but this was excellent. Finished off my entire plate! I also sampled the cauliflower and asparagus soup, which is probably the most delicious item on the menu, though I haven't sampled everything. The chicken kebabs weren't lovely in appearance, but tasted great and came with the yummiest sides of chutneys. Samosas were great as were the various kinds of naan, with pesto one being my fav. The service was really friendly as well. I would definitely go back. Yum. Yum. Yum.
Terrible experience. We went here on thanksgiving dinner and the experience was bad enough for me to take the effort to come here and write a review. 1) Terrible ambience. The music was too loud. 2) Waiter was very confused about our orders. 3) The lady supervisor/manager was very rude to us and tried to rush us towards the end of the dinner. 4) While we were eating, the waiters came out to clean the buffet and right behind our chairs they had huge dustbins lying around. It was very disgusting. 5) We were asked for the check without offering any dessert.(the lady again) 6) We ordered the lemonade and it was very bitter. We asked for a replacement and had to send it back too, since it was equally bad. Would never go back again! Would never recommend to anyone.
I've been to Mantra several times and I have yet to become a fan. The atmosphere has improved ever since they remodeled the interior and created a more open space. But even though they have altered the menu a great deal and made it more authentically Indian instead of Indian fusion, the food still leaves much to be desired. Most recently I tried the chicken tikka masala and I found the chicken to be on the tough and dry side even drenched in the sauce. Naan was pretty good though. Mantra's a good place for happy hour/drinks, but not really for dinner.
I came here for a Yelp Elite event and was glad that I didn't have to pay the full price for our meal.  Luckily, food and drinks were 1/3 off for the event or else it would not have been worth it. The food is average, prices are on the high side, and portions are quite small.  I do have to admit that our bartender was great though.  He was super friendly and attentive. Appetizers: -Large Day Boat Scallops- $12 (best dish that we ordered...well-seasoned...comes with only 3 scallops though.) -Organic Beet and Pomelo Salad - $8 (very small portions and the dressing was not that great) Entree: -Rajasthani Duck -$22 (average dish and nothing spectacular. I've had better duck breast elsewhere) I would come here again possibly for happy hour but probably not during regular dinner service.
4 stars for decor, ambiance and bar/drinks selection.  3 stars for food - just ok and lukewarm. Won't go back to dine but worth going for drinks.
My lunch buddy and I had a pleasant meal consisting of the mixed grill, the tuna appetizer, the scallop appetizer, and naan with the dal of the day. By far, the seabass from the mixed grill plate was the best.  Then the scallops.  Both fish and scallops were prepared to moist perfection.  I also liked the tender lamb chop from the mixed grill, and the dal was delicious.  The seared tuna and the chicken tikka did not impress, though.  I also sensed a slight attitude, even though I had made reservations via OpenTable and had arrived early. The interior is dark and elegant, with a nice bar area and a room for private parties up to around 20 people that is encased in panels of sliding, partially frosted glass.  Mantra does a pretty good job with presentation and atmosphere, but could use more friendly, helpful servers.
lunch review. More like a wine/beer joint..long nicely decorated bar with tables nestled all over.. located on a nice stretch of other restaurants on Emerson but definitely stands out due to the unique cuisine and rave reviews. hot pressed chicken tikka sandwich 12.   tasty..hummus really ties this dish together.. must come back for a better review but overall 3/5 judochops .. a great start
Came another time. Man, how I love their happy hours! I went with 3 other people cause I had to have them try it too. Had the risotto with shrimps and scallops with some type of curry sauce. I like it, but I wasn't quite in the mood for it. It was quite hot (temperature wise), so be careful when eating it. A friend had the same and enjoyed it. Another friend had the chicken tikka masala and it wasn't as sweet as the one I had and the beau had the filet mignon and he enjoyed his too. To dessert: I really love the chai creme brulee. The waiter was really knowledgeable about the food when I asked him whether the tikka masala was suppose to be sweet or not. He informed me that traditionally they put onions or sugar. He suggested the one I would like would be cream based. Very informative, me likes! I'd come back again and again, too bad it's not in SF. I'd go there almost every week until I get sick of it.
Initially, we were going to go to Gordon Biersch, but end up going here cause the happy hour caught... Read more 
I want to give it 4 stars, but it's a bit pricey for portions. My highlights are: great Happy Hour specials, it's close to my office on campus, so walking to the CalTrain after I've had a few is not a problem. The ambiance is good as well, I like sitting at the bar but it does get crowded rather quickly and there are no perching spots that are really good for groups of 5 or more... The service at the bar is good.  The waiter service has been good in the past.  I really like their black dal special and the fish dishes have been delicious.
Had dinner there on a Friday night. The bar was packed with happy hour crowd well past 8pm. The ambiance was warm and inviting, with nice decor. Service was friendly, albeit a bit slow for a not-fully-packed dining room. The menu is a collection of fusion and traditional Indian dishes, but the results were a bit uneven. Day boat scallop: Three good sized scallops grilled to perfection, with a nice char on the outside without over cooking it at all. The flavourful cauliflower puree offer just the right complement. Rajasthani Duck: Rather a disappointment. The duck breast was cooked nicely, sitting on a bed of braised napa and shiitake mushroom, which didn't quite work with the dish. The sauce is a somewhat watery and besides the paprika/chili, I can't say there are much flavour or depth there. Chicken tikka masala: Creamy, tasty but overall, standard. I did use the sauce for the duck, since its own sauce was so lacking. It's on the pricier side, as many have pointed out. One pays for the experience and the location but it's worth going back as long as you choose your dish wisely.
I tried Mantra for the first time last night and was pleasantly surprised.  I have passed by here many times and just never stopped.   I am glad that I did.  First I would like to thank our servers who were very gracious and took us in right before we closed, and let us stay for as long as we wanted, without pressuring us to leave.  They were very nice the entire time we were eating and very attentive. Second  they get bonus points for having a separate vegan menu, it's so nice not to have to ask a billion questions to find out what I can or can't eat.  Very nice perk.  Even better the vegan selection was not bland, The food was great, I highly recommend the eggplant potato side it was very flavorful and different from most dishes I have had.  I also recommend the tofu dish.  I have no idea what was in this but man was it good.  From the outside it looked bland but it was full of flavor and deliciousness.  Rot was nice and crisp..and the rice dish we had was also good. Moral of the story I would come back here.  They do have happy hour specials on food and drink so I recommend checking that out too.
Three and a half stars. You have to give Mantra props for what the chef's interpretation on Indian cuisine.  It's not an Indian fusion restaurant, so don't expect muted versions of Indian food catered for the Western palette.  The menu reads more as New American with undertones of Indian, where Indian spices and preparation belie the philosophy behind the cooking.  This genre of American cuisine has yet been unattempted by any restaurant, so if you come without expectations, you're bound to be pleasantly surprised. We started with the Shrimp Vinhaleaux, which was served three to a platter.  While the shrimp were marinated in chili and cinnamon, we could only taste the chili, which was generously encrusted on our overcooked shrimp.  In theory the tart flavors in the salad should have offset the sweet-spiciness of the shrimp, but the kitchen must have fallen short on execution that night. Next came our garlic and chili flake naan with the yellow lentil dal of the day.  Our naan was rolled a little thin and crunchy to the bite.  I wasn't sure if this was an intentional interpretation, but I found the naan so dry that I opted to order the dal to give us something to dip in.   The dal, a lentil soup, at Mantra was probably the most traditionally prepared Indian dish on the menu---don't miss it. We shared the Kashmiri Sea Bass entre and were told that it was the most popular item on the menu---and with good reason.  The flesh of the fish itself was fragrant with the marinade of cayenne pepper and mustard without the help of an accompanying sauce.  I could have eaten the filet sans mashed potatoes, sides, or accompaniments of any sort. We ordered the chocolate lava cake for dessert and were brought two mini cakes for the celebration of a birthday.  Dessert was average at best and I still prefer Delfina's bittersweet Scharffen Berger version. At 6pm, we had our pick of the lot and chose a table window-side 100 feet from the only other party seated at that time.  The lounge-feel of the dining room seemed out of place for the age demographic present that night, but then again it is Palo Alto. Our service was spotty and the waiters were uninformed about the menu.  I asked for a comparison between the Dover Sole and Kashmiri Sea Bass and was told that they were more or less the same, but the Sole was more "fishy" (way to sell the menu).  I asked what the dal of the day was and he told me "yellow lentil," without offering further explanation or clarification.  On more than one occasion, we found ourselves at a lost for servers and I don't think anyone asked me how my meal was all night.  If you're lucky, Ben, the manager, will be on the floor and he can come over and explain to you the intricacies of your meal at Mantra. If only for the sake of trying a new cuisine out, make sure you make Mantra a stop the next time in Palo Alto.
We went there on a Thursday for a colleague's farewell lunch. We were 20+ people and had a nice table arranged for us. Surprisingly, the restaurant seemed quite empty otherwise. The lunch menu had a few vegetarian options, and I went for the Paneer Wrap. This was cottage cheese wrapped in a naan, and served with a salad. The naan was nicely charred, the paneer was a little tough. Salad seemed a little stale The food seemed quite pricey and it might be worth its money during dinner, but I thought it was expensive for sure. Maybe not so much by Palo Alto standards. The desserts were really good. We tried the Chocolate Pyramid, which was definitely a 5. The other desert was just about OK. Food was average, but pricey. Service was above average. Probably won't visit here again.
Meh.  I've had far, far better Indian food at Darbar a few streets over.  The service was strangely spotty, and it doesn't seem that getting the price-fixe menu was the best move ever.   The combination of flavors on everything I had, from the saffron sea bass to the cauliflower soup to the rosemary creme bruele, all tasted *odd*. The decor is nice and it's a hip looking place, and being able to sit outside as the sun sets is pleasant. Still-- I wouldn't return to Mantra.  How it was voted among the top 100 restaurants in the Bay Area is beyond me.
I really enjoyed this place. Food and atmosphere. It's a nice restaurant but very casual in atmosphere so you don't feel like you have to be super polite or act 20 years older than your actual age (like other nice restaurants...) The lighting is perfect in here as well...not too dim and not too bright... We ordered the rosemary naan and mussels for appetizers. Both were delicious...especially the mussels. They were in this creamy tomato based sauce that Steve wanted to drink after the mussels were all gone.... Also i ordered their bellini fuzz (i think thats what it was called) which was really good... For our entrees I ordered the flank steak and Steve had the lamb chops. Both were excellent and very tasty.... in fact we didn't have to take anything back home because we both finished everything. We almost went to Morton's steakhouse but i'm glad we tried something new and ended up at this place. The prices aren't bad at all and it was a very enjoyable experience for us. GREAT LOCATION... (because its right next to fraiche yogurt)
I've only been here for lunch so don't let this review sway you if you're considering dinner - not that you would anyways.... The ambiance is nice, the view of their full bar alone is enough to make me want to come back. My co-worker and I had the lunch special, but the whole dining experience was a little overshadowed by the fact that we had to wait almost 25-30 mins. for the food and had to scurry back to work. Unfortunately, I don't remember what I had exactly so it must have not been all that memorable, it was good - not great, and for the price I'd opt for a more traditional Indian restaurant than this upscale one.  But if you're looking for fancy and Indian this is your place !
I went to Mantra in mid-July with a party of 8 and have the following comments, compiled from my dining companions: Positives... * Lamb Popsicles... suuuuuuuuper good. Ground lamb on a stick, great for dipping. * Exceptional tikka sauce on the chicken dish. * Hummus with Indian flavor. Imagine it. Then order it and taste for yourself. * It was easy to get a reservation on a Saturday night. * Cute twinkly lights outside. Negatives... * The food was good once they got it on the table but it took FOREVER. * It took 25 minutes after ordering for a glass of wine to be served. * Our meals came out one by one, taking a total of about 5 minutes to be delivered (8 people)... are they short on staff? Usually if it's a big party a restaurant will send a couple of servers over with the plates. * I found a long hair wrapped around my individual coffee pot :(
I was super excited when I saw them remodeling the building for this place.  I have been a big fan of Indian fusion since my first meal at Tabla in NYC and was thrilled to have a local spot opening up.  Upon arrival I was impressed by the swanky bar area which has cozy little alcoves for enjoying drinks.  However, the decor in the dining room is far less impressive and somewhat stark and corporate looking.  I have dined here twice and my experiences were quite different.  On the first occasion, I was extremely disappointed with the food....I can't remember what I ate....I must have blocked it out...but the restaurant had only been open for a few weeks so we were willing to give it another go.  The second trip was definitely better, but I still was not super impressed.  The portions are very small, not that it matters to me so much, but others were bothered. In short, I'm willing to give it one more chance, but so far I'm not wild about it and I think there are plenty of better place to go for the price.
I'm giving it more stars than I normally would because we went during happy hour, which is 50% off before 6:30pm.  It's pretty tough to beat that deal, since it includes anything on the menu except the tasting (entrees and bottles of wine are even half off).  I would NOT pay full price for this stuff, but otherwise, it's a great deal. There's both patio and bar/lounge seating.  The place is off University, so the patio isn't too noisy or crowded.  The lounge/bar area is very modern and doesn't feel like an Indian restaurant.  Everything is very clean and served on modern white dishes. We started with the kabob sampler (non vegetarian).  The lamb lollipop was my favorite - I really liked the tamarind sauce, but the sausage and chicken were so-so.  The chicken kabob was said to be all white meat but turned out to be thigh meat.  The scallops are a great deal - you end up getting 3 seared scallops for $6 after the discount.  They were seared nicely, but the flavors didn't really meld with the sauce, and it had a bit of a fishy after taste. I was hoping for the spicy jack naan to be fluffier, but it tastes more like a quesadilla (with very mild cheese) than something done in the tandoor oven.  The filet didn't seem like a typical cut of filet, as it had some weird fat distribution on it.  It was indeed tender, but questionably artificially so.  The shortrib was falling apart, which is good, and it sat on something reminiscent of polenta, but it was not extraordinary. Maybe we should have stuck with more of the traditional dishes?  In any case, it was all 50% off.  We also got a bottle of wine for only $14... not bad for a gruner veltliner from Austria.  It's nice when your bill says something like "total discount: $78.50". Definitely make it before 6:30pm if you'd like to go.  To give them credit, they were nice about asking for a last call for happy hour items, which I thought was a very nice gesture.
Expensive Indian food is not unappreciated -- after all, I thought Dosa on Valencia in the city was worth 4 stars.  However, Mantra's take on expensive Indian food was to spin the menu into a "fusion" of non-Indian influences which didn't meld well with the sauce-y and stew-y goodness that is characteristic of the subcontinent. We started off with the Mantra's Savories and Kebab Taste (vegetarian).  Although the description of this dish did not include samosas, our waiter assured us that we'd get a couple of the potato turnovers-- unfortunately, we should have trusted the menu (which changes monthly, or so) as, when the appetizer arrived, the samosas were not included.  However, the excellent paneer almost made up for that service misstep, as did the beet salad. The roasted cauliflower and organic white asparagus soup was brought out with great fanfare: an extra hot dish, empty but for lemongrass oil and daikon sprouts, and a tall pitcher filled with enough soup for 3 pours onto the dish.  There wasn't much flavor coming from the asparagus, but the creamy cauliflower was great in texture and taste. As the menu was decidedly un-Indian, it made sense to try out their take on Indian fusion.  I forget the name of the dish we ordered that contained lamb chops, but let me just say that the lamb chops were excellent -- flavorful, tender, robust.  But, definitely not Indian.  For myself, I ordered the pan roasted sablefish (cod, essentially).  The description suggested that the fillet would be served over a bed of tomato basil biryani, asparagus, mozzarella, and cardamom and peanut accented red curry.  The biryani was very small in portion, and tasted more like basil-tomato stew, while the only flavor coming from the curry was generic spicy.  Most disappointingly, the fish, while flakey and light, was completely lacking in taste -- extremely bland, indeed. It seems that Mantra does well with nice (but generic) dishes, such as the lamb chops.  However, their interpretations of classic Indian food leave much to the imagination -- suppose the sable fish had been marinated in cardamom and served over a proper biryani?  As such, I think this restaurant fails to impress me, and the "generic" dishes simply do not make up for the exorbitant cost.  Thank goodness they kept their regular naan completely traditional!
Speaking for the lounge area during happy hour: Absolutely LOVE LOVE LOVE this place!! Management is courteous and friendly, aura is chill, and food is GREAT ... a perfect end to a busy day at work! The bartenders are SUPER attentive and sweet; you gotta try the Melon Martini .. I AM hooked! As for happy hour - ends at 6:30pm where food's 1/2 off (not drinks): Rosemary Pest Naan - GOTTA try this! Garlic Naan - okay Lamb Kabobs - YUM! 3 Shrimps - ceviche is awesome Steak - good 'n seasoned, salad tastes a bit weird since it's salty Samosa - vegetarian but OH'SO tasty So yeah, you get the point .. I'll be returning with a bigger army soon. And they have live jazz bands from time to time, mainly on weekends.
My lunch was very tasty. I went with coworkers for a celebratory lunch, and I thought it was great.  Everything I tried was good.  I especially recommend the rosewater mojito. If you are trying to get in and out quickly, I don't recommend it, but then, what restaurant in (downtown) Palo Alto is quick?
Really fantastic happy hour special.  Everything at 50% off including there main entrees and drinks.  Definitely brings their High prices down to a reasonable level. Nice small strip of outdoor dining, with wide open windows for the indoor-outdoor feel. As to the food, it was interesting and at 50% off I would definitely come back and try a few more things.
My girlfriend and I went to Mantra last night.  The food was okay but the portions were small even though the menu said they were the "large" plates.  My gf got the Chicken Tiki Marsala which was pretty good but again the portion was small.  My gf asked "are you sure this is the large plate?"  haha  The waitress assured us that it was.  Otherwise it was good.  I ordered the Lamb chops which were very good.  The large plate was 4 lamb chops so be sure and eat before you arrive if you wish to get full.  We also ordered the garlic naan.  It was good but you can't really mess that up, can you?  I made a reservation at 10:30pm but was called back by Mantra and was asked if we could change it to 10pm as that was when the kitchen closes.  The wait staff was very attentive but that may have been because there were not too many people eating as it was to close in an hour. Bottom line, would I go there again?  Yes if we had a groupon.
Decided to check out Mantra on a Wednesday night after work around 7.  We sat at the bar cause there were no tables available till 8:30!!! First impression as you walk in, soft, loungey feel with glowing candles. Soft greens and peaches dominate the bar area (There's a little seating area with inset seating and low tables where you can also relax and eat).  The visual impact is very soothing without being bland.    I checked out the paintings and they seem to complement the color scheme without being overly jarring to the eye or interfering with your meal because the colors are so disturbing. We had drinks at the Daru Lounge. Daru=alcohol. Cute.  I ordered a ginger-lemon drop and then a dirty martini and my guy ordered Jack on ice.  The bartender was great-told us little tips about how to make a great martini (shake until your fingers go numb and the top of your martini should have a little skin of ice) and was very accomodating when I asked him to make my martini 'dirtier'.  The bartenders and servers seemed a bit rushed as someone would come every few seconds with a drink order. Food-wise I started with the spring onion and garlic soup with smoked tomato custard and grilled asparagus.   oh my god.   It came out with a plate of a meticulously plated lone asparagus(truth in advertising- it there werre more, it would have said asparagi, right??)and a little (I do mean little) mound of smoked custard with a single morel on top.  The waiter then brought out the soup in a white china tea kettle and poured it lavishly over the custard and asparagus.  Divine melding of flavors.....it was worth every dollar just for the morel alone. Like other reviewers have mentioned, the Thai tofu dish was great...spicy! On the carnivourous side-the lamb kabobs were just so so (not as good as Chutneys, according to my date.) The wild salmon was also a hit- he noted he liked the beet puree that accompanied the salmon- and he is not a beet guy. Dessert-we had the hazelnut and chocolate "parfait".   It basically was a semifreddo with hazelnut essence and nuts throughout and swirls of chocolate to the side.  If there was chocolate in the "parfait", I couldn't taste it.  But it was refreshing and not too heavy. We paid about $120 overall for all the drinks and the food. A bit pricey for a weeknight dinner, but it's always nice to find a place like this near the office.
Went here last night for an informal after work get together, and we were treated like close friends of the family by all the staff. So friendly! Awesome happy hour, with tons of different small plate options, as well as specials on mixed drinks, beer, and wine. Which was great, simply because we needed a place that would cater to everyone. And it totally did. I'd love to come back for dinner sometime; the yellow dal and basil rosemary naan were really good.
I give this place only 3 stars because I think it's a bit too expensive for food that isn't super spectacular and ambiance that is just average. I do think the food was good...I had lamb chops and my friend had one of the specials, which was beef.  We both got them cooked medium rare...I feel like they overcooked mine a tad, but it was still very tastey.  His piece of beef was ginormous...he couldnt even finish it all.  My dish was only two little lamb chops :(  It was enough for me that night though since I wasn't that hungry.  I also had their strawberry mint cocktail - I liked it, but nothing out of the ordinary.  We opted to get dessert elsewhere. I really didn't think the ambience at the place was nice at all...especially for the menu prices.  It didn't feel like I was at top-notch restaurant.  I also really do not like the salmon color they chose to paint the interior of the dining area....looks so cheap!!  I think the bar area looks a lot cooler. Eating here once is good enough for me....won't be going back.
I went to Mantra twice in the span of the last week and a half, once with friends, once for a business dinner. The first thing I noticed going in both times was how empty the place was, slightly disconcerting but not alarming. In my experience, the service is great: friendly, professional, attentive. Timing was a bit strange: on the first visit, entrees were out in record time, while on the second visit, our basket of naan appeared and got cold by the time the rest of our food arrived. Food, on the other hand, is absolutely outstanding. I had a chance to try almost half of the main dishes on the menu, and every last one was outstanding. Some of the dishes aren't particularly Indian in flavor - I would dare say that Mantra leans a little bit more towards "inspired" than "fusion" - but flavors and presentations were all spot-on. Plates are serious works of art. Order your meats a little less well-done than you would otherwise. The desserts were absolutely gorgeous, but I didn't really see any cohesion: mine, the chocolate charlotte, had a pineapple-jalapeno salsa all the way on the other end of the plate that seemed to be wondering what exactly it was doing there. Make no mistake, it was all delicious, just like the rest of the food, but it just didn't seem right. The wine list struck me as having a quirky selection and a slightly inflated markup. We had a bottle of J Russian River Pinot 2006 for $64 when it retails in the low $30s. There's a lot of French wine on the list - which is totally cool - but the selections and price ranges are pretty random. In any case, the list is very comprehensive. Four stars, since it's a totally spectacular experience but is just a tad too pricy and is missing a few details.
Used to be really good especially their to-go boxes for lunch. Then prices went up and quality went way way down. I have decided not to go there anymore and go to Darbar instead.
Came here for a fabulous evening out with my girlfriends and wasn't the slightest bit disappointed! In addition to some very unexpected and perfectly done crispy greens the service from our server Alexis was top notch. She was attentive, pleasant and gave us the best advice when it came to drinks, food and especially dessert! We are already talking about going back! Thanks for the good food and great service.
While the inside of the restaurant has nice ambience, the food was not good, I'd put it below average actually.  I just love indian food and considering the choices of Indian restaurants in the Bay Area, there's no reason to eat there again.
We love the food at Mantra that once every few weeks we have to come back for it. My favorite is the lamb, and it is among the best lamb I have had. It is very juicy, tender and full of wonderful spices. The tandoori seabass is also very very good. The restaurant has a very popular bar lounge, which makes it a bit too loud sometimes. Service is good in general. Parking in the area can be difficult. We will continue to come back since they are on our passport dinning card which offers second entree free!
Although it was good, I didn't think the food was very special.  The decor and atmosphere is very impressive, though.  On a busier night (I went on Easter Sunday), I'm sure it could be a lot of fun. I had the seared foie gras and bread basket as appetizers.  The foie gras was delicious: two generous pieces of seared foie gras, pear compote, and truffle ice cream.  The flavors were rich and well balanced.  The bread basket, on the other hand, was a little disappointing.  The description said bread with lamb and tamarind sauce.  The lamb was nearly non existent and I feel like the plate was just too similar to the complimentary bread they start you out with.  My mistake. For the entree, I ordered lamb and my boyfriend ordered the duck.  He and I have very different taste in food.  Ironically, we ended up liking the other person's plate much more than our own.  I thought the lamb was just standard fare; it was marinated and grilled, served with chorizo and risotto. The chocolate sauce in the description made it sound very enticing, but it was overpowered by the flavor of the lamb. The duck, however, had a very interesting earthy taste to it.  Too bad I only had a bite. Creme brulee was awesome.  The lemongrass flavor and berry compote went very well together. Service was polite, but a little cold.  Besides the owner walking around asking customers if everything was satisfactory, our server seemed to just be doing the minimal.  And that's fine.  I'm not looking for my server to be my best friend, but a smile once in a while is appreciated.  It was just a big contrast to the service I had at Xanh in Mt. View a few days ago.  Everything was a little more cozy and the hostess was very friendly.  She even sat down and started making conversation with us.  I think a restaurant can be hip but down to earth at the same time.
Manta absolutely blew me away. This off the beaten path indian fusion restaurant delivers far beyond it's empty interior. As I met a collegue for lunch, I questioned how good the food might be based upon how few people were there. But, was pleasantly surprised to be absolutely blown away by a fantastic chicken curry dish and some of the best naan I have ever had. It's a couple of blocks off of the university strip, but worth the quick stroll down emerson.
This place has a really cool vibe to it.  It definitely has "nicer restaurant" feel to it, but it is kind of lounge-y at the same time.  The dinner menu here looks great so I am already planning a second trip to Mantra since I came here for lunch today.  The food was great - the prices are beyond reasonable (for lunch) and they had some great daily specials.  The presentation of the food is also artful and colorful which makes your dining experience that much more pleasurable. The flavored naan was great - we tried them all (beauty of going places in a large group) I really liked the one with goat cheese in it.  Most of us got the chicken curry lunch special and everyone was a fan.
Mantra is an eclectic addition to the Palo Alto restaurant scene. I agree with previous posters that this is more of a fusion restaurant than a traditional Indian one. I'm fine with that. A friend and I met here for drinks at the bar and ended up having dinner there as well. Overall, I thought it was a bit pricey. However, the inventiveness of the cuisine deserves some credit. The lamb kebab and  ahi tuna appetizer were simple in execution and powerful in taste, but not overwhelmingly so. The sea bass entree had potential, but lacked that powerhouse of taste due to the raw spice mixture used. If  the spice mixture was cooked a bit more, the flavors would have come alive in this one. Kulfi for dessert was bland, but the consistency was light enough to not overwhelm our stomachs at the end of our grazing. Don't come here expecting authentic Indian cuisine. Come with an adventure in mind and you'll be fine.
I've only been to Mantra once, and it was awesome (it could have been b/c of the cocktails, but I prefer to disregard that)! I sat at the bar and the bartender was really nice and friendly. We didn't know, when we first got there, but the bartender told us that if we waited until 9:30pm, we would get half price appetizers, SWEET! Apparently they have two happy hours daily one from 4:30 to 6:30 and one from 9:30 to closing, where you get half price appetizers...although the drinks are still pretty expensive. The decor of the place is really nice as well as the bar and it is dark and a great place for a date! We got a plate with various shrimp, which was pretty good as well as a plate with a bunch of different samplers (the fish was AWESOME). I definitely want to go back here soon!
Excellent dining experience for our anniversary a few weeks back. My fiancee planned the meal in advance as a surprise though and there were problems there. Mantra never called back to plan the menu and that was a bit frustrating. Once we got there though it went without a hitch but they need to offer a perfect experience start - finish or people can consider cancelling all together. The flavour was very unique as were the items we enjoyed. Expensive though. For the hard core Indians who will go there and complain about how it isn't really Indian be warned that it is Indian Inspired, i.e.  Indian Fusion and unlike Dosa in the city they are more than proud of this label.
My fiance hates Indian food, but I asked to come here, and he was obliged. The ambiance was really nice and the food was amazing.  We had a vegetarian appetizer platter which included some samosas, fingerling potatoes and some Indian cheese.  Wonderful start to our dinner!  I had the sea bass for my entree, and the man had Mantra Bhuna Lamb.  Both were soooo good, and my fiance left that place saying that he "LOVED" the restaurant! So why 4 and not 5 stars?  The service was really slow--it took us 15 minutes to get our drinks.  The pricing was fine for me, the food was excellent, but I wish that the service had just been a bit quicker.  It was just slow enough for you to get irked...but other than that, I really do highly recommend this restaurant, whether you love Indian food or not!
Went to Mantra for a date on a Thursday evening.  We arrived 30 minutes early for our reservation and they had an event going on, but they were happy to seat us in their lounge area until the appropriate time.  We ordered drinks and appetizers, which we then took with us to our dinner table when we moved.  The drinks were good, appetizers (Naanizza, I think they called it) were nothing to rave about. For dinner, we both decided to go with their Autumn Tasting Menu.  I had the Spinach and Fuji Apple Salad with Apple Cider Vinaigrette, which could've been great, but they under-dressed it and then added, of all things, egg yolks.  The egg yolks destroyed the texture of the salad and dried it out so much that I didn't even want to finish it, which almost never happens.  If I had wanted a Cobb Salad, I would've gone somewhere else. The second course was Cauliflower and White Asparagus Soup, which was very good.  I could've easily eaten a second bowl of this. The third course was a Duck Breast with Braised Napa Cabbage and Shiitake Mushrooms.  I really wanted to like this, but I just couldn't handle the overpowering flavors.  The duck itself was good, but the cabbage tasted pickled and more like kimchi than anything else.  On top of it all was a sauce that tasted like they just couldn't figure out what they wanted it to be - a little sour, a little sweet, a little spicy, a little Indian, a little not.  It just didn't work for me and I tried to eat the duck without having it touch anything else on the plate. Dessert was a Chai Spiced Creme Brulee, which deserves two thumbs up.  I liked it a lot. So, overall, I want to give this place about 2.5 stars, but am going with 3 because the two dishes that I did like were quite good and I would go back for.  I just wish they would taste their food before putting it out on the tables.
Mark behind the bar is adorable. Not only did he put up with our shenanigans our whole stay, but he was also very social and took such good care of us. For a Saturday, it was a nicely sized crowd. We worked that 50% off happy hour so hard we were just short of screaming at the tab- taking into account if it was at full price. Aside from the two bottles of wine, the Margarita Royal was alright. We ate just about every appetizer on the menu, and its quite a selection. It was all so good. My only complaint is parking- hard to catch. And taking into account where we sat at the bar (corner closest to the entrance) people would crowd behind us as the night carried on. And the gust of chill would hit everytime the door opened.
We went back for another try with a heavily discounted gift certificate from http://restaurant.com .  Matra has made some nice physical improvements to the space, great decor and vibe.  The service was very good.  Staff was responsive and friendly.  The food was the only thing negative about our dinner.  Unfortunately, it is the most important.  If you stick to the 'fusion' dishes, you are OK.  If you stray to the Indian..not so good.  Additionally, for the price that is charged relative to the quality of the food we feel like it's a bad deal.  I agree with the other reviews that without some type of coupon or happy hour 50% deal, it is not worth going.  The other exception is if you're only coming for drinks...it's a good bar scene.
We went to Mantra this week for Happy Hour.  It was a bit of a let down as we haven't been to their... Read more 
Our server was very friendly and helpful, recommended the Chana chat poppers if we wanted something lighter than the samosas. The poppers were awesome! Reminded me a bit of pani poori. Chickpeas and chutney and mint sauce in a crisp shell. Yum! Dip and naan was great too, wasn't so taken with the garlic hummus but the eggplant and cashew curry especially were VERY gd, with naan. Quinoa kofta curry was gd too! Curry was a little similar to the cashew curry but with more spices. 6 koftas in a large order! One was really filling as it was. Mantra seabass was cooked v well too, my friend was in seventh heaven after tasting it and declared it is a dish worth eating. Cauliflower puree had both my friends swooning in delight! I found it a bit rich after a couple of spoonfuls, but def yummy... 2 appetizers n 2 entrees was def enough for 3 of us. http://Restaurant.com certain made it a really gd deal! Highly recommended :) nice ambiance too.
Great Food, Horrible Service! We waited for more than an hour (only because we had a Groupon that was expiring that day) to get our first appetizer and then it took another 45 minutes to get the rest of the order. However, we never got our Paneer Tikka... Food no doubt was delicious but who has the time to sit and wait especially when you go out with a toddler. :(
I had a http://restaurant.com $25 gift certificate (discounted to $2 last year), and decided to go out to eat.  Mantra has been on my list to try for a few months. We walked in, were seated immediately in a great table, and had water.  Service was prompt throughout -- water kept full, plates cleared without being obtrusive, etc. It was still a little pricey -- $95 for 2 people with 2 drinks, 2 appetizers, and 2 entrees.   Add tip, subtract $25, still kind of ouch, but I guess it is Palo Alto.  The lamb, in particular, was excellent, and cinnamon shrimp was also good. I'll probably go back on a Sunday or Monday for the tasting menu -- both veg and non-veg options, and what look like very good wine pairings, for a fairly reasonable price.
Let me start off by saying I'm so sad that this place isn't more busy! Maybe it's because it's off the main drag and no one knows about it, but go here! The food is great, the service is great, and they have everything 50% off during happy hours!!!! I've been here a few times in the past 6 months, and always the wait-staff has been sweet and attentive (like when I found a fly in my drink...ewe, but it happens). The duck with goat cheese risotto was out of this world (and I hate goat cheese). The braised short ribs were pretty darn good, too. If you're a big fan of traditional Indian fare, you might be a little disappointed since it's mostly fusion, but the twists and turns are worthy of any discernible palette. Lastly, Mantra is located right next to Fraiche...if that isn't incentive enough I don't know what is.
Loved the food. Took away one star because the price is a little steep for the portion size. But will definately go back. Loved the ambience too. Thinking about it is making me hungry again....!
I have been to Mantra twice, once for a birthday party and then second time was for a nice dinner in Palo Alto. For my second visit, I used a http://Restaurant.com gift certificate, and I'm so thankful I did because food would have been pricey for what we had. First off, this is a great place if you are trying to impress someone, such as business colleagues or a date. Service is superb and friendly, and ambiance is warm and intimate, yet modern and trendy too. I feel most of their dishes are not too out of the ordinary and can be found at other Indian restaurants. They do, however, have a small selection of their original dishes. I ordered the scallops and I wasn't a fan. There was an aftertaste that was not appetizing. However, I ordered the Paneer Ravioli, and that was deliciously yummy because I love paneer. Overall, you're paying for the ambiance and service. Food is good, but you can probably enjoy most of the same stuff elsewhere. I would highly recommend using a gift certificate from http://restaurant.com so your bill isn't too high.
The initial plan was to come here for Happy Hour.  Unless you live right on top of the restaurant ... it's best to go early to accommodate for parking.  I drove around Emerson for what felt like for-evah. I walked in and saw how big of a group it was, I decided to just have dinner in the dining area.  It was already 6:15PM.  God I'm lazy and impatient. I ordered the hummus, samosas and chicken tikka masala.  I really liked them all!  The samosas soo did not taste/smell like armpit.  It was soo yummy!  I also ordered the Jussara drink which was good too.  I got a little happy 1/8th of the way through. My date for the evening ordered the shrimp risotto.  Ohh, that was soo good too.  How did I figure it was good?  He only let me have exactly one bite.
Based on visits on 4/10 and 4/19, 2010: Food - 3 stars (tasty, but inconsistently flavored visit-to-visit) Wine - 3 stars (very extensive drink list, but I have yet to find a world-class pick) Service  - 4 stars (main servers are excellent, bussers not as polite) Atmosphere - 4 stars (quintessential Palo Alto hip off the beaten path so it's not overly busy) Overall score:  3 stars Food experience: -  Food on weekday visit was MUCH spicier than weekend visit.  I actually had to send the entree back. Perhaps different chefs?  The same dish should not be so dramatically different on the weekeday vs. weekend. - Scallop appetizer was delicious, but slightly undercooked on 2nd (weekday) visit. - Seafood risotto was delicious, when it didn't burn to swallow (yes, I had this dish twice on Trips 1 & 2), but there is nothing Indian, or Indian fusion about it.  Minus points for lack of Indian authenticity of, but plus points for taste. - Wine choice was too acidic (too young?) on the first visit, too watery on the 2nd. - Dessert portions small, but there are at least 7 options. - Appetizer portions small - but can add additional morsels for more $ (e.g. add 1 more scallop or lamb lollipop for the table to share if you have more than the 3 the dish comes with) Price:  $$$ - Paid $125 for 3 people for 2 glasses of wine (total), 2 appetizers, 3 entrees, naan, rice, 1 dessert to share.  Not including tip.  Thank goodness for Groupon offer ($50 for $20). Service Experience: - cordial, knowledgeable, experienced waiters with an eye for detail and attentive to our table - bussers/water server could use a lesson in manners, and appeared to not speak very much English.  Appetizers were delivered and used plates were removed without a single word.  Server refused to leave a water pticher but did not seem happy to have to keep returning to our table despite our warnings to him that we needed it due to spiciness of food. Atmosphere Experience: -  Clean, trendy Indian fusion decor- very quintessential Palo Alto. -  Off Emerson, so not as noisy and crowded as some of the University restaurants can be. I wish I could give this place 4 stars - but based on the inconsistency in food, service, and higher end price point, I already feel generous bearing 3.  I'm probably more cynical because the 2nd experience did not live up to expectations from the 1st.  It was even more disappointing b/c the 2nd visit was with a special out of town family member.
I love their naan, drinks, and all meat appetizers. We get Mantra at our company lunches and the food is so good! The place is adorable and chic- so downtown Palo Alto.. and they have a decent happy hour. I'm not an Indian food connoisseur so I'm not sure about authenticity or anything- but I know it makes my tastebuds tingle and dance with joy.
Is it fair for three of us (Victoria S., Dominic B.) to each write a 5 star review about this restaurant from the same visit? I think so. Our server, Henry, was phenomenal. Service with a smile: just the way I like it. He also had excellent menu recommendations that didn't lead us astray. For my entree I chose the Dry Rubbed Filet Mignon (with Henry's help). It came with the most unexpected mix of Indian spices and herbs. I'm not big on spicy, and that's one thing this dish was. Mid-way into my meal it felt like there were fireworks going on in my mouth. Out of water, I found myself searching the table for any liquid I could find to put out the fire. But, pleasure is pain, and having sampled most of the dishes on the table, I wouldn't hesitate to order the Filet Mignon again next time.
Judging from the other reviews, I'm pretty sure this place is entirely based on what dishes you ordered. I'm also pretty sure I wouldn't be as happy with the Indian fusion dishes as most fusion dishes are usually "meh". We came here with a Groupon ($50) and proceed to order ($50) worth of food. We ordered the lamp lollipop appetizer, chicken tikka masala and shrimp curry as well as 1 order of normal Nahn, 1 order of Garlic Nahn and 1 order of rice. The lamp lollipop (3) were unique and the mushrooms were delicious but I'm not too sure if was worth it's price tag of $10. However, it does beat out the other expensive appetizers I had at other places so if you have to have an appetizer, I will recommend. The chicken tikka masala ($16) was delicious. It is creamy, spiced well and very distinct. I have not said this about any dish in ages but I would go back just for the masala. The shrimp curry was also very good ($17) but a tad bit spicier than my taste buds. Nonetheless,the shrimp was large and tender. Clearly, they did not skimp on raw material. If I would do again, I would skip the rice, order the curry and do the garlic nahn (the nonplain one is just plain... they're all the same price $3) The curry is like other Indian restaurants but with a higher price tag and better quality. I wouldn't mind coming again for just those two dishes :D Service, btw, was very good. It's not personable but they're fast on refilling your water and even changing your plates!
2nd trip to this place. The first time wasn't horrible, but definitely not memorable. Sampled: calamari (salty, over-fried, and oddly fishy tasting), battered/fried spinach (tasty and highlight of the evening, but fried spinach seems so wrong...), and rosemary naan (burnt.) Meh.
The verdict: beautiful space, ok food. Went here on a http://restaurant.com coupon. The service is... Read more 
This is a fabulous restaurant. My husband have dined here a couple of times and living in Campbell, we don't get to Palo Alto much, but when we do, we go to Mantra. First I love how the bar is seperated from the dining room - it's big enough to have a completely seperate experience, sit and enjoy some of the great specialized martini's and pick up a few tasty apps. If you do choose to dine - the room has a warm and welcoming ambiance. Each menu item is fantastic and tastes like it has been stewing all day to achieve such intense flavors. Mantra also has a pretty good wine selection.
Saturday night dinner with another couple. It was a refreshing choice for westernized/ modern Indian food. I love the fact that there are healthier options, such as wheat roti/ organic beets salad etc. I love the carrot ginger soup, and it was done just right, good balance of all the key ingredients. My entree was the duck and it wasnt bad, but i was expected more crispy, it was on the drier front/ more cooked. Desserts was super, chocolate lava cake with cardamon. All of which was washed down with a mango Lassi.. which is like a shake.
I believe I have now tried every single thing on the menu, no joke (food that is, only a few of the cocktails) Mantra gets 4 stars for the fish dishes alone. They are spectacular. Right now I believe it is the tandoori sea bass and the corvina bass, although they change these around over time. The vegetarian options are pretty weak however, I love Indian veg food and don't love any of the Indian veg options here. We sit at the bar often; there is an Asian bartender, I am blanking on his name, that is FANTASTIC - excellent service, really nice guy. Overall -- great ambiance, nice cocktail and wine selection, spectacular fish dishes, very comprehensive and unique starter menu, and good service. Junnoon and Darbar, on the other hand (two other Indian food options in PA) are a waste of money. Mantra is 5 stars compared to those 2.
Can't beat happy hour prices to ease the bite of a recession.  The pomegranite crush was a nice cocktail as our friendly waiter advised it would be a good combo of sweet and tart.  Nice and strong. The apps (which btw were 50% off for HH): goat cheese on grapeleaf - meh; It tasted like spicy goat cheese.  The chicken tikka kabobs were good, moist chicken and perfectly seasoned and yummy when thrown in between a piece of naan.  Naan was a bit on the overly oiled side, but good texture and flavor.  Pizza - interesting and unexpected concept at an Indian place, but it is indian fusion after all. All in all, what you'd expect for a fusion place.  I would give it 3 stars for the food, but the ambience is great and the cocktails were spot on. Would definitely go back for happy hour.
3.5 Stars Considering I don't really like saucy foods, this place was ok.  I do have to say that the items I ordered weren't exactly ethnic though... Naan is good.  Samosas are good.  That's about all the Indian fare I had!  :P The fuji apple hamachi salad was yummy with a surprising bite to it from the chili.  I also had the tomato soup- good but a little too salty.  This is really a 3.5 star rating.  Next time I'll try something more ethnic...
I had an opportunity to come back here last Thursday with a friend for the bar crawl that Yelp had and i came here 3 years ago and was not impressed by the food. Especially the chicken dishes. When i dined here 3 years ago it was such a turn off b/c the way they make food here is not authentic at all. The chicken dishes we ordered tasted like they were boiled not at all tandoori style like it's supposed to be. So, 3 years later, last Thursday, i ordered some food here with my credits and and ordered chicken tikka kebabos and i have to say it reminded me of the type of food i had here 3 years ago. No spice, not even mildly and the chicken was yuck! The samosas and naan were good, but you really can't go wrong with samosas and naan. I was reminded why i never came back. Sorry!
Being an Indian I am very picky about good Indian food. I loved this place. I took my husband for a surprise dinner on his birthday. I booked the table and told them it's his birthday when they asked. I liked the little twist to the Indian taste in Fusion. Loved the Lychee drink ( blue Lychee) and the ravioli. The chicken was awesome too. Towards the end they got us a small cake with a candle for him and a dessert for me. The cheesecake was lovely with raspberry syrup and the pineapple tart ( for me) was good too. I would have been happy to pay for the dessert but they just wished him and said it's on the house. Loved the ambiance, the live music and the food. Would surely go there.
Mantra Was Excellent -  - Today We had dinner there and it was a bit crowded and noisey. We had a table close to the end of the bar. So one star off for bad ambience. Unless you are a bar person. The food was excellent, my date had the Pan Roasted Sablefish 'Sustainable' Fillet of Chili Marinated Sablefish, Tomato Basil Biryani, Asparagus, Mozzarella, Cardamom and Peanut accented Red Curry Sauce I had the Scallops and Prawns Risotto Red Curry and Cashew spiced Risotto, Marscapone Cheese, Shiitake Mushrooms. The food was excellent. Spicey but not overpowering the delicate taste of the entrees. We plan on going there again.
A great Indian (fusion) place in the heart of down town Palo Alto!!! My husband and I moved to the Bay Area 2 1/2 years back and were still looking for a decent Indian place that offered more than just everyday Indian food that could be found in average Indian restaurants. This place came as a pleasant surprsie. The food is not really authentic Indian -- it is what you can call a Chef's delight. A very innovative menu influenced by different cuisines and made with Indian spices and techniques. It is an upscale restaurant. The ambiance is great, the food is delicious. We tried the biryani (very good), sea bass (excellent), chicken tikka masala (good), lamb curry ( good), veg appetizers (ooh),  and the raita. The deserts are rich and yummy, and not the typical Indian deserts. But they do offer a few popular Indian deserts  too. The restaurant doesn't offer many veg dishes  -- so if you are a vegetarian I wouldn't recommend this place. A great gem for an upscale Indian restaurant. Highly recommend.
I wish there was a way I could give this place a 3.5 stars.  It was one of those situations where I went here with sky high expectations, which ultimately weren't met, but the dinner was still very good. The wine list is amazing.  There options for every taste and price range.  Great selection of international wines. We had the Paneer Cuboid and Scallop appetizers.  I'm not sure what the cheese was stuffed with, but whatever it was, it was very flavorful.  It tasted and felt like some sort of ground meat, but I'm pretty sure it was  vegetarian.  It was one of those dishes that I've never had before and really liked it.  Don't remember the scallops much. For our entrees we got the braised short ribs and a lamb dish that came on a bed of wide noodles.  The lamb was a bit disappointing.  It was very dry.  The short rib was awesome.  All of the spices were amazing and the whole thing was perfect on a bed of soft polenta.  The only thing I would say negative about the short rib was that it was too small.  If that's all I got as an entree, I would have left hungry.  I filled up eating the fat noodles from our lamb dish. Service was very mediocre.  We had to fill our own wine glasses and it took 45 minutes for our entrees to arrive from when we first sat down. I think I was expecting something like a Tabla in New York City.  It certainly didn't compare to that but was still good.
Great spot!  The food was amazing, service was outstanding and the cocktails were 50% off during happy hour. We ordered lamb samosas, chicken curry, seafood curry, along with some sides, we were happy happy happy. Can't wait to visit again.  Next time I'd like to try the lunch buffet.  btw The pepper jack naan is the bomb!
the food here is pretty bomb, spicy and delicous, and a good taste in music!!! check it out!!!!! IT'LL HAVE U CRAVING FOR MORE!!!!!!!
I've been to Mantra twice so far and each time have been duly impressed. Although the menu is rather irregular for Indian fare, there are some traditional items (curries and naan, for instance) as well as an array delicious fusion items. The homestyle chicken curry and paneer ravioli are absolutely delectable. The naan are perfectly savory and soft. Given the lovely interior decor, primo location right off University Ave, and great food and drink options, I was surprised at the affordability of Mantra. Most dishes are around $15-18 for a full dish (the half dishes, which I think can comfortably feed one, are around $9). Even without reservations, we've always been seated immediately, the service has been quick and the staff courteous. Honestly I've had no complaints and can't wait to go back a third time!
A neat spot! We loved the food -- everything was delicious. Love the free wi-fi! The service was fantastic! Someone was always there filling up water glasses or refilling wine. I only have two complaints: 1. You only get 4 pieces of nana when you order it. You end up having to order 2-3 orders just to make it last for your meal 2. Lighting is pretty awful. Unless you are tucked in a corner that top lighting makes everyone look bad. Thanks for a great evening!
The best happy hour deals anywhere, EVER! I mean.... $3 for a lamb chop? Unbelievable...and really, really good!
First, a disclaimer: Mantra is not an Indian restaurant. It is a fusion restaurant, and it falls far more on the California side than on the Indian side, at least to this reviewer. Mantra should lose the high-concept restaurant drag and became an upscale bar with chaat. The bartender was great: friendly and enthusiastic, he not only cheered those of us who had chosen the beautifully tart pomegranite martinis (a house cocktail), but he improvised a hot toddy for an under-the-weather friend with aplomb. The pani puri ($7) was also great, despite being called "Mantra chips" and being listed only on the bar menu. Lamb kebab ($10) was good: three pieces of skewer-cooked lamb and two pieces of lamb kibbeh (or something very similar), served with sauces that paid homage to chutney. Cauliflower soup ($7) smelled heavenly and tasted quite good, to boot. Our other small plate, achari tuna ($12?), looked and tasted like tuna tataki and salad, with nary a hint of mustardy achar-style deliciousness. The large plates, chicken mollee ($20) and kashmiri sea bass ($24), were completely forgettable: the flavors wiped each other out rather than complementing each other or layering. The entire menu is too expensive by $2-$4 per item. Breads, at about $4 were a key offender: not only too expensive, but not very flavorful due to a lack of fillings.  If onion-paneer-olive-goat cheese naan ($4.50) tastes like plain naan, there's something wrong. Other that the bartender, service was attentive but not all there: frequent contact with the table doesn't really make up for the mistakes of inexperience, like when our waiter insisted over our clear lack of interest that our small and large plates be presented in two courses but the food nonetheless arrived in little bursts throughout the evening. I would go back for a drink and some pani puri if I find myself in Palo Alto with money to burn, but I won't be back for dinner.
Visited for the first time on Valentines and had an incredible meal and live music. It was fixed prix and offered wine pairing. The steward is skillful and offered us wine from many region across the globe. The service was attentive but not hovering. I would go again.
The food in this place is good but pricey. My husband and I took a friend who was visiting to dinner in mid-Feb -  we walked in 1/2 hr before our reservation and were seated within 10 minutes. They were very attentive and considerate -- put us by the gas fireplace because they could see i was freezing! Appetizers - I had the paneer cube which was very nicely presented, the and a good contrast of flavors outside in,  and it was surprisingly filling. My husband  had chicken tikka - also very savory - not overcooked red tandoori chicken which was a nice surprise. Reminds me of good wedding food I've had. The appetizers were large. For a main, two of us went traditional --  lamb curry (forgot what it was called)  and vegetable jalfrezi-type dish. The lamb curry was hot, hot, hot! And sooo very good. I was full and couldn't stop eating! The vegetable jalfrezi was tangy and not as spicy but very savory. My husband had the sea bass and loved it. You gotta love flavor and spice to appreciate the food. Hey look, this is not your standard Indian restaurant -- if you want that, go to Darbar on Lytton (standard fare, good prices). This is californian noveau indian cusine. If you like Devi (NYC) you'll like this place. Great atmosphere, nice art, good drinks. Pricey -- but worth it. The night we went the server was a little off her stride, quirky but got us our food in a timely manner. I will definitely go back, and bring friends. It's a very cool place to hang out.
FANtastic Indian fusion food.  We came here for dinner and had just unbelievably tasty food.  Great decor and atmosphere, no wait, and delicious food.  Not "authentic" by any means, but this is another example that adaptations and alterations are often superior to the original inspiration.  The flank steak appetizer was brilliant; don't get me wrong, I love Indian, but what other Indian restaurant could possibly offer a menu item like that?  The Sea Bass had amazing taste - perhaps even a little too much taste after a little while, which is why I'm reserving the 5th star. I would definitely come here again and bring a date, friend, visitor, etc.
We really enjoyed the ambiance and the food first time around but had a very bad experience with our waiter.  I got a phone call from the GM (or owner I cannot remember) after reading our post on Yelp.  I decided to come back with a large group from work.  This time around the service was strong and the food was good.  I love Mantra's Indian food with California flair. And, thanks for the justice, Yelp!  We will go back to Mantra.
Food was excellent.  A near-fine dining twist on traditional Indian.  The ambiance was nice as well.... Read more 
OMG! That is what I have to say about Mantra. This place is very delicious and will have you salivating just by reading the menu. I came here with four other people because my friend had a Groupon to here (which by the way are very helpful come bill time). The atmosphere is cute and intimate which is perfect for those of you who are looking for good date spot. When you are trying to pick out what you want from the menu, I will say the Paneer 'Ravioli' is superb. Just by the sheer emptiness of the others plates, I could tell they enjoyed it as much as I did. I will definitely be going back to Mantra because there are so many dishes I have to try. Just be sure to try to get your hands on a Groupon because it can get pricey, but you will not be disappointed!
After many years of using Yelp as my go to guide for all things I've decided to finally give back to the community with my first review ;) I had heard mixed reviews about Mantra about 3 years ago - but after reading some of the more recent reviews thought I'd give it a try and suggested it for some snacks and dessert tonight. We ordered: -Paneer Cuboid & Autumn Vegetable Salad (I think I expected more beets + less paneer - but overall it was a good dish - could have done without the vegetable salad despite the fact that I love beets but cuboid of paneer was delicious) -Handmade Vegetarian Samosas (definitely not a traditional samosa - but done well and very flavorful) -Spicy eggplant and potato side (my favorite thing we ordered - it was definitely spicy, but so so good) -Dark Chocolate Cheesecake (not super rich that you normally think of a cheesecake, which I liked - good flavors, liked the blackberry sauce and the crust) -lastly we ordered Chai tea...came in a tea bag - ugh. Definitely not what I was looking forward to... would definitely go again, but I'm not running back to try more...
Went two more times since this review. The second time, the service was TERRIBLE. It was probably the worst service I'd ever encountered. The waitress forgot our water, two beers, didn't bring us plates or utensils when the food came, didn't offer someone who joined later water, so on and so forth. Food is still good, prices are still good, but -1 star for mind-blowingly abysmal service (and I think that's being soft on em).
This is a review of Mantra's happy hour, which is 4:30-6:30PM. It was empty when we got there around... Read more 
Found a new place to go to in Palo Alto.  We came here for some drinks and cocktails for happy hour.  The Mai Tai was as authentic as you can get and the "slumdog" iced tea was delish similar to a long island iced tea.  The tandori drumsticks were very good.  Unfortunately the mussels had very little inside the shell...they seemed to have shriveled up to nothing...someone else sitting next to us experienced the same.  The rosemary basil Naan was a little too soft, I would have preferred a bit crispier to absorb the basil sauce.  The ambiance is super nice and the bartender "Cliff" was super attentive and made great libations.  We would definitely go back for dinner based on our experience at the bar.
This is my favorite Indian food restaurant in the Bay Area.  All the dishes I have tried are delightful.  The ambiance is great and the prices are right.
The atmosphere here at night was great, very busy on a Friday night so come any other night of the week and it's not so wild. The saag paneer and the jack pepper cheese naan are what I love to get, I don't eat too much :). The cocktails are wonderful I haven't been for happy hour but the Mojito's are made very well. And the staff! WOw the host is very nice and flirty. Made jokes to my friends an I all night I thought he was going to follow us out of the place. First ever tattooed white waitress working at an indian restaurant in the history of indian restaurants I believe haha. Anyway come to Mantra it's a great choice.
Indian food with a full bar? I'm in! We sat at the bar and the bartender was so friendly and helpful, he even took the time to show my husband how the heck he was supposed to eat the mussels. (Use one of the shells as a utensil, I never would have guessed!) I had the vegetarian appetizers: quinoa kebabs, paneer tikka, and some sort of chili popper. They were absolutely delicious. I tried one of the signature cocktails and topped it all off with the tiramisu and a shot of cabo. I practically floated out, I am actually having withdrawals right now...
Good food, but not a whole lot for the price.  Atmosphere was cool, similar to Junnoon, and wait staff was very good.  They also have happy hour and tasting menu deals if you go early (before 6P Su-W and before 9P on Th-Sa I think). We ordered: Shrimp "Vinhaleaux" ($12) - very tasty, but only three shrimp Chicken Tikkas ($?) - three pieces of boneless/skinless chicken (maybe one breast total?), each sitting in a different sauce; it was all delicious Garlic Chili Pepper Naan (~$3?) - good for dipping, but nothing special; pretty much just a pita Veggie Stir-fry ($?) - nice compliment to chicken moilee which didn't have any veggies Chicken "Moilee"  ($20) - pretty much curry chicken; maybe the equivalent to 1-1.5 breasts; very tasty and I like that it was boneless/skinless though there was a piece of gristle; "spiced plantain chips" translates to "A spiced plantain chip" so don't plan to share Did not have any wine
Indian food with Flair. nice setting to take clients. Good drinks list. Like any high end restaurant-Food was pricey and small portions- Lamb chops were succulent and was the best dish we had. It seemed entrees had Exotic condiments & herbs used to justify the high price. Great ambiance, pricey Indian fusion cuisine....worth a visit
This restaurant is trying to hit the 'unique' mark and I think its succeeding.  Its in the dark part of Emerson St (Palo Alto) but once you walk in, the environment is really classy with the high ceilings and rich ambience. The drink menu is vast (wines are decently priced, well drinks are definitely higher normally but during happy hour are totally worth it). The service was good, the food was, at first, difficult to predict and while the entrees are overpriced, I would definitely advise going to Mantra for the great drinks and the awesome appetizers! Good hang out place overall!!
I would not call it Indian food or even Indian-fusion for that matter. It's like calling cheeseburger, French food!!! Only difference is that a cheeseburger tastes much better that what they serve at Mantra. - Food here is nothing to die for. - Service is not great either. - 2 stars for the half-decent drinks and ambience.
At work, we often take new recruits out to dinner so they can meet the team in an informal setting.  Four of us went to Mantra, and barring the prices, I couldn't have been more pleased. Mantra has good options for those who don't really like Indian food, but incorporates subtle hints of Indian deliciousness for those who do.  I had the Organic Peas Paneer Bhurjee from the traditional Indian menu.  Really fresh (rare at Indian joints), just the right amount of richness, and delicious the next day (they made the take out box for people like me). I was less impressed by the Pesto Rosemary Naan--some things are better not messed-around with.  Get the regular Naan instead. The ambiance was great for a nice but not stuffy dinner, but I thought the prices were stretching it given the number of delicious and more affordable places in Palo Alto.  It also seemed awfully crowded when we were there, on a weekday night, but that may stem more from my liking of space than any actual problems on Mantra's end. Minus one star for the crowd and the prices.  Definitely give Mantra a try.
Classy but not too too expensive. I also really liked out server. Definitely get the lamb lollipops and the chicken tikka masala - it may be a staple but they step it up a noch.
My bf and I came a few times for dinner, but then we discovered happy hour... prices are dirt cheap! Seating is hard to come by though :( My favorites are the paneer bhurjee scramble and the jasmine-acai sparkling cocktail yumm (forgot the name) One of the bartenders is a bit abrasive... he mistook me for another yelper and referred to "The Incident," which thoroughly confused me and my girlfriend.
I came here a couple months ago with a good friend/mentor of mine on a weekday evening. Before I get into the food, let me just say that the ambiance and decor is fabulous, and I'm excited to go back soon! The ultimate idea behind this restaurant is quite admiral as well. I'm a big fan of Indian fusion, whether that be in terms of music, food, or culture. We started off with a glass of Zardetto (holy yum! Loved it so much, and I'm not a huge fan of many champagnes -- clearly I've been drinking the wrong kinds!) and a pomegranate-tini thing (my choice, tasted like cough syrup -- don't recommend). I don't remember what my friend got, but, if I remember correctly, we shared some garlic naan and the paneer ravioli. Naan was normal -- it's pretty hard to go wrong as long as it's warm! The paneer ravioli was excellent, though. The puff pastry, the stuffing, the pesto circling it -- great taste and presentation, and I highly recommend ordering that. Mantra is pricey, however, and you don't get very large portions. Nonetheless, I think the food is worth it every so often. I will definitely be stopping by for happy hour once I'm back in the area in September!
This if for the happy hour only!! Really strong drinks, albeit the variety is limited. The food is amazing!! Had the jicama salad (tiny tiny portion), the crispy greens (good size), the tofu, the chaat poppers and the cheese stuffed naan! 4 margaritas and a mint mango lassi later- the bill is $40!! Cannot be beat!! My fav was the salad and the tofu!!
Tried the samosas, channa hummus,  paneer ravioli and chicken.  Was more impressed with the appetizers than the main course.  Seems like Indian-European fusion.  Used my $25 http://restaurant.com coupon for a sit down dinner.  Apparently they have a 25% discount on take-out orders.
I've only had positive experiences here! I've had dinner and also came for some casual drinks on three other occasions. First off, I really enjoy the ambience. Something about the soft glow put me right at ease. The food is delectable as a type of modern Indian interpretation and the price for Palo Alto was reasonable. The lounge tables in the bar area can not be reserved (at least when I last checked) and are filled in a first-come basis. Get those tables! Fantastic date or smaller group option if you are fortunate enough. And if just partaking in drinks you'll find Mantra to be a nice, chill alternative to the more hectic and packed bars during the weekend nights. Yes, you can actually hear the other person while not feeling like a packed sardine being constantly groped.
Chic, Indian fusion restaurant. The chili-smoked butterfish.....I see you in my dreams.  It's sooo good.  Not sure how I feel about the rice dish on the side that comes with cherry tomatoes and mozzarella though. Service is okay (not particularly attentive, but not negligent either).  Minus one star for their actual "Indian food" (read: not fusion).  It's just ordinary (if not a cut below).  I've had them prepare an appetizer tasting plate when I was there with a party of 4 and they were all delicious (especially the fish).
This indian fusion restaurant turned me onto indian food after years of avoiding it!  The sea bass was just incredible. We once ate at the bar because the restaurant was full.  I think that I prefer the decor and feel of the bar to the formal dining room. One of my favorites in PA!
Me and my boyfriend drove all the way to PA to try this restaurant and gladly we are not disappointed at all. Parking is so so, but we don't care, we're there for food and not for parking. Service?exceptional, very attentive. Food?ohhh..so gooood!!love the scallops. T'was a wonderful night. We'll be back soon.
This review is for there happy hour.  The happy hour deal prices are unbeatable.  50% off small plates and drinks.    I had a margarita and slum dog tea (both were good).  Our table ordered 6 small plates.  I liked everything we were served but the dal and peppered tofu stood out the most. All in all we got 6 small plates and 5 cocktails between the 3 of us for $44 bucks.
I have stepped out and now order more than the usual.  My latest loves: Chicken tikka Masala: tender chicken breast in the tastiest tomato, butter sauce, rosemary pesto naan and perfect for dipping in the tikka sauce. Add a good heffe beer...yumm!  Never been disappointed and still go at least once a week when in town. :)
I eat here at least two times a week...it is 5 stars, but it wouldn't be fair to give it that grade... Read more 
Ate here at a company holiday party and had a good time, but probably won't come back on my own. I remember really liking the soups.
Don't go here. I got extremely sick after eating here a couple of weeks ago.  A second person in our group also got sick. We both had some of their fried greens, so we think that's what got us sick.  I used to love this place. They have a great happy hour deal. But, I'm never going back.
Overall, it was your typical nice Palo Alto restaurant with great atmosphere and a well-trained wait staff. All of their food is great if you want Indian-American cuisine. I, however, am more of a fan of authentic Indian food (with all the spices and the mush) so I may only drop by Mantra for HH type events from now on. Here is what I had when I visited: Napa Valley cab: pretty decent and solid. Mussels: nice flavor but the spices overwhelm the flavor of the mussels somewhat. Still like it though. Lamb seekh kebab: spicy in flavorful way, sauce excellent. Chicken tikka masala: too sweet, bt if you want Americanized Indian food, then come here! Saag paneer: no spices... Not very indian... I wasn't a fan. Butter naan: ok... Nothing special, maybe less than special.
I get this email yesterday from Mantra: 50% off your entire meal, today (Black Friday) only, after 5 p.m. My daughter and I had planned to go out to dinner anyway so we jumped on http://OpenTable.com and made a reservation. I also brought a copy of the email, but when we were seated our server informed us about the discount; it applied even to walk-ins. With 50% off all food and drinks it seemed like a free meal, so it took us a long time to figure out what to order. For a starter we ordered the side of smoked eggplant and potatoes, a bowl of raita, and some naan. Regular price on the raita was $2 so this cost us only $1, or basically free. Quantities were so large we took some of every dish home. Delicious food. We drank a glass of the dry German riesling (from Wachau) and the Alsatian gewurztraminer (from Metz), which could not have been more different from each other but both went well with the food. For mains we ordered the garam masala lamb chops, which came with swiss chard and the most heavenly spices, and the rajasthani duck. with succulent mushrooms. Tempted though I was to order a bottle of red wine (from the huge, superbly-chosen, and reasonably priced wine list) and get it at half price, we did not need that much wine so we opted for some red wine by the glass. This was a tough choice. Every white wine by the glass (about a dozen) was one I would order (except for the California chardonnays) but nothing on the red wine list jumped out at me. There are three pinot noirs (Burgundy, Oregon, and a third one) but I'm not a pinot drinker. Disappointingly there is no French cabernet franc by the glass, though I think that is the perfect red wine for Asian food. (There are two by the bottle, a Chinon and an Anjou.) The Australian shiraz is nothing special (for me, anyway, as I get to Australia pretty often and drink some great stuff). I don't typically drink French Bordeaux or its varietals but there was a Margaux on the menu that I thought might be nice to try. I also thought about the French Burgundy (a Louis Latour) since it seemed like a natural for the duck. But the sommelier suggested a Chianti Classico, of all things. Neither my daughter nor I liked that idea, as we consider that a wine to enjoy with food from Italy (where she spent a semester a year ago). So I opted for the Louis Latour. But when the sommelier came back with the wine he brought three glasses with about an ounce and a half in each. The glasses were numbered 1, 2, and 3 and he would not tell us what was in the glasses. He said to pick the one we liked the best and our server would bring us a full glass of that one. He left us to taste and ponder with our food. I concluded that glass 1 was the pinot, glass 2 was the Bordeaux, and glass three was the Chianti. We both liked glass 1 - bright flavors, good body - so that's what we ordered. Glass 2 was too strong for the duck especially, and glass 3 was thin and tasteless. I was right about glass 2: it was the Bordeaux. But I had glasses 1 and 3 reversed. The French pinot was way too light and the San Fabiano Chianti was wonderful. The sommelier was right. I can't believe he went to such trouble for a single glass of wine that we ended up paying all of $4.50 for. We weren't going to order dessert but for an after-discount price of $3.50 how could we not? We ordered what are called Indian Cigars, pastry tubes with banana fritters inside and accompanied by coconut ice cream. Not only were the flavors yummy but the contrast between the hot and cold seemed to make the tastebuds come more alive. What was left of the gewurtztraminer went well with the dessert. My only complaint was the background music: American pop, a bit too loud. We would have preferred Indian music, including some modern sounds. But the decor is serene and the combination of food, wine, atmosphere, and service makes for a dining pleasure, even at regular prices.
Mantra outdoes Milwaukee on early-bird special; also fusion fish.  As long as I've been in a... Read more 
Before last night's Yelp event, I had no idea that this place had such a strong review rating.    I was intrigued to discover Mantra's dishes - Indian cuisines as a fine dining.  Also, I didn't get a sample of what Mantra had to offer.  Tiny bite size appetizers and teaspoons of cocktails don't justify anything in my book.  So today I decided to pick up Mika and have lunch at Mantra for a personal review. Mantra's actual venue is bigger compared to last night's appearance.  Black ceiling, red-orange walls, shades of brown and unique decor captivated the restaurant's overall theme and setting. There were about twenty other patrons for lunch as we arrived a little after 1:00pm.    I was surprised that last night's images of the crowded bar and isolated section had diminished as we graced through an empty setting.   Of course Christian (our favorite bartender) wasn't working so we made our way to the dining area to begin this lunchtime engagement. Greeted by the host and server, we were rather disappointed that he had placed us into the darkest spot of the restaurant.   There was plenty of natural lighting and open tables on the other side of the dining area.   So we made our own decision and moved tables ourselves.    Yes, it wasn't a great impression.    After a long wait for service, the same host and server arrived and took our orders.   During this visit, I discovered that he wasn't really friendly towards us.   In a pleasant way, I had inquired about the $2.00 draft beers for our meal.   Instead, he gave me this look like, "You have to eat and drink at the bar if you want the special!"    I was offended.   I felt like I he had shut my mouth due to his deliverance of restaurant policy.    We declined on the drinks and settled for water as he finalized our order.   I was starving so I went from a "good mood" into a "let's just get this over with mentality".     Mika even asked me if I wanted to leave this place.   I decided to stay and see what happens. Garlic Chili Naan Very scrumptious!   Arrived warm with a soft chewy texture on the inside and crunchy outside, this was very pleasing to eat. Lemon Thyme Chicken Tikkas Mika did righteous by selecting this appetizer for her light lunch.  Perfectly presented on an elongated plate, each chicken piece was quite tender keeping in the natural oil and flavors.   The lemon thyme pieces are my favorite because of its oven baked soft texture.   As for the cayenne piece, it lacked the greatness in spicy.   I would have liked to see this bold dish with crushed pepper inside of a fine powdered rub. The Vinhaleaux - "Lamb Chops" This is the big recommend here.    Come here for the lamb chops.    I love gamey meats so I requested the medium for the cooked process.    Presented as lamb-sicles (or otherwise known as lamb lollipops), the natural flavor of lamb was down right delicious.    Marinated with cinnamon and clove, the tender meat electrified by taste buds as the oil from the natural fat dripped down my fork.    After the finished the first cut, I decided to use my hands for the second one.       As for the semolina cake, this was an interesting side dish because I never had it before - Tasted good but nothing spectacular.    I was expecting a fluff cake rather than a moist spread.     However, I give the grilled carrots and asparagus (both wrapped in bacon) a standing five stars.    This well executed side dish for the lamb chops made me take notes.   The presentation and taste alone surprised me on how a simple combination would be a smash hit.     I'm personally going to re-create this side dish for my summer BBQ's. Overall, Mantra receives 3.5 stars for this visit.   I'm still bothered by our server's presentation.   There are moments in life when one should just relax and keep on open mind that we all want a joyful experience.    And today's experience needed some "loosening up".    I will be returning here for dinner someday.    And yes, I will be checking the Vinhaleaux for consistency.      One more thing before I wrap this up, we did meet the manager from last night - complete attitude change.   We introduced ourselves and told him that we were one of the Yelp attendees.    Charming fellow, but my review from last night still stands.    Regardless, if you're venue is jam packed or slow day, you still could have shown more hospitality to Mika and I at the bar. Parking:   Unfortunately, parking is difficult on Emerson Street.   Last night I had to park at the county building that was one block away (free parking after 6:00pm).   Today, we got lucky and found street parking across the restaurant. Pricey:  Yes.   This isn't an Olive Garden venue.  So dress up and bring that credit card.    If you're going with wines, be ready... the wine list is intense! Thank you to Connie (Yelp) for selecting Mantra for an Elite event.     Mantra will definitely be a recommend for the future Indian lamb chop dinners.
Made it for happy hour!! Arrive before 6:30pm! Nice! Everything was 50%off!! Tried the Mantra Savories & Kebab (meat), Samosas, and Filet Mignon Raving the lamb lollipops, duck sausage AND naan!! And they're a few doors down from Fraiche (fro-yo)!! *~* HAPPY HOUR... 50% off everything!!! *~* Brandon A. and I celebrated a farewell dinner here last night! This place is a 1000 points on http://opentable.com !! But you don't need to make reservations if you're coming for happy hour (4:30pm-6:30pm). I suggest coming early because the seating is a first come first serve! - Mantra Savories ($19 orig.): Lamb Lollipop, Duck Sausage, and Spicy Chicken Kebab... this was worth it!! - Vegetarian Samosas ($8 orig.): Turnovers of Spiced Potatoes, Peas, and Cashews - Filet Mignon ($25 orig.): ordered medium rare, we got it well done =\ - Naan bread wtih pesto and rosemary ($4 orig.): LOVED!!!!!!!!!!!!! - Blue Lychee cocktail tasted yummy and sweet like a lychee!!! -Temptress with raspberry vodka, cointreau, lemon juice, and cranberry juice Because we had made dinner reservations here, they sat us on a different side of the restaurant. Apparently, the rowdy side was the only section of the restaurant that was offering the happy hour deal. Luckily they were nice enough to move us to where the action was at! haha But then it started getting more crowded and they asked us to move to a different table to accommodate a larger party... that part was just weird. I felt the staff was trying to be too friendly, which was a bit annoying. However, for the food being so cheap we wanted to order more!! hahaha I really enjoyed the naan bread, lamb lollipop, and duck sausage the most!!! mmmmmm I'm not sure how much the cocktails costs. Maybe that's how they get you... cheap food, expensive drinks. I'd only come back here for the food during happy hour!! :D After Mantra, we went to Fraiche for fro-yo and then Patxi's for pizza (and yes, in that order)!!! haha Service: 2-3 stars (they made us move twice!!! it was awkward) Food: 4 stars (50% off your entire bill... can't complain) Atmosphere: 4 stars (lots of people are here during happy hour) Overall: 3.5 stars (still room for improvement) Tip: Only come here for happy hour!!!!
I don't usually write food reviews but I think Mantra deserves one. I went to Mantra for the first time on Thursday the 26th and had the lamb chops and spiced sweet potatoes. Now, I am a die hard sweet potato fan. I like the white ones the best but my family prefers the orange ones which are NOT to be confused with yams. Anyway, when I saw that it was the white kind I was extremely happy since I only eat those once a year. So, not only did I get to have my all time favorite but I also got to have it spiced which made it ten times better. It's a wonderful place and I'm going to make it a point to go to Palo Alto once a month for lunch or dinner and have my new favorite.
Family style, freshness and a delightful wine list!  I was happy to avoid commuter traffic by staying in the neighborhood and relaxing at Mantra during happy hour.  Great for groups or singles, plenty of seating and GREAT atmosphere.
Fact:  Being an a**hole while saying "Hey man, I don't mean to be an a**hole" still means you are an a**hole.  This is a lesson one of their bartenders needs to learn. Came here for happy hour after reading a few Yelp reviews and thought we should be in for good times.  when we got there we noticed the sign stating $2 drafts all day for the month of July but when we got in we saw another sign stating it was only during happy hour.  This slight deception didn't bother us all that much but the jerk behind the bar did. The bartender was totally confused by my Ontario Drivers license.  And while it has my picture and clearly states that I am well above the age of majority he had difficulty wrapping his mind around this.  Maybe it was the use of english and french.  Maybe it was the use of metric units.  Maybe he thought we all use dog sleds.  But he said "I can't use this do you have something else?" and then proceeded to toss my license across the bar.  After gathering my license and resisting the urge to b*tchslap him, I produced 3 more pieces of government issued ID, all with the same information and my smiling face on it.  He STILL stated he couldn't serve me and after much back and forth said "Look.  I have to be trained to do this and the law says I need a passport.  And I don't want to get fined".  Now I'm a reasonable person and this would have been totally fine...IF IT WERE TRUE; but I'd never run into this problem in my 3 years here AND I'M DAMN NEAR 30!! Thankfully, with my trusty iPhone I was able to show him what the law ACTUALLY states and what forms of ID are ACTUALLY valid.  You know, the kind of thing he should have known with all that "training" he went through.  Anyway, he eventually relented and provided begrudging and marginally acceptable service. The $2 drafts seem to be a bit on the small side, but the chicken tikas were great. Our group returned the next week to give it another try.  Afterall, maybe he was just having a bad day.  Nope.  Still an ass.  I doubt we'll be back. Note: I've added a picture of the offending bartender to the pictures for Mantra
This place has some sentimental value to it since I had the first dinner with my in-laws-to-be here in 2006, had date nights there with my man and after he proposed we went there to celebrate with champagne.  They were so excited for us; our server poured us some beautiful bubbly and asked us to take the glasses as keepsakes.  Good food and great drinks.  I nice little gem in Palo Alto.
Definitely a fun atmosphere and good service, but the food is mediocre. It's one of those overly trendy restaurants where you don't go for the food.
mantra -  a hymn or portion of text chanted or intoned as an incantation or prayer chant - to say something monotonously or repetitiously "Connie C., Jessica T. and Yelp staff throw the best events, Connie C., Jessica T. and Yelp staff throw the best events, Connie C., Jessica T. and Yelp staff throw the best events." Came here for a private party hosted by the fabulous Connie C.  All the food was delicious.  I normally don't eat lamb but the way Mantra prepared it was so good I had seconds.  The servers, though swarmed on with each new platter leaving the kitchen, were very patient and managed to get the hors d'oeuvres to everyone.  The bartenders keep the cocktails and wine flowing and there were many to choose from.  The Mantra cocktail prepared with brandy, elderflower liqueur and citrus juice was my favorite.  The bartenders were 5 stars especially the one with the baby face and James Earl Jones voice (such a deep voice for a cherub faced guy). Mantra's for a private party = Happy host and even happier guests
I came to Mantra the other night to treat a friend. We sat outside and they kindly turned the heat lamp on for us. Despite the white table cloths and $20+ entrees, this place didn't impress us as being a 'fine dining' restaurant. My steak was boring and the rice it came with was greasy and my friend didn't appreciate the balance of flavors in his curry chicken meal. The waiter was nice but shy and didn't speak to us about the specials, if there were any. My friend was annoyed at the bright LCD screen flashing next to his head, they use it to display the menu and other pictures. It's right next to the front door, which is where we happen to be sitting. He also commented that the interior looked a bit plastic. I mentioned to the waiter that our meals were okay, and the manager came out not too long afterward and wanted to know why we weren't happy with our meals. He was very civil and honest, saying that we happened to order the two meals that were just recently put on the menu, and then to make up for it and to encourage us to come back he took our entrees off our bill. I agreed later that if he had not done that, then it's true, I would be averse to coming back. The restaurant has only been open 8 months, apparently they're still working a few things out. I have a friend who is an experienced fine dining waiter. He got a job there at Mantra just when they first opened, but he quit soon after because he said that the entire staff, from the waiters to the top management, was unacceptably amateur and that he wouldn't tolerate working with a company that didn't know what it was doing. Perhaps give this place some time to develop and then try it out.
First off, this is not a typical Indian joint. So if your intention is to get regular Indian food, this is not the place. However, they do have some interesting takes on Indian flavored cuisine. When we got here, it was almost completely empty. Service was good and fast. We were a party of 6 and ordered a bunch of stuff off the menu - some hits, some misses. The eclectic selection is good, and some very innovative. For appetizers, the Quinoa kabab was good. For the main course, we got a bunch of the eclectic entrees and some of the regular Indian stuff. Again, the Quinoa kofta, the pepper tofu were quite good. However when it came to the typical Indian stuff, it fell woefully short. The homestyle chicken was meh. The lamb bhuna was too salty. I would go back to try the modern creations and for the decor and service (it might be spotty based on other reviews, so we'll see). I would definitely stay away from traditional creations.
4 Stars I bookmarked this place when i ready the weekly yelp (happy hours) back in october.  Finally got a chance to check it out this weekend.  I took my friend out for his bday and while we waited for my gf to finish dinner at Miyakes, we stopped by here (Daru Lounge) for a drink (during their 2nd happy hour).  I had the "Mantra" and it was ok.  Service was good, but the place was stuffy and had a curry smell. That was this last weekend.....I was starving and stressed out at work, so I stopped by again early this evening to take a break and grab something to eat.  It was a little weird that if someone is standing at the hostess stand and you open the door really fast, you might knock them out! (so be careful) I started off with the "Pomegranite Crush" and I thought the bartender made it a virgin because it tasted so damn good......I felt the alcohol after standing up though...damn!.  Because I don't want to smell like curry for the next 3 days, I played it safe and ordered the "Paneer ravioli" and some plain naan.  VERY GOOD!!! portion was perfect and it tasted really good.  The place still had a bit of a stuffy curry smell to it, I guess it was happy hour because everything was 1/2 off!!! cool atmosphere too.....raggae playing and 2 plasma tvs (i think it was on espn but didn't care to look) and the bar looks nice. all in all: good service good food great happy hour pricing need better ventilation system in the kitchen/restaurant to suck that curry smell up instead of letting it linger.  I'll definitely be back to try some more of their food when I know I won't be around anybody for the next 2 days (so i can sweat out the smell).
Unobtrusive service, which was always just as required, without any fuss or delay. Great dishes, served quite quickly. Wide selection of tasty dishes on the menu. Not too "super sized", but just a good sized plate. Extensive wine list, targeting (mainly) the upper bracket. Pleasantly kid friendly, without the ambience being compromised in any way. (We did dine early, and with 3 boys under the age of 7). My only criticism was the pervasiveness of the big screen T.V.'s projecting directly into the dining area. In my mind this dumbs down the fine dining. It is "March Madness" time, so I understand the "necessity" for these over the bar area, but or kids (who don't see T.V.) were more transfixed by them than by a very pleasant dining experience. Nice decor. Recommended.
DJ MG will be in the house, july 9th, 2011......check him out!
This is one of my favorite spots.  Little on the pricey side, but well worth it given the atmosphere and usual live music they have on fri/sat nights.  Although they are pricey, the drinks have your money's worth of booze in them...  Most drinks I've had there usually have a double shot in them.  They also have a handful of creative drinks that are on the fruitier side, but very good and creative.  The bartenders are very generous (both with pours and comp'd dirnks) and are very personable, if it's not too busy they will stop and shoot the breeze with you.   I was also very impressed with the fusion food they served the limited times that I have had it.
Came here for dinner one night with my mom, bf, and lil sis. Food was pretty good. Ambience was pretty nice. We had the lamb kabobs and other stuff which I don't remember. I remember I got a chicken curry dish. The lamb kabobs were pretty tasty.
Came for lunch, the menu was good/intriguing, great wine list for an Indian restaurant (though it is fusion), good advice re: wine pairings, a bit pricey, but good atmosphere.  Would love to come for happy hour, the bar looks like fun.  I had the curry lunch special & it was delicious (esp. with the suggested wine pairing). Would have given this 4-stars but for the glacial service.  That would be fine for a leisurely Fri. lunch, but not so welcome for a Tues. business lunch.  Was slightly mollified by the gratis 1/2 glass of sparkling wine to all lunch diners that day (to celebrate their listing in the Chronicle Top 100).  All the same, would recommend, and will definitely return.
$5 to go lunches. Best yummy lunch deals in Palo Alto!
Went to this place for my work dinner we had about 70+ people attending. Overall its pretty good. I ordered the tofu with chili which was very flavorful. The tierra misu came with that and it was very delicate. I can't speak for other dishes on the menu but there were mixed reviews from other co-workers. The service is above average they were fairly attentive.
Meh.  This place is pretty overrated.  Good cocktails, and pretty tasty "Indian fusion"  (which was more like California cuisine with some Indian spicing, really), along with mediocre service.  All in all, I'm not sure how it deserves to be one of the Top 100 Bay Area Restaurants (which is plastered all over the place, BTW).  It was pretty good, but I'm glad I didn't pick up the check.
Mantra's a pretty decent restaurant to visit if you're in the area, but not something that I'd travel far for. Unless you're enjoying the 50% happy hour discount (at the bar only), Mantra's prices are fairly high for what they offer, even for Palo Alto. The restaurant is pretty modern / trendy and the food is more Asian fusion than it is pure Indian fare. Service was a little slow but understandable given that the restaurant was pretty busy when I last visited. Overall, decent place, but there are better destinations for great Indian food if you're willing to travel to Mountain View.
I once took a dinner party to Mantra. It was our first time there  We all ordered different dishes to share, with specialty cocktails.  I learned my lesson that time that Mantra is not the place to take friend(s) who is football player size with football player appetite.  Otherwise, you'll likely see him grab the 1 rib served in their rib dish and use it as a toothpick.  I got his point when a gentleman did it at this dinner to tease me,...and it was funny I have to admit.  He estimated that I'd have to order many-many dishes at Mantra to fill someone with a bigger appetite as opposed to a steak dinner somewhere else.
50% off everything on the menu, including drinks, everyday during happy hour makes everything more delicious.  I do not recommend the pepper jack naan unless you're in the mood for pizza, in which case I recommend Amicis.
I've been coming here since shortly after they opened, but never got around to writing a review.  Have gone twice in the same day (guest staying with me) so I feel like now is a good time.  First, the lunch and dinner are totally different, so I am reviewing them as separate experiences.  This restaurant was on the Chron Top 100, and I think they are still fighting-worthy of a run on the list. Lunchtime has the standard Indian buffet for $10.  The food is traditional Indian, with some delicacy on the spicing and flavors.  It's really good, but I think they're competing for the wrong crowd.  The decor and service at the restaurant are really nice and beautiful, so it's especially good if you want delicious Indian but a super-nice atmosphere.  The number of selections is not as huge as some of the lower-end Indian restaurants, and lunchtime only has buffet (no ordering off the menu). Dinner the vibe is completely different.  The posh plushness of the decor really shows with the evening lighting and dark outside, the bar is quite a scene and (on a Wednesday) the restaurant was really packed.  A bit on the louder side, depending on where you sit, but romantic and fabulous.  Although I'm against kids in nice restaurants as a general practice, I had to bring mine with me.  The staff were really great and accommodating, and even rushed the check to me when I asked for it early in the meal (as things were deteriorating and I didn't want to subject my fellow diners to the horror that is my offspring over-tired).  The service was attentive, but not overly so, and they were always with us in a second whenever we looked up to find them. The food deserves its own sub-section.  Dinner is Indian-Californian, so there are Californian cuisine entrees and appetizers, but with an Indian twist.  I think this is pretty special, and not very common.  The execution is also good, so they don't have weird combos that sound intriguing but fall short on the flavor.  They've switched up the lamb a few times, and every version has been excellent.  It's not an inexpensive restaurant, but for the quality of food and as a Californian cuisine on the Peninsula (where we're desperate for good food that we don't have to drive to the City for and will pay ridiculously for it), it's quite reasonable.  I'll be back, and bring any foodie friends from out of town.
This review pertains to the lunch buffet only. As many reviewers have noted, the decor of this restaurant is very attractive. To me the quality of the food is all that matters. The dishes looked and tasted very good.  The food was not heavily seasoned.  I can handle a lot more spice but the flavors were just right.  I did not notice the heaviness in the stomach a few hours after an Indian buffet meal. Excellent naan, good service. One nit: the kheer (rice pudding) was too sweet. Well done!
I love the happy hour at this place. The appetizers are half off, and well drinks are cheap as well! The bartender is so funny, and really nice to talk to. I definitely recommend this place for happy hour. The prices are a bit expensive if you don't go for happy hour (until 6:30pm) so I wouldn't recommend it otherwise.
came here intending to eat with a party of 6, but the noise level was not conducive to discussion. i did have a cocktail, since i got there a few minutes before 6:30, their happy hour (as noted by pretty much all the reviewers below) is 50% off their entire menu from 430-630 if you eat/drink at the bar. I got the "jaded". basically a lime martini. it was ok, a little too limey actually. i'm glad it wasn't very sweet. too many restaurants like to make their fusion/specialty cocktails super sweet. my cousin had the samosas, she really liked them. I had a $25 off coupon from http://restaurant.com , but it was really hot inside (the doors in front of the bar were open, the dining room is open to the outside as well), so we went to eat elsewhere. the main dishes are around $20 each. parking can be a bitch as it's downtown palo alto, so you might have to walk a few blocks.
I love this place, pricy but so worth it!
Tasty food, good ambience. Lively! Had the scallops, chicken tikka, spare ribs, naan, & sweet potato side. Chicken tikka masala was good and bf liked the spare ribs. We got a yelp discount of 1/3 off our order. Woohoo!
The wait staff was attentive but not overbearing, the wine list was extensive and really quite decent. The decor was alright, although there was no eye for detail. We were alarmed to find the appetizers terribly disappointing. We got the cinnamon shrimp "popsicles" which are shrimp paste wrapped around a cinnamon stick. On their own they were interesting, the salad served with them simply did not go with it. The flavors clashed. We also ordered the vegetarian "naanizza" which is what it sounds like, a piece of naan treated like a pizza. There was way too much potato on it, which didn't mesh well with the other flavors at all. We were almost resigned to bitter diappointment when the entrees were served... But boy were we surprised! The entrees more than made up for the appetizers. I got the paneer "ravioli" which was a delightful puff pastry round stuffed with a delicious mix of paneer and cauliflower, very complex and wonderful flavors, I would seriously go back again and again for this dish. The boyfriend got the spicy organic tofu, and it was truly spicy and also very delicious. Again, a wonderful and complex blend of flavors, very well executed. For dessert we got these little lava cakes with ice cream, we actually asked to substitute the kulfi for ice cream, and this was also pretty good. But honestly the entrees blew everything else about this place out of the water.
This is non-Authentic Indian food that is overpriced with small portions. The only worse Indian food experience I've had was at Junnoon Restaurant  on University in Palo Alto. The real tip off at Mantra was that Kashmari sea bass was on the menu, and last time I checked Kashmir is not near an ocean... If you are into "a scene to be seen" then this is the place for you as along as you are willing to pay for it as prices are steep. If you are after quality Indian food then this isn't the place for you. I'll stick with my hole in the wall Indian place that has great food and friendly wait staff as Mantra's wait staff is quite snooty.
I like this place. They recently changed their menu which is good. Like the ambience and the food is quite good. Not very special though.
Went there on a Monday evening. Ambiance was good. Well received. The waitress came and was poring water in the glass and the water spilled down. Did not bother to wipe it up. Another waiter came and took the order. Noticed the water on the table. Said would bring a towel but did not return for quite some time. Later came and said sorry for being late and wiped it. We ordered the food. The food came quickly, did not have to wait much which was very nice. Again the surprising thing was that no plates were given to eat. We had to ask for plates. We noticed our neighbors also asking for plates raising a thought if the plates are not a normal thing here. When leaving were greeted again. Overall it was an average experience. I would go here again.
The Tandoori Sea Bass is excellent (see my photos): it is a very juicy, thick fillet, and all the flavors have been sealed inside from the tandoori process.  The Typhoon mock-tail was OK.
I first dined at Mantra for the Dine Downtown Palo Alto promotion and was satisfied enough to return a second time.  Mantra offers upscale Indian fusion cuisine in a sleek space.  Their entrees are hit-or-miss, their naans are great, their wine list is commendable, but it is their milk chocolate bombe in passion fruit soup that is worth the drive or train ride down to Palo Alto (.75 of the stars awarded to Mantra are for this fabulous dessert--it's been a while since I last visited Mantra, but I sure hope that this dessert is still on their menu).
We loved the lamb chops. It melted in our mouth..The service was good but the food took a little bit extra time to get. It was a nice experience. I also agree with the previous posters that it is a fusion restaurant and not an Indian one.
My review is for the Daru Lounge Menu.  We came a few days ago for the 1/2 price special (from 4:30-6:30, there's also another from 9:30 to closing).  For the prices we paid ($5 for a veggie item, $7 for meat item) it was GREAT.  I wouldn't have been nearly as happy though if I had paid full price.  Breakdown of what we got and my personal opinions of the dishes: Samosas: 5/5 YUM! A bit small but delicious.  Pretty traditional tasting but not too spicey. Lamb kabobs: 2.5/5 Well I'm not a fan of sweet meat so the hint of cinnamony sweetness was a bit too much for me.  But it came highly recommended by the waiter so i figure its a personal taste thing. 3 Prawns: 5/5! SOOOOO good.  There were 2 whole prawns (in some type of sauce) and 1 prawn ceviche.  The ceviche portion was probably my favorite thing I ate the entire night- soooo good! But the prawns were big and delicious. Lamb wrap sandwich: 3/5  A fellow diner really like the lamb but I thought it had almost too many spices going on.  Not bad, but if you want ground lamb get the kefta kabob at Fayrouz or Mediteranean wraps for better tasting/better deal. Tandori flank steak: 5/5 I actually really liked this.  Couldn't really taste too much "spices" on it but it was tender and huge portion and delicious. Naaniza (naan pizza): 5/5 Kinda unique spin on pizza.  Naan with a light layer of some cream or yogurt sauce topped with veggies and some tandori chicken (optional meat).  Yum! For 4 people we got 1 of each of the above dishes (2 orders for the prawns) for a total of 7 dishes.  We also got 3 margaritas ($5 for the well drink s during happy hour.  The margarity was one of the best and strongest margaritas I've ever had!! It was made with Jose Cuervo so I'm not sure ifthe bartender gave us a great deal or if they consider Cuervo a well drink!). All that came out to less than $20 a person for food AND drinks and we were STUFFED.  Depending on the dishes you get I'd suggest ~1.5 dishes per person.  I'd never pay $40 for the same meal but for $20 it was really good!
I went to Mantra for the first time today, and everyone I was with told me to get the Butter Fish (that is a kind of fish, not a fish cooked in butter).  It was amazing.  Truly amazing.  I don't know anything else about the menu, and I don't care, because I'm always going to get the butterfish.  It was that good. The lava cake was also amazing.  The chocolate pyramid was pretty good, but not as good as the lava cake.
50% OFF IS FOR THE BAR AREA ONLY Be careful - the 50% off happy hour deal is only for the bar area only!  If you sit down in the dinning area, you pay full price!  The host and waiter forgot to mention this to us until we got the bill! The food is decent but over priced without the happy hour special.  I would recommend only going to Mantra during happy hours - and of course remember to SIT AT THE BAR. **** UPDATE **** Not to be touchy but the owner's reply below sounds like he is blaming the customer for not reading the sign in the bar area.  Sorry if I didn't bring my superman glasses with me.  How was I suppose to see a little sign in the bar area when I was shown directed to the dinning room.  At least train your staff to remind customers who show up before 6:30 that the Happy Hour prices are for the bar area only.  How hard is that??? How dare you blame the customer - especially when all four people in my party missed the "fine print".  We are regulars to restaurants in Palo Alto, not hillbillies.
if you have the money, don't know what indian food tastes like and have to eat on university ave, then mantra is for you. when you get down to paying $4 per bite of a 4 inch radius cylinder of paneer (and thinking about it) you stop enjoying it... as much. HOWever, http://restaurants.com has certificates here, and they have a 1/3 off happy hour and a $44 four course tasting menu, so it's actually a solid place to bring a first-third date. just don't bring an indian or they'll have a heart attack. take a peak at the menu, and you'll understand.
Fancy Indian fusion dining in a chic setting. Mantra also has a great bar offering mixed drinks,wine etc and small plates. Service was somewhat slow, may be it was due to the bz holiday season.
Good Indian food, but I'm afraid it can't quite compete with Amber India, which in my opinion is still the best in the area for Indian food.
The food is great but the service is so bad. I have eaten there many times, and have had many experiences with waiters that were unworthy of being waiters.  For example, recently, the waiter insisted that my friend and I take a tiny table for two whereas the restaurant was empty.  I asked for a larger table pointing that the restaurant was empty.  He told me that "we are expecting a lot of people today".  One hour later, the restaurant was just as empty (no surprise given the lousy service). Another time, it was just the two of us and a table of 8.  We could not get the attention of the waiter, and had to wait 20 minutes to get our check.  Ultimately, we asked the buyboy. This is very sad.  The food is great, the busboys are very nice, but the waiters should be fired or trained properly.  Unfortunately the quality of the food is not enough to save this place.  That's too bad because the chef deserves to be showcased for this excellent food. I keep trying to give Mantra a chance, but I repeatedly get poor service.
I've been in sort of an Indian food mood lately and while I was meeting the hubby at his office in downtown PA for dinner a few weeks ago, I was rather disappointed that there were hardly any options for Indian food in such a swanky place as University Ave. Really, the only place that was reliably good was Shiva's in Mountain View (note to self: provide separate review for Shiva's). Anyway, at first glance at the menu, I was a tad bummed that the restaurant was more Indian fusion, than traditional Indian but was relieved that some traditional dishes were offered as side dishes. They had curry, naan, samosas, and pulao rice, but, alas, no mango lassi. Their chicken curry was very tasty from what I recall.
The food is delicious but the service is AWFUL!!! After sitting for over 15 minutes someone came and took our wine order. A different wait staff brought the wrong bottle of wine, opened and served it. It took another 15 minutes to get someone over to our table to tell them about it...only to wait 10 more to get the correct bottle to our table! Then we asked to make a food order and the waiter told us he'd "be right back". NO. When we asked him he said he'd already taken our order (he had not). We placed an order and they still forgot one of our items! No one apologized once during this interaction. To top it off they put the incorrect (and more pricey) bottle of wine on our bill. This is the 2nd time I've eaten here and it was almost as terrible the time before. No more Mantra for me!
My BF sweared this was a great Indian place - good thing he crossed his fingers!  The appetizer (chicken malai tikka) was undercooked and spoiled.  We gave it another try and allowed them to re-cook it, but had the same outcome- the meat tasted like it sat in the fridge too long after being thawed; very disappointing, to say the least.
I tend to find that most higher-end indian restaurants lose their cultural flavor and produce bland food. This isn't the case with Mantra though. The refined menu is still full of flavor and zest, good for groups as well.
For Indian fare, Mantra was barely average in a South Bay full of interesting Indian restaurants.   For the setting of restaurant-filled Palo Alto, this eating spot fit right into the mold of large,open spaces trying to attract young people. Pluses: plenty of non-meat-containing options,  food is not too greasy. Neutral: No dish was outstanding Minuses: Support staff sweeps in too early and too repeatedly to clear the table.  There's obvious pressure from management to flip tables.  Thumping audio soundtrack is annoying and tiresome.
My favourite Indian restaurant.  The curry was really awesome.  I like the seafood curry and chicken masla most, and order those every time I eat there.  The price was very reasonable and the dining environment was very nice too.  You can order small dishes if you want to try more varieties.
Very cool place with a very cool aura.  The dishes are fushiony, with appetizers ranging from goat cheese and cilantro filled naans to spinach pakoras.  We just had a great npo event, to which the restaurant generously donated several appetizer dishes and gift certificates, in the bar area (aka DARU lounge), and were really appreciative of the great service and bartending ;).  There's also a nice dining area which seats about 30, and is pretty nicely lit and intimate.
This place was great except they put our party of four in a room in the back away from where the rest of the restaurant was.. so we kinda missed out on the scene.  The sea bass i got was AMAZING.. a bit on the salty side.... and the NAan is unbelievable.  The creme bulee was not that good though.  They have a good variety of drinks... and the location is great since its in downtown palo alto so you can swing by other places for drinks.  Great weekday happy hour hang out !!
Came here based on the Chronicle's recent "Bar Bites" piece. Dinner was just ok; you'd be better off coming here for just drinks and appetizers. I have no idea what's so great about the shrimp lollipops that are more batter than shrimp!
their $5 lunch box is actually really good and great to pick up right after hitting my gym across the street! i went for the veggie option and i have to say that their saag paneer was the best i've ever had!  the cubes of cheese was soft, yet had an al dente texture and didn't melt on your tongue.  it was wonderful! i'll have to sit in one day, although it's pretty pricy!  the only thing is, i walked by today and the box lunchese weren't set up outside.  i'll have to investigate this...
Not too bad. The Nan at this place is yummy, but could be more of a meal in itself.  The chicken tikka masala was good, but the chicken was really dry!  A little more fancified indian food that Naan N Curry can easily replicate.
It's okay, but you can seriously get Indian food for like 1/4 price. I guess if you are looking for ambiance plus food, this is the place to go.
We came upon this joint because of Groupon ($50 coupon for 20 bucks), and were pleased. Menu items were pricey, but everything was delicious and the service was great. The atmosphere is nice, but definitely attracts an older crowd in the dining area (I'm not saying it's uncomfortable for younger adults, I just noticed the general vibe was 35+). The Chili Tofu is amazing, and the Indian Cigars (dessert with roasted bananas and coconut) were great as well. Overall, we'd probably come here again (coupon or not).
Great food, good service.  I would come here again and again.
I like this place for the ambience and location. It easy to find nightlife after having dinner here. There are not many options for vegetarians but enough to order unique dishes for probably 3 visits. The food quality is good. I like the paneer dishes as well as the variety of naans. The rosemary pesto naan is a good one to try.
Good place for a drink after work.
We went here for a large group dinner with family, the service was very prompt. We didn't try it, but they have a really reasonably priced tasting menu as well. I thought the food was similar to Junoon, but a bit more authentic Indian.
Mantra happy hour is one of Palo Alto's hidden treats. 50% off EVERYTHING as long as you sit in the bar/lounge area.  The whole menu, all cocktails, beers, etc... all 50% off. What a great deal, right? And they recently extended the happy hour to go until 6:30pm which is great!  It's a very chic and fun bar, lots of yummy cocktails. My favorite is to get the Pomergrante Crush with an order of Samosas, and I'm set. Sometimes I'll come here for an early dinner and try to grab a seat at a table in the lounge. I mean the curry here isn't the best in the world, but it's still a great atmosphere, friendly staff, awesome deal with the happy hour special, so it's nice to have some curry and cocktails for an early dinner every now and then.
Went here for a little happy hour action with some co workers last night. We got there after happy hour ended but the bartender said that he would give it to us since we had to fight traffic to get there. PLUS!!!  We got a sidecar, lychee martini and a vodka soda. All made and presented nicely. Order the Prawns and the stuffed naan. Excellent choices. Prawns were large and flavorful.  We will definitely have to come back and try the dinner.
The food here is actually not bad. It is pretty clean and relatively non-greasy tasting and the lunch buffet is only $10. You can also stuff a take out box for $6 if you eat out. The downside of this place is that the manager is a jerk. You won't find a much better lunch value in Palo Alto. This place is really a 3.5 stars place but I rounded down for the rude manager.
